In a year, the Victorian era will end in England. But no one knows when the end of the cruelest war of the worlds will come. The combat tripods of the Martians are advancing on London, and only under the provincial Maldon the attack of the aliens is miraculously choked. Who is capable of investigating a miracle? Well, of course, the great detective Sherlock Holmes!
And far from Maldon, in a different time and place, in the pocket of Vlad Snegir, a writer who has not written for ten years, the mobile phone rings. You could say the trumpet is calling!
Meet the new novel by H.L.Oldie "Sherlock Holmes vs. the Martians"!
Henry Lyon Oldie Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians.
All rights reserved. No part of the electronic version of this book may be reproduced in any form or by any means, including posting on the Internet and corporate networks, for private and public use, without the written permission of the copyright owner.
Drop all the impossible; what remains will be the answer, no matter how incredible it may seem.
Arthur Conan Doyle, "The Sign of the Four" Chapter One Tripods near Maldon. 
1. "Son of Thunder" gives battle. 
England, perhaps, has never seen such a congestion of ships off the coast of Essex in its entire centuries-old history. The setting June sun was illuminating countless fishing schooners, burly paddle steamers from the Thames, motorboats, steamboats and launches, clumsy freighters, among which the soot-black colliers stood out involuntarily. White ocean-going ships with proud and noble contours looked in striking contrast. Alas, the vast mudflats of the Wyrley Channel prevented ships from coming close to shore. Between the land and the ships, a flock of fry plied rowing boats, boats and longboats, bringing on board people fleeing to the mainland. A huge crowd of frightened and agitated refugees dammed the gentle banks of the Blackwater River from the Axis Island beam to St. Lawrence Creek. Further, where Blackwater is, slowly carrying its muddy waters, it flows into the North Sea, the crowd noticeably thinned out: it was not so easy to get to such a distance through the local swamps. Closer to Mauldon, beyond Northley Island - here Chalmer and Blackwater flowed apart, not yet merged into one - the people also gathered in abundance. Local carriers and sailors from ships were too lazy to come here in boats. There were more than enough people wishing to climb onto the rescue decks - why work with oars an extra half mile? Two miles from the shore, on the mirror-like surface of the bay, a narrow predatory body clad in gray steel froze. Having plunged into the water, it seemed, to the very sides, the destroyer "Son of Thunder" looked asleep. Only the smoke that smoked from its pipes made it clear that the ship was under steam, ready to join the battle at any moment. Until five o'clock in the evening, nothing foreshadowed the tragedy. The sun shone serenely from heaven, baking. The meadows around Mauldon were lush green to the eye. The gentle hills near Langford were thick with flowering gorse; from a distance it seemed that they were covered with bright yellow chicken down. Complete calm reigned, the water flowed like molten gold. Only the noise and bustle on the shore disturbed this pastoral landscape, rudely bursting into the blissful picture of the coast washed out by the sun. Shouts and curses, prayers and curses ascended to the heavens; the hoarse, croaking voices of the boatmen were heard trading furiously with the refugees. Prices reached fifteen pounds per seat, but there was still no end to those who wanted to. The crowd pressed on. A young man, looking like a London clerk, wearing mouse-colored trousers and a similar waistcoat over a soiled white shirt, desperately tried to jump into the outgoing boat. The sailor at the stern met him with a stroke of the oar, and the clerk fell into the water, which was stained with blood from a broken nose. The bowler hat fell off the poor fellow's head and swam away, following the boat. The young man was floundering in the shallow water, trying to get up. A plump middle-aged woman came to his aid, picking up her skirts. She helped the clerk and, turning around, standing ankle-deep in water, began to loudly shame the men staring from the pier. As soon as the bell in the Maldonian Church of All Saints rang at five in the afternoon, the distant sounds of a cannonade came from the south. The crowd went silent. People froze, listening. Many turned in the direction of Woodham and Hawkwell, trying to see what was happening in the direction from which the rumble of guns came. However, the foggy haze that hung over the coast despite the sunny day made it impossible to see anything further than five or six miles. - It's in Shuberines! - confidently declared an elderly gentleman with magnificent sideburns, peering into the distance from under the arm and putting the other palm to the left ear. In this tone they usually say: -At the end of the world, at the devil on the horns! They won't get to us... - Half a minute later, the whiskered gentleman, refuting his own words and tone, pushed his way to the boat and at the last moment managed to roll over the side, pretty much listing the boat. The helmsman did not strike the gentleman with his oar, as had happened to the clerk, probably because the fat man, without haggling, thrust two ten-pound notes into his hand. At the same moment, the destroyer, dozing on the roadstead, came to life. The bow gun fired a blank charge into the air, giving a signal, and multi-colored flags flew up from the masts. The smoke from the chimneys grew thicker, but the Son of Thunder did not budge. After the next volley of artillery, which sounded noticeably louder, it became clear: the cannonade was approaching. The guns were fired in the area of ​​the northern tip of Foulness Island. The crowd, coming to their senses, rushed to the boats, but it was too late. The boats and longboats were in a hurry to move away from the shore, heading towards the ships waiting in the roadstead. The steamboat from the Thames slapped its wheels through the water, heading east, out to sea, past the crescent-shaped line of ships. The schooners hastily raised their sails and weighed anchors; the air was filled with clouds of smoke - gray, black and off-white. A clear June day is dim before our eyes, and the reason for this was not only the sunset. A veil of smoke from the steamer pipes quickly covered the river and the Wyrley Channel. It seemed that the earth and the sea themselves were striving in horror to hide in the darkness, sensing the approach of a ruthless and alien enemy, the creation of another world. Above the hills, shrouded in late afternoon mist, a flaming glow arose. Somewhere in the Southminster area, a tall black pillar rose into the sky. Against the background of the glow, angular shadows flickered - as if there, on the hills, long-legged insects fussed. But the first Martian did not appear from where all eyes were riveted. He moved quietly along the coast from Foulness, over the mudflats of Dengie Flat towards Sayles Point, intending to cut off the exit of the ships that were crowded at the Blackwater Estuary. When the car was finally spotted, it was too late. Behind him, behind Crouch, the figure of a second Martian appeared. He looked like a three-legged crippled spider striding through a copse of pines. However, the Martian moved extremely quickly, and his figure grew at a terrifying rate. A third one followed. The formation of the courts was broken. The desperate flapping of sails, the roar of steamship horns, white breakers, the screams of refugees. Propellers and paddle wheels churned up the surface of the bay. The ships hurried to the open sea. This panic was not without clashes. Two fishing schooners, a longboat with a red stripe on a black tube, and a dozen boats eventually sank before the Martians arrived. Whether at least one person from their passengers or crews was saved, perhaps, only the Lord knew. Shining with polished armor, two Martians were already entering the water. The third lagged behind at first, but soon caught up with his comrades. Long metal legs allowed them to go deep enough, which the Martians took advantage of, wanting to get as close as possible to the ships hurrying away. For some unknown reason, they hesitated to use the deadly heat ray. Would you like to take a closer look at floating mechanisms? Understand what they are intended for, what energy drives them? Or they simply expected to burn the ships at close range, without wasting the energy of the beam in vain? The slowness of the Martians was taken advantage of by the captain of the Son of Thunder. The destroyer had been waiting under steam for a long time, all its guns were loaded, and the crew was ready for battle. Seeing the enemy entering the water, the captain did not lose a second, giving the command -Full speed ahead!. In the crush of civilian ships, the Martians did not immediately notice the armored ship rushing towards them. Even when they realized that the Son of Thunder was heading straight for them, for a while the Martians still refrained from active action. It seems that they first encountered a human warship, and did not understand what it was. The metal caps of the tripods rose eight or ten feet above the surface of the bay. The "Son of Thunder" rushed at them without firing a single shot, as if the captain of the destroyer had decided to ram. coming to my senses, one of the Martians pointed a launch tube at the destroyer - and a cloud of black gas poured towards the Son of Thunder. As a rule, the gas cloud swelled and spread out at the place where the projectile fired from the pipe fell, but now there was no projectile. Apparently, the Martian cannon had several different firing modes. A stream of gas, more like a thick liquid, washed the left side of the destroyer with the ink of a giant octopus, but the -Son of Thunder - managed to pick up such speed that it left the murderous cloud behind in a couple of seconds. The Martians began to retreat, dispersing to the sides. Their tripods rapidly rose from the water, rising higher and higher over the bay. The nearest colossus waved a heat beam generator. The Son of Thunder was enveloped in steam and smoke, and at the same moment a return salvo hit. The destroyer fired from all the guns at close range - it was impossible to miss. The Martian staggered, losing his balance, and the second salvo literally swept away the tripod. Warped shards of metal mixed with bloody shreds flew up to the sky, and the Martian collapsed into the water. A gigantic geyser shot up, inside of which flashes of green flame raged. The answer was a resounding "Hurrah!" from the Wyrley Channel as the men of the departing ships cheered for the death of the Martian and the victory of the Earth's weapons. A long dark body emerged from a cloud of steam. The Son of Thunder seemed to be completely charred from the impact of the heat beam: the armor was blackened, warped, flames burst out of the pipes and fans, a plume of smoke and greasy soot trailed behind the destroyer. But the ship did not lose its course - an avenger, devoid of compassion, he rushed to the second tripod. The heat beam lashed out again, and the deck of the destroyer was blown into the air. The ship turned into a floating volcano rushing through the waters of the bay. From the blast wave, the Martian staggered, clumsily backed away. In the next second, the blazing remains of the Son of Thunder crashed into him, crushing him and knocking him over. The second geyser was worse than the first, and much of the Wyrley Channel was engulfed in clouds of steam and smoke. There, behind this veil and within it, something was happening. Vague shadows flickered, a heat beam flashed a couple of times, glossy, glossy tentacles shot up and fell. There was a loud hum and hiss, waves surged with a splash. But soon the distance and fog completely hid what was happening from the people who were watching the battle from the ships leaving the English Channel to the mainland. 2. Tom Radcliffe climbs the bell tower In the next second, the blazing remains of the Son of Thunder crashed into him, crushing him and knocking him over. The second geyser was worse than the first, and much of the Wyrley Channel was engulfed in clouds of steam and smoke. There, behind this veil and within it, something was happening. Vague shadows flickered, a heat beam flashed a couple of times, glossy, glossy tentacles shot up and fell. There was a loud hum and hiss, waves surged with a splash. But soon the distance and fog completely hid what was happening from the people who were watching the battle from the ships leaving the English Channel to the mainland. 2. Tom Radcliffe climbs the bell tower In the next second, the blazing remains of the Son of Thunder crashed into him, crushing him and knocking him over. The second geyser was worse than the first, and much of the Wyrley Channel was engulfed in clouds of steam and smoke. There, behind this veil and within it, something was happening. Vague shadows flickered, a heat beam flashed a couple of times, glossy, glossy tentacles shot up and fell. There was a loud hum and hiss, waves surged with a splash. But soon the distance and fog completely hid what was happening from the people who were watching the battle from the ships leaving the English Channel to the mainland. 2. Tom Radcliffe climbs the bell tower glossy, shiny tentacles shot up and fell. There was a loud hum and hiss, waves surged with a splash. But soon the distance and fog completely hid what was happening from the people who were watching the battle from the ships leaving the English Channel to the mainland. 2. Tom Radcliffe climbs the bell tower glossy, shiny tentacles shot up and fell. There was a loud hum and hiss, waves surged with a splash. But soon the distance and fog completely hid what was happening from the people who were watching the battle from the ships leaving the English Channel to the mainland. 2. Tom Radcliffe climbs the bell tower. 
Thomas Radcliffe, who worked as a loader at the Maldon East Station railway station, had a day off today. On this occasion, Radcliffe slept safely until noon. When he woke up, he prepared himself a late bachelor's breakfast of bacon and eggs and strong tea, not forgetting to praise himself for his foresight. In the past week, countless refugees from London, Surrey and south Essex have flooded Maldon, and food prices have skyrocketed. But even at these extortionate prices, the choice of food in the shops was striking in its poverty. Mother used to say to Tom: -The thrifty is better than the rich. - As she looked into the water, the kingdom of heaven to her. Tom didn't make a fortune, but in the pantry of his wooden hut, located in the dead end of Oak Close, on nine-inch nails driven into the wall hung three rings of sausage from old Oswald, deliciously smelling of smoky, barely opened ham, bunches of onions and garlic; cereals, vegetables, canned goods were stored in boxes made up by a stack. If anyone had asked Radcliff why he had such stocks, he would certainly have found it difficult to answer. It's just that the mother stocked up on provisions - and taught her son. Tom didn't think: why? So it is necessary. That's what mother said. And mother will not advise bad. But now Tom is a godfather to the king, if taken by the standards of Maldon. Too bad the eggs are running out. Radcliffe loved scrambled eggs and fried them every morning for six years now. But to replenish the supply - you will be left without pants, with the current high cost. Nothing, God willing, we'll survive. It's not forever, is it? Having properly refreshed himself, Tom set out to roam the city. The crowd in the High Street threw him into confusion. The flow of refugees overwhelmed Maldon for more than a day, but Radcliffe still could not get used to it. Never before had he seen such crowds of people. They say it's always like this in London. You can go crazy! And how do people live there? Despite the June heat, his eyes were dazzled by jackets and coats, waistcoats and traveling coats, dresses and cardigans, bowlers and top hats, suitcases, valise bags and bundles of belongings. The hubbub of the crowd, over which from time to time a separate cry flew up like a wounded bird, the shuffling of feet, the neighing of horses, the clatter of hooves, the creak of wheels - the noise stuffed Tom's ears, merged into one incessant and haunting rumble. The stream of people picked up Radcliffe and dragged him along the High Street towards the river. Along the banks of the Chalmer, the crowd, abandoning horses and wagons, flowed east to the mouth of the river, where the Chalmer merges with the Blackwater, emptying into the Wyrley Channel. For a while, Tom walked with everyone, smiling for no apparent reason, but opposite Northley Island he got out of the crowd and up the hillock. From here, countless ships were clearly visible, standing in the roadstead along the northern shore of the bay. For almost an hour, Radcliffe watched with interest an unprecedented spectacle: the flight of a damned lot of people trying to cross the English Channel. Then he took a detour back into town, went home for a bite to eat, and took the usual route to Carpenter's Tavern in Gate Street. Despite the pandemonium going on around, Carpenter's ale has risen in price within reasonable limits. Especially for the regulars, which no doubt included Radcliffe. The only conversation in the tavern was about the Martians. Well, and more about whether it's time to take your feet across the sea, to the continent. Sipping ale, Tom listened with curiosity, but he kept quiet: he had nothing to say. He did not see Martians, he did not intend to go overseas, but to retell rumors, obtained from the tenth hand, was not part of the loader's habits. "They won't get here," Tom mused as he ordered a third pint of dark. Where are we and where is London? And why should they Maldon? You'd think these monsters flew god knows how many thousands of miles from their Mars to look at our outback! The newspapers were talking about "millions of miles", but Tom, try as he might, could not imagine such a number. He had thousands of things with difficulty in his head. Tom was born and raised in Maldon. He never went further than Chelmsford. Radcliffe loved his city, but even he understood: Maldon, whatever one may say, is a hole in the hole. Deaf province, for nothing that the sea. Once again, he looked around for friends or just acquaintances, but apart from the unkempt old man Banford, he found no one. Benford was already drunk, and Tom did not approach him. The bell of All Saints Church struck five in the afternoon. Lucy brought Tom a third pint. Radcliffe nodded his thanks, took a sip of ale, and then there was a dull rumble outside, followed by a distant rumble, as if during a thunderstorm. The noise of voices in the tavern immediately quieted down. Thunder boomed again, louder and closer. - They are coming! They're coming! cried old Banford, breaking the tense silence, and knocked the rest of the beer down his throat. - Martians! - They're close! "It's a battery under Southminster!" They will detain them... There was no confidence in the voice of the speaker. Tom would never forgive himself if he missed such a sight. A real war, but not with some Germans or French, but with monsters from Mars! As a child, Tom at one time dreamed of becoming a military man. He must see it! Hastily halving his mug, he waved to Lucy and, throwing five shillings on the table - after all, Carpenter tore at exorbitant prices! - jumped out into the street. The houses all around blocked the view. All that could be seen was a shaggy column of smoke rising into the sky from the direction of Southminster. St Mary's Church on Church Street! It's very close. There is a bell tower there. From it, everything will be visible, as in the palm of your hand. Tom ran, clumsily dodging passers-by hurrying somewhere. Fear, turning into horror, was clearly read on the faces of people. The loader was surprised. He himself was not afraid. He was driven by curiosity. And why should he be afraid of the Martians? He is not a military man, he does not have any weapons. Why shoot him? And the church, to which he aspired, the Martians are unlikely to destroy. Though monsters, but not savages after all! With such and such machines, as they write in the newspapers! The wooden gate in the old stone fence around the church was open invitingly. Tom rushed past the church cemetery: gray tombstones with half-erased inscriptions froze in a group of stern sentries, towering over the lush grass that greened at the foot. He dived into the dark archway of the church entrance and almost knocked over Vicar Simpson, the parish priest. -I beg your pardon - But the vicar didn't seem surprised or annoyed. The black cassock hung on the Reverend Simpson as if on a hanger; the stiff stiff collar cut into his neck with such force that the priest's face turned purple, as if in apoplexy. - You're on time. Let's go. - You too?! Tom rejoiced. - Well, of course! I want to be saved too. The church basement has strong walls and enough room for both of us. - Basement? Tom rushed. - I wanted to climb the bell tower - you can see better from there. Will you let me, your reverend? - You're crazy! the vicar hissed at him. - Do you want to die? Let's go to the basement. Radcliffe stiffened. How so? A priest, like no one else, must hope in the Lord and believe in the mercy of Providence. Especially in the temple of God! - Do not be afraid! The Martians will not destroy the church. In any case, the Lord will protect us, - he added just in case, but it was the last phrase that finally drove Reverend Simpson out of himself. - Crazy! he exclaimed. Jesus said: what you sow, that you will reap! Spitting on the stubborn vicar, briskly as a boy, he began to descend the worn steps that led to the church cellar. Tom shrugged his shoulders and rather quickly found a staircase leading in the opposite direction: not underground, but to heaven. Or rather, the bell tower. Upstairs, he took a breath. From here, a wonderful view really opened up. All of Maldon, including suburbs, fields, the pine forests and copses all the way to Woodham, and the delta at the confluence of the rivers and the bay were in full view. - My dear mother! Thomas Radcliffe said. He saw the Martians for the first time. 3. Ulla-ulla-ulla-ulla. 
Three shiny iron helmets on stilts moved with the determination of cockroaches from the south towards the Wyrley Channel. Tom saw similar helmets at the local Military Museum. -These are cars, - he recalled what he had read in the papers. -And inside sit monsters that look like octopuses. - Very quickly, the trio of Martians found themselves on the shore and entered the water, going deeper and deeper, as if intending to drown themselves. Or can their miracle machines operate underwater? Like a diving bell? Panic swept through the bay. The ships hurried to get away, to the open sea. Some collided with each other and went to the bottom. A destroyer rushed towards the Martians. And then the war began. One Martian released black smoke, the second fired a heat beam at the destroyer. Part of the Wyrley Channel was clouded with steam and smoke. Something flashed brightly in the thick veil - one, two, three. A booming -Boom! - flew up to Tom. The answering volley of the destroyer overturned the enemy, and Tom, unable to contain his joy, yelled -Hurrah! - at the top of his lungs, echoing the refugees on the ships. But then the heat beam hit again, the destroyer rammed the Martian gunner, and a curtain of fire, steam and smoke completely hid what was happening. Something sparkled in it, moved, glossy tentacles flickered, but there was no way to see anything plainly. From the south-east, from Rudley Green, came the rumble of guns, and Tom moved to another window. Glancing in the direction of the village, the loader gasped and even sat down a little. Just at that moment Rudley Green turned into a burning hell. The three Martians advancing from South Woodham fired heat beams at a battery of twelve-pounder guns set up in the hollow. The first beam hit the boxes of shells, and the battery flew into the air. The rest of the rays walked through the village, turning it into rubble. Radcliffe looked at the burning Rudley Green, at the mourning mushroom of greasy black smoke rising to the sky, and the stevedore's rough hands clenched unwillingly into fists. Tom was sorry for the dead artillerymen, but he understood: this is a war, and there is no war without losses. But why destroy a peaceful village that poses no threat? The truth was written in the newspapers: Martians are ruthless monsters! For the first time, Tom regretted that he was not a military man, and he did not have a weapon. What he would do if he had a revolver or a rifle, Radcliffe did not know, and did not even think about it. Anything would do! Meanwhile, the Martians were inexorably approaching Mauldon. There were no longer three, but many more. Ten? Eleven? Dozen? The tripods rearranged as they went, preventing Radcliffe from counting them. Will the Martians freely enter Maldon and destroy it to the ground, how unfortunate Rudley-Green?! Tom's gaze frantically darted around the city suburbs in search of troops, guns, fortifications - a force that could stop the Martians. One battery lurked in the southeastern suburb of Lime Brook. The second Tom found behind the bushes at the intersection of Lime Brook Way and Mariners Way. The third was in the middle of an open field just beyond the edge, three hundred yards from Radcliffe's house - and how had Tom missed it before? Is that all? Three batteries against a dozen Martians?! The battery at Lime Brook fired first. Tom could clearly see how the flames burst from the gun barrels, and the cannons were shrouded in clouds of smoke. After a couple of seconds, the roar of shots and explosions flew. Shells exploded under the stilted legs of the combat tripods, but none of the Martians appeared to be hurt. The battery did not have time to give the next volley: five heat rays, clearly visible in the approaching twilight, hit the artillery positions. The bushes hiding the weapons instantly turned into blazing torches. Charging boxes exploded, guns and people scattered in all directions. A volley of batteries entrenched at the crossroads drowned in the roar. It looks like more experienced gunners served there, and they were able to get an accurate sight. New reinforced shrapnel tore through the air next to the armored caps of the Martians. One gleaming colossus staggered but did not fall, swaying in an unsteady balance. Finally finding support, he froze and did not move any more. His neighbor stumbled and hobbled sideways like a crab, dragging his metal leg. The gunners failed to build on the success. A deafening, mournful howl rolled over the fields, covering Maldon and the surrounding area. The sound was mechanical, lifeless: -Ulla-ulla-ulla-ulla! "- and therefore doubly creepy. The crippled tripod let out a howl, it was picked up by other Martians: -Ulla-ulla-ulla! .. - Thermal rays hit the battery. Tom saw the gunners running away. Looks like someone managed to escape. But the battery itself suffered the same sad fate as the guns at Lime Brook. Now the Martians did not cease fire. The beam glided further, through the outskirts of the houses. The wooden buildings caught fire; occupied, like matches, the trees in the gardens and the bushes in the front gardens. Bricks cracked, glass in the windows shattered. Not only wooden, but also stone houses were burning. Fires flared closer to the city center - on Fembridge Road, Shakespeare Drive and Marlowe Close. And the heat beam moved farther and farther; drawing a murderous curve, he quickly approached Oak Close, where the house of Thomas Radcliffe stood. In a daze, Tom watched from the bell tower, how hellfire destroys Maldon, creeping up to his hut. It cannot be said that Radcliffe was known as a zealous parishioner, but now he prayed with all the sincerity that he was capable of: -Lord, save and save! Don't let these inhumans destroy Maldon! Stop and punish them! Don't let them burn down my house!" To Tom's credit, it should be noted that he asked the Lord to save his house last, worrying much more about his native city. About himself personally, Tom did not remember at all. A tall fountain of fire shot up over the Oak Close, and pieces of the roof flew skyward. Tom's heart sank for a moment: does he really no longer have a home?! Or was one of the neighbors hurt? Because of the burning and smoke, no matter how hard he tried, he could not see which of the houses had suffered misfortune. 4. Miracle of the Lord so that Radcliffe would be known as a zealous parishioner, but now he prayed with all the sincerity that he was capable of: -Lord, save and save! Don't let these inhumans destroy Maldon! Stop and punish them! Don't let them burn down my house!" To Tom's credit, it should be noted that he asked the Lord to save his house last, worrying much more about his native city. About himself personally, Tom did not remember at all. A tall fountain of fire shot up over the Oak Close, and pieces of the roof flew skyward. Tom's heart sank for a moment: does he really no longer have a home?! Or was one of the neighbors hurt? Because of the burning and smoke, no matter how hard he tried, he could not see which of the houses had suffered misfortune. 4. Miracle of the Lord so that Radcliffe would be known as a zealous parishioner, but now he prayed with all the sincerity that he was capable of: -Lord, save and save! Don't let these inhumans destroy Maldon! Stop and punish them! Don't let them burn down my house!" To Tom's credit, it should be noted that he asked the Lord to save his house last, worrying much more about his native city. About himself personally, Tom did not remember at all. A tall fountain of fire shot up over the Oak Close, and pieces of the roof flew skyward. Tom's heart sank for a moment: does he really no longer have a home?! Or was one of the neighbors hurt? Because of the burning and smoke, no matter how hard he tried, he could not see which of the houses had suffered misfortune. 4. Miracle of the Lord Stop and punish them! Don't let them burn down my house!" To Tom's credit, it should be noted that he asked the Lord to save his house last, worrying much more about his native city. About himself personally, Tom did not remember at all. A tall fountain of fire shot up over the Oak Close, and pieces of the roof flew skyward. Tom's heart sank for a moment: does he really no longer have a home?! Or was one of the neighbors hurt? Because of the burning and smoke, no matter how hard he tried, he could not see which of the houses had suffered misfortune. 4. Miracle of the Lord Stop and punish them! Don't let them burn down my house!" To Tom's credit, it should be noted that he asked the Lord to save his house last, worrying much more about his native city. About himself personally, Tom did not remember at all. A tall fountain of fire shot up over the Oak Close, and pieces of the roof flew skyward. Tom's heart sank for a moment: does he really no longer have a home?! Or was one of the neighbors hurt? Because of the burning and smoke, no matter how hard he tried, he could not see which of the houses had suffered misfortune. 4. Miracle of the Lord Doesn't he have a home anymore? Or was one of the neighbors hurt? Because of the burning and smoke, no matter how hard he tried, he could not see which of the houses had suffered misfortune. 4. Miracle of the Lord Doesn't he have a home anymore? Or was one of the neighbors hurt? Because of the burning and smoke, no matter how hard he tried, he could not see which of the houses had suffered misfortune. 4. Miracle of the Lord. 
The heat beam moved further into the field, beyond Maldon. Tom did not understand: did the last battery manage to fire at least one volley, or did it fly into the air without firing a single shot? In any case, the defenders of Maldon were finished. The city was completely under the control of the Martians. The steel colossi approached, the flames of the fires and the rays of the setting sun playing on the polished armor with bloody highlights. The victorious howl of the Martians did not stop, announcing the surroundings of the newly appeared Sodom. Tears welled up in Tom's eyes. He stubbornly wiped his face with his fist, blinked, and when he looked out the window of the bell tower again, at first he did not believe what he saw. And no one would have believed it, because lightning fell from a clear sky and hit the nearest tripod. Like a white-hot nail, with a crack and hiss, a blinding discharge pierced into the Martian's cap. A moment later, the tripod exploded with a deafening roar. Green flames flashed, fragments of the cap and gore of bloody flesh flew in all directions. The legs of the colossus gave way and the remains of the war machine fell heavily to the ground exactly across the Mandon Road. Above the burning house on Oak Close, a ghostly shimmering glow slowly rose into the air. Inside it was a human figure. The dark shape was encased in an ethereal cocoon, or perhaps an egg, with opalescent waves running across its surface. A pearly light emanated from the cocoon, returning to the ominous evening the bright colors of a sunny day, when nothing yet foreshadowed the trouble that had befallen Mauldon. At once three or four rays of heat hit the radiant cocoon, and Tom screamed in despair. All his soul opposed the death of a wonderful creature, but Tom could not help him. Help, as it turned out, was not required. The rays rested against the shining ether - and powerlessly went out. The glow was getting stronger. Is the man an angel? - Inside the egg, he solemnly raised his hands above his head, spread them in the manner of wings - and a hot, steamy flame escaped from all the cracks in the cap of another tripod. The colossus took another hesitant step and froze: blackened, charred, silent. Strands of greasy smoke crawled from the cap to the sky, melting in the twilight air. The hum of heat rays drowned out all other sounds - even the incessant "Ulla-ulla-ulla", in which notes of anxiety and fear broke through. Now all the surviving Martians were shooting at the luminous cocoon. In addition to the heat beams, two fired from the pipes that were firing black gas projectiles. However, none of the shells exploded and did not spew gas from themselves, and the rays still did not bring any harm to the amazing creature. Moreover, slipping past and hitting the city buildings, they no longer caused damage to the houses of Mauldon! "Miracle! Tom's lips whispered. - It's a miracle! Thank you, Lord! The figure in the cocoon, meanwhile, made some mysterious passes. Their truly crushing effect was not long in affecting the Martian invaders. Above two, tangles of explosions swelled, as if shells from an undead battery had hit the Martians. Three more froze for no apparent reason, as if petrified. One was covered with white frost, the other faded, having lost its metallic luster. The third one didn't seem to change at all - it just froze and didn't move anymore. A tripod fell apart as it went, flaking rust into the tall grass near Woodham Mortimer. The surviving Martians stopped abruptly, as if they had run into an invisible barrier. Turning around they hurried away from Maldon, westward towards Danbury. They didn't get far. Retribution overtook the aliens at the edge of Pasnidzh-wood. The cocooned figurine clapped its hands, and a dazzling wall of white and blue, at least two hundred feet high, shot up before the fugitives. The forest was not affected by the fire, but the armored colossi burned out in the blink of an eye, like moths in a candle flame. Having devoured its victims, the flame fell and disappeared. Tom looked at the battlefield, at the tripods, frozen without movement, at the injured, but surviving Maldon - and tried to comprehend what had happened. Steel killer machines, hell in the flesh that fell on the city - and a miraculous deliverance. Has his prayer been heard? It never occurred to the porter that in those moments when the three-legged doom loomed over Maldon, many inhabitants cried out to heaven along with Tom Radcliffe. The radiant cocoon smoothly descended on the sinful earth and, having touched it, died away. Someone's house was burning down on the Oak Close. Tom? Neighbors? Anyway, Tom told himself, I should be there! Whose house is on fire, people need help! And he secretly hoped to see an angel descend from heaven. Well, what is it worth an angel to wait a little? Slipping on the worn steps, at the risk of breaking his neck, Tom Radcliffe began a hasty descent from the bell tower. He was afraid to be late. Having got out of the church, Tom immediately started running. Turned off Church Street into Mill Road, surprised: the street seemed to have died out. Not a soul on the sidewalk, not a light in the windows. The headlights weren't on either. People, like Vicar Simpson, hid in the cellars, afraid to stick their nose out. Tom knew Maldon like the back of his hand. In his hometown, he would not have gotten lost even in pitch darkness, and now it was twilight. The night was slow to lie down on Maldon. The crimson disk of the sun was only halfway hidden behind the Bassett Forest, darkening in the west. Tom took a short cut, making his way to the Oak Close by alleys. From time to time he jumped over the fences, as he did ten years ago, as a boy. At the intersection of Saxon Way and Jersey Road, he had to climb through the rubble: Fletcher's two-story house collapsed here. The ruins were still smoking, but the fire had subsided. Out of breath, smeared with soot, lime and brick dust, Tom jumped out at the intersection of Mermaid Way and Oak Close. For a moment he experienced a shameful but understandable relief: his hut survived! But the Liggins mansion turned into a smoky ruin. The house was torn to the very foundation: only a piece of the wall remained, in which a rectangle of a window opening with a broken frame gaped. Behind the wall was a dark pile of broken bricks, tongues of fire flitted across the charred and smoking beams; there were mangled pieces of roofing sheet all around... In the midst of a devastated yard, a girl of about seven years old was sobbing. "Jenny," Tom recalled. -Her name is Jenny. - Someone brought the Liggins' niece to Maldon about a week ago. A torn blue dress, dirty streaks on soot-stained cheeks... The girl was surrounded by people, mostly neighbors. They all looked at Jenny. Some knelt down, not afraid to tear their trousers. No one tried to comfort the child. People just stood and watched. That's nonsense! Tom resolutely pushed forward and picked up the girl in his arms: -Don't be afraid, Jenny. I am Uncle Tom. Do you remember me? The girl nodded uncertainly. She was clutching a burnt piece of paper in her fist. Everything will be fine, Jenny. They won't come again. Jenny continued to sob, but not as hopelessly as at first. Tom turned to the crowd: - Are you crazy? What are you staring at? The child was scared! He looked around for the Liggins, wanting to hand Jenny over to them, but they were nowhere to be seen. "Where's Silas?" Martha? People hid their eyes. They turned away. Jenny burst into tears again. Tom understood everything. Or rather, he thought he understood. He stood with a crying Jenny in his arms and did not know what to do next. But the confusion did not last long. Tom made a decision.
Sideshow Bullfinch - songbird. 
[1] -Bullshit, - I said. - And the languor of the spirit. - But why? Tuna was outraged. - Two storylines are braided. Create volume. They work in contrast. Why bullshit? - Bullshit-blink, - I developed the topic with pleasure. - Volume-shmovolume. See for yourself: your first line is costumed. Knights-shmytsari, tournaments in tournaments. Schmilhelm the Conqueror in a horned helmet. uh. In a shmeme. Horn, yes. Matilda of Flanders fucked Brihtrik Albino. Such a white, passionate dog. She spread her legs, her husband grew horns. Shmozhki. - He pulled up, - Tyunya warned. Taking me by the collar, she clarified: - Shmadral. I will kill. Someone who, but Tyunya was terrible in anger. I already knew. The snow creaks deliciously. Frost bites on the cheeks. The coffee has an intoxicating aroma. All these stamps, tattered to the fringe along the edges, I had the good fortune to experience for myself. The snow creaked when I shifted from foot to foot. My cheeks stiffened, from time to time I rubbed them with my palm. Well, coffee, yes. Reminds me of cognac. Another stamp given to us from above. The saleswoman admired us from the pavilion. Her fishy eyes shone with a generous woman's tear. Life is passing by, it was read in this look. Life is chugging coffee with cream, regardless of expiration date and trans fat content, and we're left with a miserable change for a tip. Treading by the gnawed-out street -distribution, warming my palm with a plastic cup of -Americano, admiring the view of the crowd merging into the subway, I felt like a dandy in the Metropol restaurant. Human! Are the oysters fresh? -Knights, - I repeated. - Beauty! And what do we have with the goose on the second line? View from the window to the garbage cans. Lead abominations of life. Change house, melancholy and despondency. Weekdays office plankton! Tyunya, you are a sadist. You need to be treated forcibly. -Contrast, - Tyunya insisted. - Great literature. - I would say, a deadly contrast. If anything, suicidal. The reader is patient, but not to the same extent! He lay down to rest, bared his belly for scratching. Your task is to inspire him with a golden dream. Where is the dream? Where is the gold?! Nightmare, and the house of mourning. What about the characters? Take, for example, you. Jeans, down jacket, knitted hat. No one is watching, everyone is running about. And you, my child, dress up in silver armor, like Joan of Arc, or put on a cocked hat, put a scimitar in your belt, put on a blindfold over your eye. Judging by Tyunya's face, I wandered somewhere wrong with my examples. Let's say a minefield. "So I'm ugly?" she asked in a whistling whisper. The sound did not come from the throat, as it should be, but from the valve of a leaking gas cylinder. - Ugly, huh? - Tyunya, honey. - And my down jacket is cheap ?! - Treasure - And jeans?! I doomedly passed back: - Hat. The hat is amazing. And you are a miracle. - And you?! -And I am hairy cattle. Never a knight. - Shmytsar! Albino impotent! Praise the phone rang. I grabbed my cell phone like a drowning man grabs a straw. The saleswoman behind the glass perked up, counting on (continued). scandal. Well, yes, daddy quarrels with a young slut. There will be something to tell the city and the world. - I'm listening! - To make you deaf! the vengeful Tyunya wished. - Pushkin's entrance, - the opera bass Gremuchko lost a lot in the mobile format. - House thirteen, near the arch to the courtyard. Second floor, apartment four. According to the registration, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. An emergency signal was received by the dispatching service. Tyunya with you? - Yeah. The bass thickened with alarm copper: - Run! Well, we ran. The hat is amazing. And you are a miracle. - And you?! -And I am hairy cattle. Never a knight. - Shmytsar! Albino impotent! Praise the phone rang. I grabbed my cell phone like a drowning man grabs a straw. The saleswoman behind the glass perked up, counting on (continued). scandal. Well, yes, daddy quarrels with a young slut. There will be something to tell the city and the world. - I'm listening! - To make you deaf! the vengeful Tyunya wished. - Pushkin's entrance, - the opera bass Gremuchko lost a lot in the mobile format. - House thirteen, near the arch to the courtyard. Second floor, apartment four. According to the registration, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. An emergency signal was received by the dispatching service. Tyunya with you? - Yeah. The bass thickened with alarm copper: - Run! Well, we ran. The hat is amazing. And you are a miracle. - And you?! -And I am hairy cattle. Never a knight. - Shmytsar! Albino impotent! Praise the phone rang. I grabbed my cell phone like a drowning man grabs a straw. The saleswoman behind the glass perked up, counting on (continued). scandal. Well, yes, daddy quarrels with a young slut. There will be something to tell the city and the world. - I'm listening! - To make you deaf! the vengeful Tyunya wished. - Pushkin's entrance, - the opera bass Gremuchko lost a lot in the mobile format. - House thirteen, near the arch to the courtyard. Second floor, apartment four. According to the registration, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. An emergency signal was received by the dispatching service. Tyunya with you? - Yeah. The bass thickened with alarm copper: - Run! Well, we ran. I grabbed my cell phone like a drowning man grabs a straw. The saleswoman behind the glass perked up, counting on (continued). scandal. Well, yes, daddy quarrels with a young slut. There will be something to tell the city and the world. - I'm listening! - To make you deaf! the vengeful Tyunya wished. - Pushkin's entrance, - the opera bass Gremuchko lost a lot in the mobile format. - House thirteen, near the arch to the courtyard. Second floor, apartment four. According to the registration, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. An emergency signal was received by the dispatching service. Tyunya with you? - Yeah. The bass thickened with alarm copper: - Run! Well, we ran. I grabbed my cell phone like a drowning man grabs a straw. The saleswoman behind the glass perked up, counting on (continued). scandal. Well, yes, daddy quarrels with a young slut. There will be something to tell the city and the world. - I'm listening! - To make you deaf! the vengeful Tyunya wished. - Pushkin's entrance, - the opera bass Gremuchko lost a lot in the mobile format. - House thirteen, near the arch to the courtyard. Second floor, apartment four. According to the registration, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. An emergency signal was received by the dispatching service. Tyunya with you? - Yeah. The bass thickened with alarm copper: - Run! Well, we ran. - Pushkin's entrance, - the opera bass Gremuchko lost a lot in the mobile format. - House thirteen, near the arch to the courtyard. Second floor, apartment four. According to the registration, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. An emergency signal was received by the dispatching service. Tyunya with you? - Yeah. The bass thickened with alarm copper: - Run! Well, we ran. - Pushkin's entrance, - the opera bass Gremuchko lost a lot in the mobile format. - House thirteen, near the arch to the courtyard. Second floor, apartment four. According to the registration, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. An emergency signal was received by the dispatching service. Tyunya with you? - Yeah. The bass thickened with alarm copper: - Run! Well, we ran.
While the court and the case, let me introduce you, most respectable audience, the dearest Tyunya, she is Tonya, she is Antonina Glebovna Nederez. And if you, most respectable audience, dare to make a joke about Nederez, a joke as banal as it is expected, then I, Vladimir Chizhik, will not give you a penny for your life. Clear? So, let's imagine a girl of wonderful age, and everything under thirty is wonderful by definition; a girl pleasant in all respects, rather sweet than a beauty queen, with a character that is difficult to describe without resorting to strong expressions, light on her legs and arms, a blonde on a chestnut lining, an idol of seventh-graders who are crazy about the adventures of Taira Aloy, a warrior maiden in six volumes - love 12+, blood 12+, the word "bastard" is questionable, the word "ass" is excluded. Okay, the rest - another time. Yes, dear audience, I know you are gone. I invented you, I barely noticed at the turn of my life that I was having endless internal dialogues. Friends, friends, wives of friends, a plumber, a janitor - having completed the conversation in real life, I continued it myself, without an interlocutor, day after day, suffering from insomnia, writing lines for both, quarreling and reconciling, offended and forgiving. The shadow of psychosis loomed behind him. Black wings fluttered overhead. The sleeves of the straitjacket dreamed of being tied with a sea knot. And then I invented a universal interlocutor - you, most respectable audience. Thank you for your attention, intermission. writing lines for both, quarreling and reconciling, offended and forgiving. The shadow of psychosis loomed behind him. Black wings fluttered overhead. The sleeves of the straitjacket dreamed of being tied with a sea knot. And then I invented a universal interlocutor - you, most respectable audience. Thank you for your attention, intermission. writing lines for both, quarreling and reconciling, offended and forgiving. The shadow of psychosis loomed behind him. Black wings fluttered overhead. The sleeves of the straitjacket dreamed of being tied with a sea knot. And then I invented a universal interlocutor - you, most respectable audience. Thank you for your attention, intermission.
- Who's there? - Receipts! - I open. This Tyunya came up with. At first, I, the fool, honestly contacted the object on the intercom and entered into a long conversation, explaining who I was. In the end, they didn't let me in. I called the cop, who, in theory, -protected - us, at first the cop did not pick up the phone, then promised to come in an hour. I waited for him until the evening, spewing abuse and blasphemy. From the fifth time, Tyunya took power into her own hands. She dialed the apartment number at random, said the magic word "receipts" - and the sesame opened without objection. Sometimes I dreamed how Tyunya fearlessly approaches the gates of the White House, says: -Receipts! - - and soon she is drinking Glenmorangie in the Oval Office, and the US President is on her parcels. The hallway smelled of cigarette smoke. - Who's there? The voice was an old woman's, one of those cheerful goats with which humorous transvestites bleat on the stage. - Signal received - Tyunya said in a tragic tone. - Witnesses? - guessed at the door. - Jehovah? - Verbalife. - What? - Paliychuk? I interjected. - Anna Igorevna? - Well, Paliychuk. Serafima Petrovna. - Anna Igorevna at home? - So you are to Nyurka, or what? The lock clicked. On the threshold stood a grandmother - God's dandelion. Bathrobe, slippers, mustache above the upper lip. Trouble, I realized. I knew this breed of flowers inside and out. Land them along the front line, instead of anti-tank gouges. - Can? - Here! - Grandma twisted the cookie. The old witch's big toe, extended farther than her anatomy would allow, moved uncomfortably. By God, there are times when I hate my job. Damn them, the first minutes of contact, when Tyunya and I desperately need to get to the object in the apartment, gain a foothold in positions and start brainstorming. If I were an investigator of the prosecutor's office, an employee of the housing office, a psychiatrist or, at worst, a burglar - everything would be much simpler. - Is Anna Igorevna your daughter? Daughter-in-law? - Granddaughter. - She is at home? - Did what? Or are you calling for a walk? - You, Serafima Petrovna, - I came in with a trump card, - just don't worry. - I'm not worried. - So don't worry. - I don't... - Okay? The main thing is to control yourself. - And I. - We are adults. We understand that anything happens in life I didn't know the best way to bring the interlocutor to a heart attack. Ask a person three times not to worry, and he will go crazy with nerves. -I did it, - Grandma nodded. - Oh, girl! And I would have slammed the door if I hadn't put my shoe in the gap. -Don't be angry with him, Serafima Petrovna, - Tyunya sang in an angelic tone, nodding at me. He's good, just rude. All men. Tyunya paused, inviting her grandmother to join. And I was not mistaken. - man, Serafima Petrovna agreed. - No delicacy. My, the earth rest in peace to him, he threw socks anywhere. And the sink after shaving. - Didn't wash it? Tuna was horrified. - Here's the bastard! - Yeah. You, girl, are young, but I see you are beaten. Well, come in, or something. I let Tyunya go ahead. The sins of the strong half of humanity bent my shoulders to the ground. He took off his shoes in the corridor, and then with difficulty. The jacket hung on a hook, next to Tyunin's down jacket. - Is reading? Tyunya asked the old woman, referring to the absent Nyurka. -That's right, - Grandma frowned. - And she told me: I read, bah! Don't interfere! Is this reading? Lie down on the couch, in his helmet, and stare at the ceiling. In my time they read, so they read! They looked at the book and turned the pages. I used to salivate my finger. And this one is in a helmet! Ugh, shame! - Can I visit her? - You come in. I won't let that go, you bastard. - He will be silent. - Well, if you keep silent. - And you are silent, Serafima Petrovna. - I? At home?! - I'm begging you. I beg you. Your Anechka I appreciated the beauty of the game: -Anechka - worked one hundred percent. -. her book is buggy. Zaela, in a sense. You have to do it, just be careful. You understand, helmet. We would be better off in a good way, without doctors. - Why don't I understand? Grandma's face became professorial. Pure means a Nobel laureate. -Don't be stupid, tea! - Fix your helmet, I'll let you. I told Nyurka - your reading is contagious! From books all the troubles. We went into the living room with a TV, and from there - into a small, judging by the decor, Nyurka's room. The monitor on the table glowed dimly: the Clock screensaver. The curtains were drawn, creating intimacy. The very culprit of our arrival - a thirteen-year-old pigal with legs - was lying on the sofa in a helmet for hyperactive reading. The lowered visor hid the upper part of the face. The lips of the girl stretched the smile of the Snow Queen: icy, motionless. Only the corner of his mouth twitched all the time. An arrhythmic tremor, a faithful companion of hyperreaders - I have seen enough of this goodness, got used to it, although at first it broke not like a child. -Verbalife, - Tyunya read aloud, pointing to the inscription that adorned the forehead. - It's us, Serafima Petrovna. We told you so, in the stairwell. Instead of answering, the grandmother pulled Nyurkino's dress, which was pulled up above her knees. -Fix the helmet, - she repeated. - Let the man go. There is nothing to stare at Nyurka, not a shop window. Look, the TV is lying: you can't breathe from pidaphiles! So they climb that your cockroaches. - He's lying, after all, - I joked unsuccessfully. - Speak for yourself. -Come on, come on, - iron pincers grabbed my elbow. - Get in the kitchen. I'll give you tea, and look at the girls - zas! There is only one helmet, it is not repaired by two people. Look, mechanic! I was dragged away. Tyunya painedly followed the expulsion, not knowing what to do. I looked around, looking for a saving straw. Probably, there, in heaven, someone looked back at my torment, for a miracle did not take long. On the bookshelf, squeezed between the Varangians Martin and Abercrombie, our lucky chance shone with a sealed spine. - I am a writer! I cried. - Famous! -Yeah, - said Grandma. - And I'm a barmaid in the Kremlin. Judging by her tone, the barmaid winged the writer like a bull to a sheep. - Here! Dodging like a loach, I snatched the cherished book from the ranks. So they grab the revolver from the holster. Damn, I even broke into a tear, so shabby, read out, this edition was correct. - "Walk in the field"! Vlad Snegir! - Walk yourself! Serafima Petrovna was indignant. - Hamlo! - That's the name! And here is the photo! The book was taken from me. Studied, sniffed, licked. We checked the photo with the original, they did not find any similarities. Still, so many years have passed! Without prompting, I took out my passport - there were already two photographs: at twenty-five and forty-five. The forensic examination continued. -There is a bullfinch here, - the grandmother waved her book, almost breaking my jaw. - Writer Snegir. And here, - wave your passport, - Chizhik. Citizen Chizhik. What do you mean, spy? -Pseudonym, - I explained. -Ah - a suspicious gleam flashed in Serafima Petrovna's eyes. - So that's who you are, gray dove. - Who? The situation turned into a bad vaudeville. - A minority. You cannot be offended. -W-why? - You're sneaking around Obama. What kind of minority am I? - And so. He said what. Sit in the room, I allow. Now I'm calm for Nyurka. Tyunya has already settled down at the monitor. Her fingers thrashed the keyboard like a Sidorov's goat. The clock is gone Windows opened and closed with lightning speed. Grandma, and she fell in love. Fire, water, someone else's work - that's what you can look at forever. -War of the Worlds, - said Tyunya. Judging by her smirk, the hound has taken the trail. - You are a smart girl, Paliychuk Anna Igorevna. Clever-reasonable pinocchio. Bullfinch, do you hear? She was reading Wells' War of the Worlds. - I break? - Yeah. Now I'll find a breakpoint. Chapter Two Station for two. 
1. England needs you!
The rumble of wheels down Station Road was heard by Tom from afar. Soon, a line of sinister black ambulances drove into the forecourt of Maldon East Station. On the side of each was a red cross in a white circle. Radcliffe stood up and stretched, stretching his shoulders. His shift just ended. If the wagons had delivered any cargo, Tom wouldn't have lifted a finger. He was more tired in the past six days than in his entire life. The wounded are another matter. The paramedics need help. Leading the procession was a convertible chaise drawn by a bay mare. A visiting doctor sat on the goats next to the coachman. He signaled to the drivers to stop by throwing up his hand. -Good morning, sir. - Tom stepped closer. -Good morning, - the doctor's eyes caught on the velveteen uniform jacket that Tom hadn't had time to take off. - Do you work at the station? - Yes, sir. - Do not know, did the morning train arrive from Chelmsford? - Should be here any minute. - Very good. Where is the exit to the platform? -The exit is over there, - Tom pointed across the square to the station building; or rather, on the only door leading inside. She was hiding in the shadow of a colonnade with arched openings that stretched along the entire facade of the building. - Through the train station. Our doors are narrow, sir. - So what? "You brought the wounded, didn't you?" - Quite right. They must be sent to Chelmsford Hospital on this train. -Then it's better to take a detour. - Let me show you? - I would be very grateful. The doctor smiled, for the first time since the beginning of the conversation. His wheaten-and-graying mustache perked up, and with an ease unexpected for his age, the doctor jumped from the wagon's frame onto the cobblestones. He turned out to be almost the same height as Tom, who was teased as a bully. - Show me. Radcliffe helped a burly orderly remove a stretcher with a wounded man from the lead van - the poor fellow had a bandaged head - and, taking a place in front, moved in a familiar way around the station building. The doctor walked by. Next came the paramedics with stretchers. They had managed to make three trips back and forth and transfer all the wounded, when a locomotive whistle came from the direction of Chelmsford. Soon the train appeared. As soon as the train, dousing the platform with a cloud of steam, stopped at the platform, the doctor rushed in search of the head of the train. His energy was enviable. Tom even thought that the doctor would make a good loader. The chief showed up in the first carriage; Tom saw the doctor explaining something to the gloomy gray-haired short man, presenting a pile of papers. The chief looked past the doctor, pursing his lips in disgust, and, it seems, did not want to know anything. Fortunately, a couple of minutes later, Mr.Eastwick, the head of the station, appeared on the platform and came to the doctor's aid. Together they, albeit with considerable difficulty, won the verbal battle, after which the doctor ordered the wounded to be loaded onto the train, from which the passengers had left by that time. After confirming that the loading was proceeding without any obstacles, the doctor breathed a sigh of relief. Taking off his bowler hat, he wiped the perspiration from his forehead with a cambric handkerchief as big as a banner. The fight with the head of the train was not easy for the doctor. Tom suggested that perhaps it would be easier for the doctor to put a dozen patients on their feet. -Thank you, young man, - the doctor nodded toward the narrow doors of the station, where a fat man with two suitcases had been stuck a minute earlier. -Your help has come in very handy. What is your name? Thomas Radcliffe, sir. The doctor has already opened his mouth to introduce himself, when from behind him came: - Watson? Is it really you, my friend?! Three paces from the doctor stood a thin gentleman in a plaid coat. When he managed to approach, Tom did not notice. The gentleman was over six feet tall, but his lean build made him appear taller. A hawkish face, sunken cheeks, a tenacious appraising look from under the visor of a hunting cap. The gentleman appeared to be about the same age as the doctor—that is, twice as old as Radcliffe. For some reason, the porter thought that despite the age and thinness of the stranger, he, Tom, would not like to meet this gentleman on a narrow path. - How did you get here, dear Watson? Confusion appeared on the doctor's face. He turned around slowly, with a noticeable effort, as if two opposing feelings were fighting in him: a desire to see the speaker as soon as possible and fear of disappointment. - They shot The doctor answered in a voice trembling with excitement. - Both here and near London, you know, they shot a lot. And where there is shooting, there are wounded. I found this out back in Afghanistan His face suddenly blossomed into a smile: -Holmes! What fates?! Stepping towards each other, the two embraced tightly: exactly like old friends after a long separation. So, apparently, it was. The doctor was not at all ashamed of his feelings - it seems that he even shed a tear. The gentleman in the plaid coat looked confused. - I see, Watson, your wife has safely departed for France. Glad, really happy. You, as before, are a faithful servant of medical duty. I think you've had more than enough patients. Six days of hard labor, huh? Now you have free time, and this is very, very handy. Will there be two empty seats in the carriage waiting for you on the square? - Just two places. Holmes! The doctor laughed. - You are in your repertoire! How did you know I sent my wife across the English Channel? What did you do as a doctor? And finally, how did you calculate the period of six days?! Holmes's pale face lit up with a fleeting smile: -We don't have much time. But so be it, I will satisfy your curiosity - in memory of the glory days in Baker Street. You said that you shot not only here, but also near London. The Martians came close to London ten days ago. So, it was then, having heard the cannonade, that you decided to leave the capital. You yourself, my brave Watson, would not have fled. You were worried about your spouse. I doubt that Maldon was your final destination, but this town is located on the seashore. Realizing the full extent of the danger, you wanted to go to the continent. Good decision, I agree. Because you don't look depressed worried or heartbroken, I conclude that your wife has sailed safely to France, and you are calm for her. You changed your mind at the last moment, or there was no place for you on the ship. - In the boat. - Well, yes, of course, in a boat! The local shoals do not allow ships to come close to the shore. Thanks for the clarification my friend. The pocket of your cloak has been torn off, and there are stains of dried blood on the lapel. I believe that in the crush, putting your wife in the boat, you broke someone's nose. - Holmes! Maybe they broke my nose? - Doubtful. Your wonderful nose does not bear the marks of other people's fists. So, to get from London to Maldon and put your wife on the ship, it took you at least three days, but rather four - with the current chaos and confusion. I myself got here from Sussex for four days, despite the fact that I was fabulously lucky on the road! Ten minus four, you've been here for six days. AND, Of course, you didn't sit idle. You are a doctor, and not just a doctor - a military surgeon. After the Martian attack on Maldon, your skills came in handy. You look tired - an unhealthy complexion, circles under the eyes, a number of other signs that I will not list to save time. Rescuing the wounded, you slept in fits and starts, three or four hours a day. But today you sent the most seriously ill patients to Chelmsford - the train is about to move. The doctor spread his hands. He seemed to feel guilty that the wounded were leaving for Chelmsford. His lush mustache twitched. -Chelmsford St. John's Hospital is much more spacious and better equipped than St. Peter's Hospital in Maldon. Good doctors work there. Indeed, listen to you, Holmes, and everything becomes quite obvious. But what about the carriage waiting for me in the square? -Smell, Watson. I saw the station square and the sanitary vans on it from the train window. If you were riding in one of them, your clothes would have had time to soak in the smells of drugs and carbolic acid, as well as festering miasma. I don't feel it. This means that you arrived in a separate carriage, which is natural for a doctor accompanying the convoy from the infirmary. Since you are not going to Chelmsford, the carriage must be waiting for you in the square. And anticipating your next question: one more place for this young man. Radcliffe looked around just in case, but there was no one around. No doubt the checkered gentleman meant him, Tom. "I'm sorry, sir," he saw fit to clarify. - Are you talking about me? - Yes, about you. Thomas Radcliffe, live in Maldon, work as a loader here at the station. - Where the hell... - You are wearing a uniform jacket, and I heard how you introduced yourself to my friend, Doctor Watson. We will need your help. Tom wanted to ask, "Which one, sir?" But then the doctor intervened: -Holmes, I am unspeakably glad to see you. Of course, I will help you in any way I can. But here I have patients, and I'm needed. - Besides you, are there doctors in Maldon? -Doctor Hawkins and his assistant, young Crisby. And my colleague, military surgeon McCormack... - Now that Chelmsford has taken over the most difficult patients, will they manage without you? The Doctor thought: -Probably, yes. But... that's great! exclaimed Holmes in a tone that brooked no objections. -My dear friend, I need you! - I will say more: England needs you! Turning to Thomas Radcliffe, he finished, -That applies to you too, young man. 2. What gentlemen talk about Of course, I will help you in any way I can. But here I have patients, and I'm needed. - Besides you, are there doctors in Maldon? -Doctor Hawkins and his assistant, young Crisby. And my colleague, military surgeon McCormack... - Now that Chelmsford has taken over the most difficult patients, will they manage without you? The Doctor thought: -Probably, yes. But... that's great! exclaimed Holmes in a tone that brooked no objections. -My dear friend, I need you! - I will say more: England needs you! Turning to Thomas Radcliffe, he finished, -That applies to you too, young man. 2. What gentlemen talk about Of course, I will help you in any way I can. But here I have patients, and I'm needed. - Besides you, are there doctors in Maldon? -Doctor Hawkins and his assistant, young Crisby. And my colleague, military surgeon McCormack... - Now that Chelmsford has taken over the most difficult patients, will they manage without you? The Doctor thought: -Probably, yes. But... that's great! exclaimed Holmes in a tone that brooked no objections. -My dear friend, I need you! - I will say more: England needs you! Turning to Thomas Radcliffe, he finished, -That applies to you too, young man. 2. What gentlemen talk about can they manage without you? The Doctor thought: -Probably, yes. But... that's great! exclaimed Holmes in a tone that brooked no objections. -My dear friend, I need you! - I will say more: England needs you! Turning to Thomas Radcliffe, he finished, -That applies to you too, young man. 2. What gentlemen talk about can they manage without you? The Doctor thought: -Probably, yes. But... that's great! exclaimed Holmes in a tone that brooked no objections. -My dear friend, I need you! - I will say more: England needs you! Turning to Thomas Radcliffe, he finished, -That applies to you too, young man. 2. What gentlemen talk about. 
Dr.Watson's story I heard the first gun rumbles on Sunday evening. It was about half past ten. In the light of gas lamps, crowds of people moved through the streets, too dense even for a weekend evening. People seemed excited, not to say exalted. The air was electrified, as before a thunderstorm. I opened the window and listened, but over the hubbub of the crowd it was difficult to make out where the cannonade was coming from. My wife came over and stood at the window next to me. - Thunder? she asked as another rumble came. - Where is the lightning? Quite a forgivable delusion - my wife had never heard gunfire before. But one who has been to war will never confuse the thunder of a cannonade with the thunder of heaven. I was certain that the gunfire was coming from the direction of Kingston. This meant that the Martians were close. Will our artillery hold them? In any case, I couldn't endanger someone dear to me. -Those are guns, - I said. - Please pack your things. We are leaving. Apparently, there was such obvious anxiety in my voice that my wife did not ask anything and got ready very quickly for the woman. Londoners had not yet fully realized the threat looming over the city, and I managed, though not immediately, but nevertheless, to catch a cab that took us to Liverpool Street Station. There was a real Babylonian pandemonium here. With colossal work worthy of a titan, I managed to get two tickets for the morning train to Chelmsford. The car was literally taken by storm, and I even had a chance to use my heavy cane in order to reason with one bastard who took it into his head to dissolve his hands. As a result, my wife and I took seats in a cramped second-class carriage. The cannonade was heard closer and closer. The doors of the wagons were closed. Desperate people clung to the railings, tried to climb onto the roof. With an unprecedented delay of a quarter of an hour, the train set off, taking us away from doomed London. It looks like the driver himself was in a hurry to get out as far as possible - our train did not stop at any of the intermediate stations. At the approaches to Chipping Ongar, the train suddenly braked sharply: there was a desperate screeching and grinding of wheels, some of the passengers fell to the floor. Fortunately, it did not come to a crash; Or rather, it didn't work in our case. Ahead of us were the overturned wagons of the train ahead of us. Then we were forced to walk. The road was blocked by a huge crowd of refugees. This human mess was a serious danger: I saw how the crowd trampled to death a fallen woman. Her scream is still in my ears. Alas, there was nothing I could do to help her. As a result, my wife and I turned into a country road. Chipping Ongar is not so far from Chipping Ongar to Chelmsford, but we got lost and had to spend the night in an abandoned lodge on the edge of some forest. We didn't get to Chelmsford until the next evening. Back in London, we decided that we would go to the continent, to France. Maldon was the nearest harbor, and it was said in the city that an armada of ships bound for the mainland had accumulated in the roads of the Wyrley Channel. Unfortunately, it was impossible to hire a wagon to Maldon at any price. Having paid exorbitant prices for a more than modest room, I left my wife to rest and recover - and spent a whole day in vain trying to negotiate with the drivers. Realizing the futility of my efforts, tired and angry, I returned to the rented accommodation. The next morning my wife declared resolutely that she had had enough rest and was ready to make the journey to Maldon on foot. We left at about nine in the morning. On the road, we were finally lucky: some kind people allowed my wife to drive the last few miles on a cart loaded with simple belongings. I walked alongside, holding on to the side of the cart, since it was moving slowly. We reached Maldon in the evening and in the morning we went to the shore of the bay. There were a great many ships on the road. The fresh sea breeze, the warm June sun, and the nearness of deliverance gave us strength. There were so many who wanted to leave England that I managed to get my wife into the boat only by four in the afternoon. A sailor at the stern held out his hand to her, but then a disgusting big man with a red, exhausted face, pushing me away and almost throwing my dear wife into the water, tried to jump into the boat contrary to all the rules of good manners. This scoundrel weighed at least two hundred pounds and was over six feet tall. But I was furious and, grabbing him by the shoulder, turned him around and hit him in the face with such force that the scoundrel fell backwards into the water. In doing so, I broke his nose, and splashes of blood stained my cloak. The wharf began to throng. Fearing that people would jump into the boat and turn it over, the sailors hurried to take the boat away from the pier. Fortunately, my wife was already safe. - Kale! Wait for me in Calais! I called to her from the pier. Then I got out of the crowd, went up to the nearest hillock and from there watched how the boat approached the Morning Star, how the passengers climbed on board. my wife was already safe. - Kale! Wait for me in Calais! I called to her from the pier. Then I got out of the crowd, went up to the nearest hillock and from there watched how the boat approached the Morning Star, how the passengers climbed on board. my wife was already safe. - Kale! Wait for me in Calais! I called to her from the pier. Then I got out of the crowd, went up to the nearest hillock and from there watched how the boat approached the Morning Star, how the passengers climbed on board.
- You are absolutely incapable of lying, dear Watson - Putting a cane with an ivory knob between his legs, Holmes folded his hands on it and rested his chin on top of his palms. In this position, swaying from the shaking, he looked even more like a bird of prey. - What do you want to say, Holmes? the doctor was outraged. -I mean, you didn't intend to sail for France. Judging by the way your inner pocket bulges out, you have a revolver with you. Get out your weapon, and no bastard would detain you for a long time. And the sailors, having heard a couple of shots in the air, would readily delay the sailing of the boat. When you really want to go somewhere, my friend, even a company of guards cannot stop you. I already know your character! The wife is safe, and Dr.Watson, a veteran of the Afghan war, breathed a sigh of relief, ready to fight to the last. Well, admit that the fight on the shore is just an excuse to stay in England! -You are insufferable, Holmes! I do not wish to discuss this topic. -I'll be glad to change the subject too. - Would you like to hear what brought me to Maldon? It is unlikely that my story will be as fascinating as yours, but it deserves attention.
The Story of Sherlock Holmes This summer I intended to spend in Sussex, on the seashore, where, as you know, I have a small but very comfortable house with an apiary. Our good landlady, Mrs. Hudson, volunteered to keep me company. Her niece convinced her that the sea air was extremely beneficial to health, and I gladly invited Mrs. Hudson to Sussex. The news of the Martian landing at Surrey was belated, for obvious reasons. At first I considered the reports printed in the newspapers brought from Chichester to be sheer nonsense, and even laughed at the fact that truly fantastic nonsense was printed in all seriousness. I was expecting a quick retraction and editorial apology, but the following issues became more and more disturbing. I am convinced that if the newspapers exaggerate the danger, then there is no doubt about the very fact of the landing of the Martians and the beginning of hostilities. At times, the barely audible sounds of cannonades came from the northwest, and one night I saw a green luminous streak in the sky, similar to the trail of a meteor. She looked exactly as the reporters described her. The newspapers wrote about the combat tripods of the Martians and that the enemy had already approached London. Mrs. Hudson was seriously alarmed. She wanted to go back to London, defending her homeland - mainly the flats in Baker Street - but I persuaded her to stay in Sussex. It was relatively safe here in the south of England. The Martians from Surrey were moving towards the capital, in the opposite direction from us. Then the newspapers stopped coming. Without any reliable information about what was happening, I lost sleep. I was weary of inaction and uncertainty. Realizing that a terrible threat loomed over my country, and possibly over the whole world, I could neither assess the scale of the disaster, nor do anything. A telegram from Birmingham, delivered by courier from Chichister, was a real salvation for me. The telegraph, as you understand, has not yet been put through to my farm, but I think Mycroft will soon see to it that this unfortunate omission is corrected. The main thing is that I finally got the opportunity to use my idle mind and do good to England. Leaving Mrs. Hudson in charge of the household until my return, I rode without delay to Burgess Hill, borrowing a buggy and horse from a neighbour. People in the city were excited, but the chaos and panic that I later saw around London was not observed in Burgess Hill. I must say that I am well acquainted with the network of English railways, I remember the train schedules on some routes by heart. The confusion of wartime made adjustments to the situation, but this knowledge was very useful to me. At Burgess Hill I took the evening train to Maidstone in Kent. Judging by a number of signs - primarily the absence of newspapers - the Martians had already captured London, and I intended to go around it from the east, along the coast. My car was almost empty - everyone was trying to get away from London, to the south, so that if the Martians approached, they would sail to the mainland from Dover, Newhaven or Portsmouth. Maidstone was markedly more unsettling. Trains ran intermittently, no one knew the departure schedule. After a loss of six hours, I contrived to board a military train carrying soldiers and a couple of batteries of twelve-pounders to Gravesend. The major who commanded the soldiers did not want to let me on the train, but you know, my friend, how persuasive I can be. We arrived at Gravesend after dark. I had to wait until morning to take the ferry across the Thames to Tilbury. At night, in the direction of London and to the north, something sparkled, flashed, the sky was lit up now with a crimson, now with a greenish glow. In the morning, standing on the ferry, I saw in the distance, behind Romford, black spreading blobs - no doubt these were clouds of poisonous gas that I had heard about. At Tilbury I barely caught the only train to Chelmsford—there were no others in sight for the next few days. The train barely made its way along the coast, stopping for long periods at tiny stations where it shouldn't even have stopped. Only on one of them a retired naval sergeant and his wife got into the next car. None of the others showed up. It seemed like the whole area was dead. Watching the distant glow Seeing with sorrow the pictures of decline and desolation floating by, I came to the conclusion that I was simply fantastically lucky along the way. Delays, waiting? Nonsense! In the current situation, trains were not supposed to run in this direction at all. What about the hastily delivered telegram? Given that many telegraph lines south of London must have been damaged in the fighting? A favorable combination of circumstances, you say. May be. I am by no means satisfied with such an explanation, but I am not accustomed to guessing from scratch. And I didn't have enough facts for serious conclusions. By the way, they are missing even now. But I digress. Very slowly, but without incident, our train reached Chelmsford, where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. that all the way I'm just fantastically lucky. Delays, waiting? Nonsense! In the current situation, trains were not supposed to run in this direction at all. What about the hastily delivered telegram? Given that many telegraph lines south of London must have been damaged in the fighting? A favorable combination of circumstances, you say. May be. I am by no means satisfied with such an explanation, but I am not accustomed to guessing from scratch. And I didn't have enough facts for serious conclusions. By the way, they are missing even now. But I digress. Very slowly, but without incident, our train reached Chelmsford, where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. that all the way I'm just fantastically lucky. Delays, waiting? Nonsense! In the current situation, trains were not supposed to run in this direction at all. What about the hastily delivered telegram? Given that many telegraph lines south of London must have been damaged in the fighting? A favorable combination of circumstances, you say. May be. I am by no means satisfied with such an explanation, but I am not accustomed to guessing from scratch. And I didn't have enough facts for serious conclusions. By the way, they are missing even now. But I digress. Very slowly, but without incident, our train reached Chelmsford, where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. In the current situation, trains were not supposed to run in this direction at all. What about the hastily delivered telegram? Given that many telegraph lines south of London must have been damaged in the fighting? A favorable combination of circumstances, you say. May be. I am by no means satisfied with such an explanation, but I am not accustomed to guessing from scratch. And I didn't have enough facts for serious conclusions. By the way, they are missing even now. But I digress. Very slowly, but without incident, our train reached Chelmsford, where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. In the current situation, trains were not supposed to run in this direction at all. What about the hastily delivered telegram? Given that many telegraph lines south of London must have been damaged in the fighting? A favorable combination of circumstances, you say. May be. I am by no means satisfied with such an explanation, but I am not accustomed to guessing from scratch. And I didn't have enough facts for serious conclusions. By the way, they are missing even now. But I digress. Very slowly, but without incident, our train reached Chelmsford, where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. that many telegraph lines south of London must have been damaged in the fighting? A favorable combination of circumstances, you say. May be. I am by no means satisfied with such an explanation, but I am not accustomed to guessing from scratch. And I didn't have enough facts for serious conclusions. By the way, they are missing even now. But I digress. Very slowly, but without incident, our train reached Chelmsford, where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. that many telegraph lines south of London must have been damaged in the fighting? A favorable combination of circumstances, you say. May be. I am by no means satisfied with such an explanation, but I am not accustomed to guessing from scratch. And I didn't have enough facts for serious conclusions. By the way, they are missing even now. But I digress. Very slowly, but without incident, our train reached Chelmsford, where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train. where I had to spend the night. And so, today I arrived at my destination - Maldon - by the morning train.
- All this is wonderful, Holmes, but you have not told about the most interesting! Telegram! Telegram from Birmingham! What important business of national importance brought you here? Oh yes, the telegram! Holmes pretended to remember her only now, although it was clear even to Tom that he had deliberately saved the most interesting for the end of the story. - As you probably know, dear Watson, the government, as well as a number of ministries and government departments, were evacuated from London to Birmingham. The telegram was sent by my brother Mycroft. He holds a fairly high position in the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, he is listened to by many, including gentlemen from the Directorate of Military Intelligence. Here is the telegram, read it. It is possible out loud - it is unlikely that Martian spies will be found here. Given the nightmarish appearance of these creatures, I find no worthy means of disguise. Holmes handed the doctor a sheet of paper folded in four. -To Mr.Sherlock Holmes, urgently, - the doctor read aloud. - Maldon, Essex. Find out all the circumstances of the destruction of the Martians. The key is an orphan girl. Page from a book. Need to be found. A matter of national importance." And do you understand what your brother is writing about? Personally, I'm in trouble. - Well, of course! Mycroft doesn't like to waste words, but he told me everything I needed. The doctor seemed to want to ask something else, but then Tom could not resist. - Girl! he exclaimed, turning to the gentlemen sitting behind him. - Little Jenny! So you came because of her, sir?! . 3. The Lord, he sees everything! Need to be found. A matter of national importance." And do you understand what your brother is writing about? Personally, I'm in trouble. - Well, of course! Mycroft doesn't like to waste words, but he told me everything I needed. The doctor seemed to want to ask something else, but then Tom could not resist. - Girl! he exclaimed, turning to the gentlemen sitting behind him. - Little Jenny! So you came because of her, sir?! . 3. The Lord, he sees everything! Need to be found. A matter of national importance." And do you understand what your brother is writing about? Personally, I'm in trouble. - Well, of course! Mycroft doesn't like to waste words, but he told me everything I needed. The doctor seemed to want to ask something else, but then Tom could not resist. - Girl! he exclaimed, turning to the gentlemen sitting behind him. - Little Jenny! So you came because of her, sir?! . 3. The Lord, he sees everything!
"Jenny," repeated Tom. - Her name is Jenny. He surprised himself. Without an invitation to intervene in the conversation of two gentlemen, one of whom was a real doctor from London, and the second made Tom dumbfounded with his ability to see through everyone, cleaner than a fortune teller - this was an extraordinary act. You could say it's a feat. Jenny Liggins. Probably Liggins. - Maybe? Holmes asked. - You know the name, but do not know the name of the girl? All of Holmes's relaxation vanished at once. In an instant, he was transformed, reminding Tom of a thoroughbred hound who took the trail. - What did I tell you, Watson, - Holmes turned to the doctor, but his eyes tightly clung to the loader. It felt like Tom suddenly became glass. My luck continues! I don't like it, but I still use it. So what about the last name? young man? -The Liggins, - Tom explained, speaking slowly and distinctly, as if speaking to a child, -are not Jenny's parents. Her father and mother died. And the girl was sent to Maldon, to her aunt and uncle. My aunt and uncle also died when the Martians burned Maldon. It's true, sir. -If the girl's father, - Holmes thought aloud, -is Mr.Liggins's brother, then the girl also bears this name. - If the girl's father is Mrs. Liggins' brother, or if the Liggins are related to the girl's mother, the surname may be different. Do you happen to know their relationship? Tom spread his hands. -Alas, sir. This is unknown to me. -Thank you, - Holmes nodded without a trace of irony. -You helped me a lot, young man. I didn't mistake you. So Jenny? And then, reassured by a friendly tone, Tom asked the main question in his life, the question that tormented him from the station itself: - Are you from the police, Mr Holmes? Are you a detective? - No. - Who are you, sir? - I am a beekeeper. A humble beekeeper from Sussex. - A beekeeper? - Don't believe me? Watson, confirm. -The beekeeper, - agreed the doctor, hiding a smile in his mustache. Leaning back in his seat, Watson enjoyed the ride. For the first time in days, he felt calm. Despite the circumstances, the doctor felt safe, and the meeting with Holmes played an important role in this. -I wrote three dozen stories about his bees and hives. Lestrade, Scotland Yard's top inspector, could attest to that if he were here. Tom suspected that he was being bullied. A beekeeper about whom doctors write stories? A beekeeper who knows Scotland Yard inspectors? The addressee of telegrams from the Ministry of Foreign Affairs?! All the beekeepers known to Tom lived a completely different life. On reflection, Radcliffe decided not to persist. Usually, when he stubbornly sought an honest answer to the question posed, the matter ended either in a fight or in the fact that the loader was expelled from the company. Now Tom did not want either the first or the second. -Let's get back to the Liggins' niece, - Mr.Holmes did not seem to be in the least interested in the feelings of the porter Radcliffe. -When was she brought to Maldon? - "I don't remember," Tom shrugged. - Ten days ago? No, it seems like two weeks... The cart shook, he almost bit his tongue. - Fine. Do you know her parents? - Where? - Relatives? The Liggins are your countrymen... - Of course! Tom was a little offended. -I know Mr.and Mrs. Liggins very well. -Mr.Liggins serves? - Works? Does he have his own business? -Mr.Liggins - Tom thought for a moment. What Mr.Liggins does is completely out of his head. He has capital. Small, in London. He lives on rent. I won't say exactly but I heard about the capital in the tavern of old Cusberry. The boys were still arguing about how many pounds Mr.Liggins had in his account. Mrs Liggins is a housewife. She rarely left the house. Such a small woman— - -And Mr.Liggins? - Can you describe his appearance? - Big one. Like me. - Mustache? Whiskers? Lameness? Tom was silent. - Thick? Skinny? stooped? - Fat. - That's enough, young man, - Holmes waved his hand good-naturedly. - Dont be upset. If you knew how little eyewitnesses can tell. Have you seen the fight between the Martians and the destroyer? Yes, from the bell tower. - Will you share it? It is very interesting to me. After the embarrassment with the Liggins, Tom was sincerely glad to be of service to Mr.Holmes. "Son of Thunder", tripods, artillery batteries - he poured words, not caring too much about the coherence of the story. Fires, lightning from a clear sky, luminous egg - the defeat of the Martians in the presentation of Radcliffe took on truly epic features. When he got to the description of the ruins of the Liggins' dwelling, Tom fell silent, taking a deep breath. My neck was numb: talking over my shoulder, turning to the audience, turned out to be more difficult than unloading a dozen wagons of barley. Holmes nodded in time with his thoughts. -I take it, - he asked, -you took Jenny? - Yes. - To yourself? - What are you, sir! Is the loader's hut a place for a little girl? Yes, and it's indecent. I took Jenny to Vicar Simpson. By this time he had already got out of the basement. -And he agreed to take the girl into care? - - Not right away. But then Priestley's widow, his housekeeper, intervened. -Damn me, - said the widow, -if I let you drive the poor orphan out into the street. And you, your reverend, should be ashamed! The Lord sees everything! The vicar felt ashamed and went into his study. And the housekeeper took Jenny to wash. Yes, that's his house! - Reverend Simpson? - Yes, sir! The gate leading to the paved path leading to the priest's house was locked. The appearance of these gates, assembled from beech boards, darkened with time, was rather decorative. A good kick would have flung them open without difficulty. The decorativeness was confirmed by the gate located nearby - built into the brick arch, the gate, it seems, never closed. Above it, wild grapes curled densely along the vault. Behind the gate began a tiny garden, where under the apple trees a wooden table surrounded by rough-hewn chairs waited for the guests. The house itself, a neat two-story building, was reddish-brown, with white-painted window frames and front doors. On the lawn in front of the house, chickens walked: three pied and one red, matching the walls. The peaceful situation contradicted the general picture of the pogrom organized by the Martians in Maldon. Whether the Lord condescended to a faithful servant, or chance turned out to be favorable to a cowardly vicar, but Simpson's house was not damaged at all. - Whoa! yelled the driver. For all the time it was his only contribution to the conversation. Why are we stopping? the doctor was surprised. -Mr.Holmes, - Tom explained instead of the driver, -came because of the girl. Of course he would want to meet poor Jenny. A gentleman like Mr.Holmes surely loves children. He won't harm the little girl. -Of course she does, - the doctor began with a strange expression on his face. -Especially the London street kids - But Holmes didn't let him finish: -Another time, Tom. Now I have completely different plans. Whether the Lord condescended to a faithful servant, or chance turned out to be favorable to a cowardly vicar, but Simpson's house was not damaged at all. - Whoa! yelled the driver. For all the time it was his only contribution to the conversation. Why are we stopping? the doctor was surprised. -Mr.Holmes, - Tom explained instead of the driver, -came because of the girl. Of course he would want to meet poor Jenny. A gentleman like Mr.Holmes surely loves children. He won't harm the little girl. -Of course she does, - the doctor began with a strange expression on his face. -Especially the London street kids - But Holmes didn't let him finish: -Another time, Tom. Now I have completely different plans. Whether the Lord condescended to a faithful servant, or chance turned out to be favorable to a cowardly vicar, but Simpson's house was not damaged at all. - Whoa! yelled the driver. For all the time it was his only contribution to the conversation. Why are we stopping? the doctor was surprised. -Mr.Holmes, - Tom explained instead of the driver, -came because of the girl. Of course he would want to meet poor Jenny. A gentleman like Mr.Holmes surely loves children. He won't harm the little girl. -Of course she does, - the doctor began with a strange expression on his face. -Especially the London street kids - But Holmes didn't let him finish: -Another time, Tom. Now I have completely different plans. For all the time it was his only contribution to the conversation. Why are we stopping? the doctor was surprised. -Mr.Holmes, - Tom explained instead of the driver, -came because of the girl. Of course he would want to meet poor Jenny. A gentleman like Mr.Holmes surely loves children. He won't harm the little girl. -Of course she does, - the doctor began with a strange expression on his face. -Especially the London street kids - But Holmes didn't let him finish: -Another time, Tom. Now I have completely different plans. For all the time it was his only contribution to the conversation. Why are we stopping? the doctor was surprised. -Mr.Holmes, - Tom explained instead of the driver, -came because of the girl. Of course he would want to meet poor Jenny. A gentleman like Mr.Holmes surely loves children. He won't harm the little girl. -Of course she does, - the doctor began with a strange expression on his face. -Especially the London street kids - But Holmes didn't let him finish: -Another time, Tom. Now I have completely different plans. the doctor began with a strange expression on his face. -Especially the London street kids - But Holmes didn't let him finish: -Another time, Tom. Now I have completely different plans. the doctor began with a strange expression on his face. -Especially the London street kids - But Holmes didn't let him finish: -Another time, Tom. Now I have completely different plans.
Sideshow Welcome, Mr.Holmes!
Let's go, psidonist. Let's make some tea... I obediently let Serafima Petrovna drag me into the kitchen. Resistance no longer made sense. The scent suggested: the old woman is now on our side. Yes, and Tyunya did not need me yet. - I'll sit here at the table. OK? - Sit, what's there. Looking half-heartedly as the grandmother puts a museum rarity on the burner - an ancient kettle with a whistle - I played with a tablet. The house had passwordless wi-fi, the connection flew like a bird. -One thousand nine hundred, - I said. - What? - A thousand, I say, the nine hundredth year. - No, - the grandmother laughed, pouring a handful of "black Indians" into the teapot. - Offend you, psidonist. I'll be younger. Thirty-eighth year old, right before the war. -I'm not talking about you, Serafima Petrovna. - Call me Fima. Baba Fima. Everyone is called that. The sudden tenderness of the old woman was frightening. Maybe I really am a minority? - I, Baba Fima, not about you. wells, "War of the Worlds". Your Nyura's book. First published February 1898. Publishing house "Heinemann". This is not counting the magazine publication in Pearson's magazine, a year earlier. - Look you! - saddened, the old woman stood at the window: she was waiting for the kettle to boil. - My uncle, Borka-red, ninety-eight. Killed in the war of the worlds, near Rzhev. Earth rest in peace to him, an alcoholic! An old book, that is. And what about the nine hundredth? The action of the book takes place in 1900, in England. Wells recalls the great opposition of Mars and Earth. Here: -The storm broke over us six years ago. When Mars approached the opposition. And he writes that this opposition was in 1894. Plus six years - you can count yourself. -Clever, - Baba Fima admired. - Ninety-four plus six. Exactly! Your Els should go to school, read arithmetic. Or gastronomy. - No need for astronomy. He was wrong, two years wrong. The great opposition of Mars and Earth actually took place in 1892. And that means. - Here's the infection! Fooling children, capitalist! - Stupid, Baba Fima. And we will remember this: formally the nine hundredth, informally - the ninety-eighth. Useful. - I do not remember. I have sclerosis. - You don't need to. - Because of this, Nyurka's mind went beyond reason? Oh, he, the bastard. - No, not because of this. This is nonsense, the usual literary liberties. Then they looked at this through their fingers. I did not begin to explain to the old woman that the author's overlay, which creates a spread in the duration of the action, also gives me a chance for some liberties in choosing the optimal "registration". The main thing here is to wait for Tyuni, her conclusions on the hacking point. However, I have already seen the solution strategy. The snag was in the details. So, one thousand nine hundredth? There is time. We'll find out the break-in - we'll localize the place. - Remove the plugs, - Baba Fima suddenly said. Her eyes lit up with a thirst for activity. - A? Unscrew the plugs, and that's it. The old woman looked twenty years younger. - Traffic jams? - We have automatic machines, on the counter. And you don't need to twist anything: pull the strap - and you're done. Now, I'll light a candle. It's bad in the dark without a candle. - Why traffic jams? - Then that electricity. We'll cut off the electricity, the helmet will turn off. Take it to your office and fix it to your health! Even if it's completely broken. I cleaned up, and then you. Hold the candle. It's dripping, don't burn yourself. - Stop! No electricity! -Don't yell at me, psidonist. Still young. - Baba Fima, I beg you! We need to complete the program correctly. You have no idea how difficult it all is! An emergency shutdown can harm Anna Igorevna. - Will your head hurt? And the head too. - You've made up your mind, Herods. Okay, put out the candle. Here, the whole floor splattered on me. The kettle whistled so that I jumped. Boiling water spilled into the teapot. It was evident from the gloomy face of the old woman that she was sorry to say goodbye to the electric idea. I played along, feigning concern. And he prayed to the guardian angel that it would not occur to Baba Fima to -pull the lash - quietly when Tyunya and I were busy with -registration. Cut off the electricity - the fool-Nyurka will get up as good as new, and even without a headache. Go and explain to the fighting grandma that the consequences of the emergency gang do not affect immediately! He tortures me with complaints, the boss will tear off three skins from me. -And one more thing, - I said. - Serafima Petrovna, is it possible without the "psidonist"? -Yeah, - the old woman agreed. - If without Serafima Petrovna. frets? - Frets. - Bullfinch! Fly here! -Your one is calling, - Baba Fima nodded respectfully. - Young, but strict. Go, otherwise he will eat a hole in the head. If I were in her place, I would definitely eat it. From crown to navel. - Give me a tray, I'll take the tea. - With tea, I myself.
- Bastards! Cursed thieves! - Hold your tongue. Not at home... - No, what bastards... Tyunya was furious. Tyunya was not shy in expressions. Her fingers curled over the keyboard like a tigress's claws. If Tyuni had the opportunity, she would have seized the face of the mysterious bastards. I called this state of hers "tuning" - a whisper, because I wanted to live to old age. In counterpoint to Tyunin's fury, the maiden Anna Igorevna reclined serenely on the sofa, a fallen knight in a helmet. If I had my way, I would flog such people without bringing them back to consciousness. - Did you find it? - Well! - What?! -Read it yourself - A printed sheet crawled out of the printer, peacefully dozing by the monitor. I noted that a 200-page stack of paper was loaded in the feed tray. It was felt that Nyurka had prepared in advance for reading, and that her version of Verbalife had a graphic editor. Simple, black and white giving output graphics like book illustrations - not Beardsley, and even more so not Dürer. Collage based on licensed material, plus light improvisation. More expensive editors created color, three-dimensional pictures, displaying them on a monitor. Very expensive, fresh ones, they worked with animation: videos up to three minutes. Okay, illustrations later. First, the breaking point.
- ... Above the house burning on Oak Close, a ghostly shimmering radiance slowly rose into the air. Inside it was a human figure. The dark shape was encased in an ethereal cocoon, or perhaps an egg, with opalescent waves running across its surface. A pearly light emanated from the cocoon, returning the bright colors of a sunny day to the ominous evening, when nothing foreshadowed yet. "
- Familiar bullshit, - I scratched my head. Where did I see her? - Where? Tuna fumed. - It is me! - You? Egg, right? - You yourself are an egg! - Out of the corner of my eye, I spotted Baba Fima grinning with understanding, standing in the doorway with a tray at the ready. - It is my book! "Taira Alaya: Return", the third volume of the series. The episode with the witcher Jessica, the destruction of the ice giants. They took, ruined my fragment, rewrote it for breaking for Wells.
- ... retribution overtook the aliens at the edge of Pasnidzh-wood. The cocooned figurine clapped its hands, and a dazzling wall of white and blue, at least two hundred feet high, shot up before the fugitives. The forest was not affected by fire, but the armored colossi burned out in the blink of an eye, like moths in a candle flame. "
I re-read the scene with the figurine-of-the-machine beating the Martians in the tail and mane. The situation cleared up. So that's what you wanted, Anna Igorevna, your knees are white, bony. - Mix, - Tyunya said in an icy tone. - Martians against magic. Breakpoint: Son of Thunder fight with tripods. Hacking method: attraction of an episode from Anastasia Nederezy's book "Taira Alaya: Return", remade in the appropriate key. "Breaking" embedded a magical episode into the fabric of mainstream sci-fi storytelling. And what do we end up with? The program hung, fucking. - Tyunya! At the door was a grandmother with a tray. Teapot, cups, sugar bowl. Above are round eyes. Babu Fima, no doubt, was shocked by Tyunin's lexicon. -Excuse me, Serafima Petrovna, - my Nederezza retorted. - Nerves. Now the program is trying to turn the "War of the Worlds" highway, eliminating contradictions. I don't know what kind of material is used to keep the credibility, but with the hacking chronotope, everything is clear. Bullfinch, what is your opinion? - Do we have options? We will stabilize. - How? - Who, baby. 1900, Maldon. East Anglia, Essex. Essex-Sussex; prefix-suffix It's elementary, Tyunya! Let the old bullfinch go to the car. Before I started working with the text, I took illustrations from the printer. Yep, I know this one. The destroyer is rushing forward at full speed. Monochrome, clouds rose over the river. Only in the waves breaks yellowness, which makes the waves resemble heaps of dirty sand. On the way to the destroyer - a Martian in a tripod. Heels back, now he will fall. The cap looks like a down's head with a bulging, swollen forehead. The porthole eye bulged in amazement. A wave of tentacles does not save the state of affairs - the balance is lost, the alien is doomed. In the lower right corner - the artist's signature, inscribed in a sketch of the boat. The bottom edge was decorated with the line: -Correa. Martians vs ThunderChild". -A Martian, - the educated Tyunya translated aloud. -Against the Son of Thunder. - She leaned towards me and said, -Who is Koria? Tennis player? - Artist. Illustrator of "War of the Worlds". Yeah, here's another. Photo, I noted. Ancient. Train station in Maldon. A chain of arches carries a gallery. Above are two brick superstructures with church-like domes. In each dome there is a narrow vertical window-slot like a loophole. On the forecourt - horse-drawn carriages. Several decent gentlemen: in bowlers, with bags. One looks a lot like Charlie Chaplin. Putting the station aside, I picked up the next page. Yep, that's modern graphics. A glowing egg hovered over the ruins. The silhouette of a man is visible through the translucent shell. Judging by the outlines, a girl. Lightning strikes all around; it is not clear whether the discharges drive away the enemies, or whether they destroyed the house. -Semyakin, - Tyunya pointed at the illustration with her finger. - Sasha Semyakin, graphics for the reissue of The Return. Jessica wets ice giants. Where are the giants? I asked. -They are giants, - Tyunya shrugged her shoulders. - They didn't get in. I opened the administrative entrance. In my head, little by little, the contours of the text "live bait" took shape. Styling was not the main problem - it didn't take much. Sometimes I regretted that my talent was not allowed to unfold. Sometimes I was happy - I would have turned around. The devil would have become sick! The main factor was the degree of freedom that I put into the system to attract material. It required the dexterity of a juggler working with a dozen rings. - Martian Baba Fima intervened, unloading the tray on the table. - Ship them to crush, the Martians! All the troubles are from them, damned Jewish Masons! They came from Mars. The grandmother's logic was admirable. Concentrating, I began typing.
-  Watson? Is it really you, my friend?! Three paces from the doctor stood a thin gentleman in a plaid coat. When he managed to approach, Tom did not notice. The gentleman was over six feet tall, but his lean build made him appear taller. A hawkish face, sunken cheeks, a tenacious appraising look from under the visor of a hunting cap. In appearance, the gentleman was about the same age as the doctor. "
The printer whirred. The latest printout was a duplicate: the Moldon station. Arches, gallery; carriage carriages. Okay, I thought. Seems to have swallowed it. Station again. And again. The printer was furious: the station was given to me seven times in a row. When I wanted to test the reaction of the program by additional text input, the printer took pity. -A respectable man, - Baba Fima appraised. She and Tyunya stood above my soul, shoulder to shoulder. - Tsekhovik? -Detective, - I said. - Private. - What a brave. Looks down. I'm afraid of heights... The fresh illustration showed a tall, thin gentleman in his forties, wearing a double-breasted tartan coat. The gentleman's head was adorned with a hunting cap, made of the same material as the coat. Cheeky, clean-shaven face; bird nose, pointed chin. Standing on his left knee, leaning his hand on the edge of a rocky platform, the gentleman gazed into the abyss. A snow-capped peak loomed far behind him; to the right rose the wooded slope of the mountain. - Cool cap, - Tyunya appreciated. - Want. -Dirstalker, - I said. - Stalker? - Tyunya was delighted. - I know! The book series was like that... - Deirstalker, baby. Deirstalker hat. Caps for deer hunting. - Why two visors? The cap really had two visors that covered the forehead and the back of the head, as well as the -ears - on the sides, currently raised up. The "ear" ribbons were tied in an elegant knot. - Well, you give, girl! - Baba Fima admired. - You should go to the garden, in the sun. It won't burn your nose, it will bake the back of your head. Good hat, right. I would have sewn for myself, but it's too late. My garden is over... - Did you sew it? Tyuni's amazement knew no bounds. - Yeah. I was a hatter when I was young. She made military caps. - Combat youth, - I stretched with a crunch. - Saber campaign, Kronstadt ice. Dear ladies, shut up for a minute. The printer, clever, did not disappoint. In the next photo, which immortalized the station in Maldon, there were more people. Behind the local Charlie Chaplin, half turned to the viewer, stood the gentleman already known to us in a hunting cap. Not only his coat and headdress, but also his trousers, tucked into high leggings, were of checkered twill, which made the gentleman strongly resemble a leopard on the hunt. A sharper photograph would have turned it into a game board, but the graininess of the frame blurred the cells into spots. -Kepi, - I said. - On the spot. This is good. - Why? Tuna asked. -Because Conan Doyle never mentions that Sherlock Holmes wore a 'dearstalker hat'. This is an initiative of Sidney Paget, an illustrator. Before him, Holmes was portrayed as a fat man with a small head. Can you imagine? Zhirtrest, and a head with a cam. - Brrr! Tuna jumped up. - And what? Baba Fima disagreed. A man without a belly is like a house without a roof. It is easier to sew on a small head. - Cinema! Tyunya interrupted the old woman. - I saw such a cap in the cinema! -Yeah, - I smiled. - From the illustration, the cap migrated to the cinema. Thus, we allow the program to take material not only from literature, but also from the archives of cinema. You never know, suddenly come in handy. See? I showed Tyune another train station with Holmes. The program processed my input, including it in the process. The graphical editor reflected the current compilation, allowing us, at least partially, to follow the process. - A classic mistake. They hunted in such a headdress. Appearing in the city with a hunting cap on your head is nonsense, nonsense, a sign of mental disability. However, this error was diligently replicated. I'm blurring the level of certainty, my child. Tolerances, overlays; the growth of degrees of freedom This way it will be easier to get onto the -War of the Worlds - highway. And Holmes is a symbol. Creator of consistent versions. Deduction will save the world... - Bullfinch! I got kissed. What a pleasure. -It's good to lick, - Baba Fima warned; however, without much danger. - Not at Nyurka. I don't have enough books in a helmet.
... and where are you going, dear audience? Do you think Nyurka is the first? A healthy desire for a miracle in feathers: read in a hyperbook how a terrible child destroys Martian tripods with magic stolen from Tyunya. Demand gives rise to supply, and now the purposeful Anna Igorevna is downloading -breaking - from the torrent. Our last client was more original, he had Carlson, a prankster with a propeller, started a whole BDSM harem on the roof! Fille in a collar, Roulle with a whip, Miss Bok in black leather underwear. Fortunately, the program fixed an "impossible contradiction" at the first stage. Get off easy, idiot. So tell me, most respectable audience, why do you have such amazing impulses? And I, then, run, save. I run. I save. At least something, and thanks for that. I haven't written new books for ten years, I've burned out. I forgot about reissues what they look like. Electronic publications are bitter tears. And to eat, good gentlemen, I want to eat three times a day. Here, I still live by literature, like a Negro on plantations. With grief, I wanted to fly to Thailand, to teach Russian tourists to dive. I was embarrassed that I couldn't dive, and I couldn't swim very well either. On the other hand, what is there to dive - pour and drink! Hey anyone? Give me the curtain! . Chapter Three The Second Martian Front. 
1. What is your name, sir?
From the notes of Dr.Watson Moot Hall, opposite which our chaise stopped, was an old three-story building of red brick, with a crenellated turret and a belfry. This architectural aristocrat haughtily towered over his undersized two-story neighbors. The wide balcony of the second floor was supported by four graceful columns. There were two tall arched windows opening onto the balcony, reaching to the very floor - apparently, they also served as balcony doors. Between them flaunted a large round clock on an openwork curved bracket. The clock showed half past eleven. On the balcony, under the clock, a mustachioed major in an unfamiliar uniform was smoking a cigar. Two men were on duty at the entrance to the building: an infantry sergeant and a constable. There was a plaque on the wall by the door that said, "Mauldon Police Department." - Come on, Watson. And you, Tom, wait here for us. Easily, which had not been affected by the past years, Holmes jumped out of the britzka. I followed my friend. The sergeant, eyeing us suspiciously, moved to the right, blocking the entrance. The constable, on the contrary, defiantly turned away, pretending that what was happening did not concern him in any way. -I'm sorry, sir, you can't come here. -Since when can a respectable Englishman go into the city police department? - Holmes was very naturally surprised. - Not allowed, sir. - In that case, sergeant, - Holmes asked with the insinuation of an experienced tempter, - maybe you will let us into the Maldon branch of the Directorate of Military Intelligence? On a matter of national importance? "Where did you get that information, sir?" This is a military secret! The sergeant's eyebrows drew together to the bridge of his nose, and his hand, as if by chance, fell on the holster of the revolver. - Come on, buddy! Holmes laughed. -The whole city knows your military secret. He was absolutely right. Hardly had Holmes announced during the delay at the curate's house that he needed to go to the Directorate, when Tom, our new assistant, immediately replied: -They settled in Moot Hall, sir. Wherever the police department is." And the driver broke his vow of silence for the second time, specifying: -This is on Market Hill. We'll be there in a quarter of an hour." What are the secrets here, if the first people asked - the loader and the coachman - turned out to be perfectly aware of where the Directorate of Military Intelligence is located ?! - What is your name, sir? The sergeant's suspicions did not dissipate in the least, but he removed his hand from his holster. My friend took a step back and lightly touched the visor of his hunting cap with his finger: -Holmes. Sherlock Holmes. It had a truly magical effect. The sergeant pulled himself to attention, rolled his eyes faithfully, and clicked his heels: -Excuse me, sir! I have orders to escort you to Captain Wallace immediately. Please, sir... And he glanced at the constable, who carefully pretended that the conflict did not interest him at all, but at the same time, ears pricked, he listened to the conversation. "Don't worry, sergeant," the constable grinned. The fact that the warrior was put in his place gave him undisguised pleasure. - I'll guard. If the Martians decide to attack, I will call you. Let's go hand-to-hand... He was interrupted by an extremely irritated voice from the balcony: - Sergeant, what the hell?! Why are you letting outsiders into the building?! We all, including the sergeant and the constable, climbed out from under the balcony that hung over us and threw our heads up. The old major was found there with a cigar, the ashes from which did not hesitate to fall right on the sergeant's cap. - Guilty, sir! The poor sergeant was between two fires. -But I'm following Captain Wallace's orders. "I'm in charge here, not Captain Wallace!" The major turned purple, and on his neck, pulled into the tight collar of his uniform, the greasy folds stood out more clearly. I began to seriously fear that the stubborn one would now have an apoplexy. -Sorry, sir, - the sergeant said. -You gave no orders about Mr.Sherlock Holmes. And Captain Wallace said -I don't care! I gave you a clear task, sergeant. - Sorry to interrupt you, major, - Holmes intervened. "Didn't you bring papers from Birmingham with you?" With a stamp of special secrecy? Look into them, and this unfortunate misunderstanding will immediately be cleared up. The major had already opened his mouth to answer, but then it seemed that the meaning of what my friend said came to him. He choked and coughed. How do you know about papers? he finally managed. I tried to hide an involuntary smile. After all, the major did not have the honor of being acquainted with Holmes and his amazing deductive abilities. "It's elementary, Major," Holmes remarked with magnificent nonchalance. -No doubt my brother Mycroft saw to it that I was not hindered in Maldon. Exactly those, by the way, that you are now trying to create. But wouldn't it be better for us to talk inside? Here, it seems to me, there are too many idle eyes and ears. Indeed, a crowd of onlookers, attracted by a noisy skirmish, had already begun to gather around us. A greengrocer with a cart stopped. A butcher and his assistant came up from a nearby store, both wearing long white aprons with badly washed bloodstains. As if from under the ground, a company of ragged boys arose, like two drops of water similar to their counterparts from Baker Street. A curious old man opened a window in the house opposite. The maid slowed down her steps, hurrying somewhere with a basket of vegetables... My friend's last phrase broke through the major's stubborn armor. Assessing the situation, he waved his hand at us with obvious reluctance: - Okay, come in. - Thank you, sir, - with excellent courtesy, Holmes once again saluted and turned to the sergeant, introducing me: - Dr.Watson, my friend and colleague. This worthy gentleman is with me. And we went to Moot Hall past the dumbfounded sergeant. 2. Battle with the steam boiler my friend and colleague. This worthy gentleman is with me. And we went to Moot Hall past the dumbfounded sergeant. 2. Battle with the steam boiler my friend and colleague. This worthy gentleman is with me. And we went to Moot Hall past the dumbfounded sergeant. 2. Battle with the steam boiler. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). Three high doors with polished brass handles opened into the spacious hall of the building. Each had a policeman on duty. Near the stairs leading to the second floor, a broad-shouldered soldier stood at attention. A well-groomed, fit captain was almost running down the steps. Stopping two paces from us, he quickly looked from Holmes to me and back. - Mr Sherlock Holmes? Dr.Watson? I am Captain Wallace. Welcome! I am sincerely glad to meet you - and I apologize for the unfortunate misunderstanding. - Captain! Where have you gone? came the impatient voice of the major from above. Apparently, irritation was his usual state. -Bring the civilians to me! - -If by -unfortunate misunderstanding - you meant the major, then you don't need to apologize, captain, - Holmes said quietly, following the stairs for our guide. The captain smiled with his lips, making it clear that he appreciated the hint, but tactfully kept silent. Major Forester - his name was later given to us by Captain Wallace - reigned on the second floor, occupying the vast hall alone, in which, probably, the entire council of Maldon could sit. Sitting at a monumental rosewood table, with his back to the window, the major leafed through the papers with an expression of extreme displeasure on his face. You have to understand the very ones that Holmes spoke about. -It says here, - Forester grumbled without greeting or even introducing himself, -that you, Mr.Holmes, are to render every possible assistance in the investigation. Oh, assistance will be rendered to you, do not hesitate! I know what orders are, and I know how to follow them. But personally, I would not let a civilian near the Directorate of Military Intelligence for a cannon shot! When it comes to the security of the empire, it's up to the professionals! -I completely agree with you, Major, - Holmes nodded imperturbably. - Professionals? Very rightly pointed out. You do not consider your superiors, who gave you the order to assist you, as amateurs, do you? The major began to slowly turn purple, boiling over. It looked like an overheated steam boiler that was about to blow off the lid. For a moment, I even had an auditory hallucination: I clearly heard the hiss of steam escaping through the valve. A second later, I realized that this was not a hallucination: restraining himself with the last of his strength, the major was sucking air through clenched teeth. To Forester's credit, it is worth noting that he nevertheless restrained himself and did not burst into curses against Holmes, as I feared. - Captain Wallace! he snapped. -I entrust these civilians to your care. Keep them up to date and assist as instructed from Birmingham. Do it! - It will be done, sir! Wallace clicked his heels. He beckoned us along. It didn't escape me that the captain and Holmes, imperceptibly for the major, looked at each other. Of course, my friend deliberately faked Forester so that he would quickly get the guests out of sight, entrusting the captain to the care. By this, he, no doubt, saved a lot of time and nerves for all of us. The office that Captain Wallace occupied looked much more modest than the major's apartments. A small table with a lamp and a writing set, three high-backed chairs, a bookcase. That, in fact, is all. A narrow window overlooked the courtyard. - Have a seat, gentlemen. Once again, I would like to say that it is a pleasure to meet you. I confess, I have long dreamed of meeting you. I read your notes doctor. And your articles, Mr.Holmes: on plant poisons, on identifying tobacco varieties by ashes... I am a big fan of your deductive method, - the captain's ears turned pink. - To the best of my modest abilities, I try to put it into practice. -Very interesting, - Holmes raised his eyebrows slightly. - And what, for example, could you say about our arrival? The captain thought for a moment, looking up at the ceiling. -You arrived in Maldon today, Mr.Holmes. Most likely by the morning train from Chelmsford. Arrived without any incident. You haven't gotten anywhere yet. By the way, if you like, I can recommend rented apartments at a reasonable price. -Not bad for a start, - Holmes assessed with uncharacteristic benevolence for my friend. - It was easy to guess about the Chelmsford train: no other trains were expected today, and in the britzka sits a loader from the station in a uniform jacket. Thomas Radcliffe, sir. I questioned him as a witness. Bravo, captain! We have been moving in the same direction from the very beginning. So, I'm wearing travel clothes. It is not dirty or torn, which indicates the absence of serious incidents along the way. Also, looking out the window overlooking Market Hill, you noticed my suitcase in the luggage compartment of the britzka. From which they concluded that I did not have time to stop anywhere. I think we'll work. -I sincerely hope so, Mr.Holmes. -Praise be to the Major for placing us under your care! - By the way, the major is not in control of the situation. He arrived only last night and did not have time to fully enter the course of affairs, although he had already begun to restore his own order here. Alas, excessive zeal will very soon create problems for him. -Are you about the order to keep outsiders out of the building? - Seems, I caught your train of thought, Mr.Holmes. Indeed, the major arrived last night and gave the order this morning. But since we share Moot Hall with the Maldonian police, outsiders will have to be admitted one way or another. It's just a matter of time. If the Forester had arrived earlier, there would have been problems with visitors by now. But they will not keep themselves waiting, and the major will have to cancel his order. I think it will happen today, towards evening. - Wonderful! You have correctly identified the direction of my thoughts. Only one minor addition: standing on the balcony, the major studied the surrounding landscape with curiosity, as something new to him. If he had been in Maldon for even a couple of days, the scenery would have bored Forester, and no interest would have been reflected on his face. However, this observation served as an additional confirmation of what I already was sure of. Now let's move on to the cause for which I am here. I ask you to state all his circumstances with the maximum accuracy. Any little thing can matter. -I understand, sir. The captain took out a box of Trikhnopil cigars: - Help yourself, gentlemen. Thanking, I took a cigar, and Holmes took out his pipe. The exchange of remarks between my friend and Captain Wallace gave me real pleasure. For once, Holmes managed to meet an army officer using the same method as himself! But I could not fail to notice that the captain, with Wallace's undoubted intelligence and powers of observation, answered slowly, after thinking carefully and choosing his words carefully. Holmes, on the other hand, threw his remarks effortlessly, without thinking for a moment. On the other hand, now Wallace, unlike Holmes and me, is barely thirty. One could hope that the captain still had everything ahead. - So, gentlemen, - Wallace hid behind a curtain of fragrant smoke in embarrassment, -this thing seems to me extremely strange. The very fact that the twelve combat tripods of the Martians were stopped and partially destroyed in a completely incomprehensible way is worthy of the closest attention. After examining the place of the battle, I at first assumed that an extremely powerful weapon unknown to us was used against the Martians. But a number of circumstances, as well as some very strange finds attached to material evidence, hint at the supernatural background of the Moldonian events. However, judge for yourself. 3. Witch that twelve combat tripods of the Martians were stopped and partially destroyed in a completely incomprehensible way, is worthy of the closest attention. After examining the place of the battle, I at first assumed that an extremely powerful weapon unknown to us was used against the Martians. But a number of circumstances, as well as some very strange finds attached to material evidence, hint at the supernatural background of the Moldonian events. However, judge for yourself. 3. Witch that twelve combat tripods of the Martians were stopped and partially destroyed in a completely incomprehensible way, is worthy of the closest attention. After examining the place of the battle, I at first assumed that an extremely powerful weapon unknown to us was used against the Martians. But a number of circumstances, as well as some very strange finds attached to material evidence, hint at the supernatural background of the Moldonian events. However, judge for yourself. 3. Witch. 
- Witch! Witch! Tom looked back. Mrs. Trelawney hurried over to him. Mrs. Trelawney was an emancipant. Tom didn't know who the Emancipantes were, but he heard that they wanted to play cricket, drive piles, and sit in Parliament. Tom had no opinion about parliament and cricket, and with Mrs. Trelawney's build, piles could be hammered with one left without asking for separate permission. The wife of an ironmonger, a timid and frail little man, the mother of three children deprived of the right to vote in the cradle, Anna Trelawney took complete power in the family. As a rule, she wore a white blouse, complete with a skirt and a dark wool jacket - a suit that Mrs. Trelawney proudly called "liberty". But today, the mouthpiece of freedom, for no apparent reason, changed old habits and undressed as if for a holiday. Summer walking dress made of rep, trimmed with machine-made Bedford lace, complemented by an umbrella and a hat that looked like a flowering rosehip bush. - Witch! Tom, my friend, you told them that Mrs. Liggins is a witch! Radcliffe's friends were enrolled for the first time. Usually, to Mrs. Trelawney, he was "that bully." -I - began Tom. But Mrs. Trelawny, guessing from Radcliffe's expression that the loader had not fulfilled the most important of the tasks of the present, had already lost all interest in Tom. -And you, Mr.Lennon? - The driver spat melancholy under the horse's hooves. The horse, seized with even greater melancholy, shifted from foot to foot and snorted. -You should be ashamed, Ms. Trelawny, - Tom tried to regain his composure. One day, Mrs. Trelawney, using an umbrella, firmly hammered into his head that she should be addressed using the progressive word "Ms", and not the retrograde "Mrs." Since then, Radcliffe had had a hard time remembering exactly how to call Mrs. - ugh! - Ms. Trelawney. - To me? Oh you brute! Oppressor! - Witch? How interesting! Allow me to introduce myself, dear Ms. Trelawny: Sherlock Holmes. I'd love to hear from you about Mrs. Liggins' witchcraft. Tom did not notice when Mr.Holmes, accompanied by the doctor and Captain Wallace, left the office. In any case, Radcliffe was damned delighted: the burden of conversation with a rabid emancipant now fell on the shoulders of educated gentlemen, freeing the unfortunate loader. Stepping aside, he sighed, feeling stupid. Here Mr.Holmes, for example, remembered the appeal "miz" from the first time. That's what a gentleman is for, to remember everything without a beating. - You! Ms. Trelawney's umbrella glared at Holmes. -Big shot from London! - -From Sussex, - said Holmes, smiling sweetly. - You came to sniff? Well, I'll give you a good track! -Witch, - the doctor intervened. - Do you have proof? -I have enough evidence for a death sentence! - Ms. Trelawney seemed to have forgotten that Mrs. Liggins was already out of the jurisdiction of earthly courts. Do you know where we'll start? From the most expensive thing in the world! From our children! Tom noticed how Mr.Holmes shuddered. According to the doctor, the amazing beekeeper loved children so much that this topic was extremely painful for him. -She told my John Lazy Lawrence was coming for him! - And all because of some lousy shilling that Johnny allegedly stole from her. Can you imagine? Lazy Lawrence! - He came? Holmes took out a notebook and a pencil. -I mean, Lazy Lawrence? - - Yes! He turned into a colt and chased my poor Johnny around the garden for half an hour. We found him lying under a cherry tree, completely exhausted! - Foal? - Johnny! And little Peg? That witch threatened her with Harrow-Teeth! - Without a reason? - Of course! True, it was about laundry torn from a rope and dropped into the mud, but little Peg had nothing to do with it. Trust me! A child is not prone to violent pranks and pranks. - Let's return to Teeth-like-Harrow. I hope your daughter is alive and well? - God bless! But she lost sleep. It seems to her that at night they howl from behind the door. - Articulate? - Quite! -What exactly is the whine from behind the door, Ms. Trelawney? - -Bring it to me! I will feed her ashes and sour milk! - Peg states that the creature hides in a closet under the stairs during the day. I checked, there is no one there. But that doesn't mean anything! She is a witch, I tell you! Do you know what her name is? - Creature? You said it yourself: Teeth-like-a-harrow. - Mrs. Ligins! - called Tom corrected in an undertone. - They say about the dead: "they called". - Molly! Ms. Trelawney ignored the porter's remark. - Ha! What is Molly like? I found out: she is Melchiora! Well, is there such a Christian name - Melchiora ?! So Vicar Simpson says -Yes, - objected Holmes, taking notes. - That was the name of one of the three wise men who came to bow to the baby Jesus. This is mentioned by Bede the Venerable, author of the Ecclesiastical History of the Angles. However, I have never heard of the female form of this name. The umbrella rose to the sky: -I don't know what your trouble wrote there, - the emancipant's hat was knocked back on the back of her head, the top button of her blouse was about to fly off, -but a decent woman cannot be called Melchior! - For the happiness and well-being of our children -Thank you, Ms. Trelawny. You helped us a lot. - To you? Hope, you don't mean that martinet Wallace, and even more so the rude loader? -I mean my friend Dr.Watson. - Doctor! said Ms. Trelawney. Doctor, my ear itches all the time! What is it for? - Which? the doctor asked sternly. - Left. - Gossip. And Dr.Watson went to the chaise. -Pay attention, dear friend, - Holmes told him, taking a seat beside him. - Everyone already knows about my arrival in Maldon, and about the purpose of this visit. If only someone could learn from our valiant intelligence. - Magi, - the doctor suddenly remembered. -One was called Melchior, like poor Mrs. Liggins. What were the others' names, Holmes? -Caspar, - Holmes replied without a moment's hesitation. And Balthazar. As he patted himself side by side with the driver, Tom remembered something. -Balthazar, - he repeated. -Mr.Liggins' name was Balthazar. "Is that right, young man?" - Yes. 4.
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). On the way to the scene, I asked the driver to make a short detour to go to St. Peter's Hospital. I had to warn Hawkins and McCormack that they would have to manage without me in the coming days. At the station, Captain Wallace, at the request of Holmes, sent a messenger soldier with a letter for Mr.Eastwick, so that our assistant Thomas Radcliffe would not be dismissed for absenteeism. There was no doubt that Mr.Eastwick would be sympathetic to the urgent request of the Directorate of Military Intelligence, which urgently needed one of its employees. All the previous six days I spent in the hospital without getting out, operating until late at night, washing the wounds and making dressings. Only for three or four hours did I return to the rented room across the road to sleep and recuperate. That's why I couldn't see what's going on in the city. The Martians are repulsed, Mauldon is not in danger - that's all I've heard from colleagues and patients. I even dined at the hospital, mostly what kind Mrs. Hawkins brought us. This morning I was completely busy with the dispatch of the wounded, and after that with a conversation with Holmes. Now I was looking around with interest, asking the driver to lower back the folding leather top of our britzka. There were a lot of people on the streets - but still not compared with the crowds that flooded the city on the day when my wife and I made our way to the shore of the Wyrley Channel. The stormy stream of refugees pouring out of London has dwindled to the size of a brisk spring stream. The danger from the Martians still lingered, but faded behind the London mists, passing from a region of momentary mortal threat to a region of ominous but abstract disaster, from which to stay away. There was no more panic among the refugees. Wagons and pedestrians moved purposefully towards the sea, without the previous desperate haste. This was facilitated by the constable erected at the crossroads, filled with the importance of the mission entrusted to him. He showed the refugees the way and helped with advice on how best to get to the marinas. Even the bronze figure of Earl Britnoth, green with time, with a sword raised to the heavens, noticeably lost in comparison with a worthy guardian of order. The contrast between the peaceful life returning to Maldon and the remnants of recent battles was striking. Just now the wheels of the chaise were clattering on the cobblestones of the cleanly swept Fembridge Road: two-story red-brick houses, lovingly trimmed lawns and front gardens. And already at the corner, soldiers and firemen are sorting out the charred ruins, and the unfortunate victims of the fire and their relatives mournfully froze nearby. In front of them, on a piece of shabby canvas, the belongings that survived under the ruins are carefully laid out. The heat beam swept through the city, describing an intricate curve. He spared some buildings and ruthlessly destroyed others. It is unlikely that there was any system in the movement of the beam. Most likely, the Martian who released it burned buildings for no specific purpose: for wit or just having fun. As a result, part of the streets was not damaged, in some places individual houses collapsed, and in some places I saw solid ashes. At last our chaise turned onto Mermaid Way and stopped ten yards from the intersection with Oak Close. The ruins of the corner house were surrounded by pegs with a red ribbon stretched over them. Inside this symbolic fence, six soldiers worked under the command of a corporal. By order of Captain Wallace, with the utmost care they cleared the blockage of beams, in places turned to coal, and broken bricks - all that was left of the unfortunate Liggins' house. Holmes, oddly enough, was not interested in the ruins. He climbed out of the chaise and walked resolutely down Mermaid Way. Literally two houses later the city ended; beyond the road were fields that stretched for miles. Without crossing the road, my friend stopped, studying something in the southeast. I approached and, standing beside him, followed Holmes' gaze. At a distance of about a mile in the middle of a wide field rose five Martian tripods. For the first time since the memorable battle that I witnessed, I had the opportunity to properly examine these terrible and amazing machines. Their strangeness was immediately evident. A chill ran down my spine, despite the hot June day. I froze, unable to take my eyes off the tripods, struck by the frozen perfection and deadly expediency of the mechanisms. The three vehicles appeared unharmed, their armor gleaming brightly in the sun. Another one was blackened and charred, and the last one had faded, having lost its metallic luster, and looked more like a stone statue. -A very irrational construction, - Holmes broke the silence. -I was just thinking how perfect they are, - I said in confusion. - What is irrational about them, Holmes? - Way to travel. No, the whole idea of ​​using mechanical legs instead of wheels is great! But why three legs? Why not four, like most animals? Not six like insects? Not eight, like spiders or the same octopuses, which, according to the newspapers, similar to martians? Nature knowingly endowed its creations with symmetry and an even number of limbs. Moving on three legs is alien to her. It seems to me that these machines should move like one-legged cripples on crutches. He thought, and I, fearing to confuse Holmes, did not say that I saw how the Martians were moving. And that their movement least of all resembles the steps of a cripple on crutches. -However, I can be wrong, - said my friend, coming out of his reverie. -I wish I could see their cars in motion! - This was all Holmes. The subject of interest could completely absorb his sophisticated mind. At the same time, he did not want to know what a mortal danger the current Martian tripod poses! -Perhaps driving a walking machine with more legs is too difficult, - Holmes muttered meanwhile, talking to himself. -That's why they chose the three-legged structure - He paused, took one last look at the tripods frozen in the field, and spun around. -But we have better things to do, - he said in a different tone. "Let's go to the scene." After contemplating the Martian mechanisms, Holmes was seized by an attack of active activity - similar outbreaks inherent in my friend, I had the opportunity to observe more than once. As it turned out, Tom lived very close - he pointed out to us his hut, visible at the end of the alley. Holmes sent him to go around the surrounding houses in order to find out which of the neighbors were at home now, and ask them not to go anywhere in the next hour. He sent me to walk along the Oak Close, fixing all the destruction that I come across along the way. First of all - caused by fire, as well as everything else that seems unusual or simply noteworthy to me. Holmes himself resolutely stepped over the barrier tape, showed the corporal the paper received from Captain Wallace - and a minute later he was already prowling around the ruins, vividly resembling a bloodhound in search of a lost track. I did not overestimate my abilities. I will never compare with Holmes in observation and the ability to draw conclusions. Most likely, my friend gave me this assignment just so that I would not feel superfluous. However, I was determined to follow Holmes' instructions exactly. I walked slowly, carefully examining the surviving buildings. Three stone houses were followed by two wooden ones; at the end of the alley, in a dead end, stood the hut of our friend Tom. No matter how hard I tried, I did not find any signs of fire and destruction, and turned back, moving along the opposite side of the street. A piece of paper was white in the grass by the fence. I immediately remembered Captain Wallace's story. According to him, the Martians near Maldon were stopped in a completely inexplicable way. Rather, in various inexplicable ways. Two or three tripods exploded as if hit by artillery shells. Lightning struck one from a clear sky. Another crumbled to dust, eaten through with rust in a matter of seconds. Three burned and melted the fiery wall. Where she came from, no one knew. Some mechanism, as if by magic, turned to stone. The rest looked intact, but the Martians who sat in them died. Heaps of ashes, a puddle of foul-smelling slime - all that remains of the invaders. The source of the power that struck the Martians was known - a shining cocoon that floated above the houses. The cocoon allegedly contained the girl Jenny, the niece of the dead Liggins. The cocoon could not be a hallucination - it was observed by dozens, if not hundreds of people. I myself saw him from afar, from the shore of the Wyrley Channel. An optical phenomenon, like a mirage in the desert? Whatever one may say, Jenny was involved in what happened. Sooner or later Holmes will have to talk to her, no matter how much my friend puts off this conversation. Witnesses, in particular, Thomas Radcliffe, claimed that Jenny was clutching a burnt piece of paper in her fist. A trifle that does not deserve attention against the backdrop of what happened? However, Captain Wallace felt it necessary to report the leaflet to his superiors. The leaflet so interested Mycroft Holmes, whose mind was not inferior to that of his younger brother in the skill of drawing conclusions, that the telegram from Mycroft read: -The key is an orphan girl. A page from a book." What is in this sheet? I bent down and, with fingers trembling with excitement, picked up the crumpled paper. It turned out to be a snippet from the London Daily Telegraph a month ago. It is unlikely that the Directorate of Military Intelligence was so persistently looking for him, calling on Sherlock Holmes for help! However, I brushed the dirt off the newspaper and folded it neatly and tucked it into my pocket. I didn't find anything else worth mentioning. Holmes, as it turned out, had already finished his inspection of the ruins and was now talking with the corporal. Noticing my approach, he waved his hand at me, inviting me to join. In response to Holmes' questioning look, I just shook my head. -Don't worry, my friend. A negative result is also a result. He, by the way, confirms my assumptions, so you did not walk around Oak Close in vain. Sorry, corporal, it's me not you. Please continue. Glancing at me, the corporal continued: -. I say: there is nothing. Should be, but no. Here the neighbors come they ask: found, they say? Books? They are interested, you know! The Liggins, they say, had books - like cartridges in a warehouse in Clacton! In all of Maldon, only the Plume Library has more books than they have. I mean, it was. And now - no. See for yourself... The corporal pointed to the finds neatly laid out near the surviving brick fence. Fragments of porcelain figurines, a bronze ink set, two broken lamps, shaving accessories, the remains of a tea set, a dozen silver spoons, a broken bookcase, two crumpled buckets, a pile of burnt clothes - a mix of men's and women's. "Fire," I reminded. - Books burn well. -They are on fire, - Holmes nodded. But they never completely burn out. The Liggins, I understand, had old tomes. In leather and even wooden bindings. With metal staples, clasps. Where is all this? At least the scorched remains? Ashes in the end? Corporal is right. Either the neighbors are lying unanimously, which is unlikely, or the Liggins' home library has miraculously disappeared. I emphasize: it didn't burn out, but it disappeared! He turned back to the corporal: - Thank you, you have reported really valuable information. Perhaps you noticed something else strange? Unusual? -How can I tell you, sir - the corporal hesitated. - Tell it like it is. I will not laugh at you or accuse you of lying. If only you knew what incredible stories I've heard, and even taken part in some... - Your will, sir. It's not clean here, with this house. Still nothing during the day, but when, God forbid, we guard at night. Captain Wallace, after all, as ordered? Guard day and night! A matter of national importance! -Very thoughtful of the captain. - It's something of course, yes, - the corporal picked the dry earth with the toe of his boot. -It only happens at night, sir! - I was on guard yesterday. Oh, I've been through! When the ruins began to glow - it's still okay. They glow, and God bless them - like rotten trees in the forest. But when they showed up... - Who? The corporal hesitated, gathering his courage. He took a deep breath, as before jumping into the water, and finally decided: - Ghosts! - Are you sure? "I swear to you, sir, I'm not lying!" And he didn't drink a drop. It would be better if I drank. - Like ghosts? Sherlock Holmes asked with all possible seriousness. -Not just marauders? - The thieves? - Why can't I tell a ghost from a thief?! - the corporal was offended. What kind of thieves are they? They are not just thieves, but masters! Clothes, however, are out of date. Raincoats are long, to the ground - they wore them two hundred years ago, I saw them in the picture. And hats. The corporal depicted with his hands something tall, pointed, with wide margins. And you can see right through them! And the bullets won't take them! - What did you check? The corporal was embarrassed: - Well, yes. The first time I saw it, I fired in fright. Well, I'm on duty, I have a revolver with me. I may not be the best shooter, but I can't miss a man from five yards! And to him - at least that. Didn't even pay attention. This is where she showed up. Let's scour the ruins together - they are looking, that means. - And you? - I'm sitting behind the bushes, trembling. Teeth chatter in fear. You can't run away - I'm on duty. And there is no urine to sit. Nothing, I sat out. And how they disappeared, closer to dawn - and did not notice. They were there just a moment ago, and now there is no one... He paused, looking away, and then resolutely stared directly into Holmes' eyes: - And you know what I'll tell you, sir? Do not listen to what you will rivet on them! They are good people. Alive, ghosts are good. I shot at them but they didn't touch me, they didn't do anything wrong. -So you recognized them? - Judging by the tone in which my friend asked the question, he already knew the answer. - Of course! corporal confirmed. - How not to know? The dead Liggins were Balthazar and Molly.
Sideshow Magic requires sacrifice. 
- You're an idiot, Bullfinch! You're a cretin with a certificate... Tyunya hissed like an angry viper. A minute earlier, she was sitting on the couch, at the feet of the resourceful Anna Igorevna, and trawling the Internet with my tablet - and now thunder and lightning, and all Egyptian executions. - Quiet! I warned. Baba Fima hung out washed linen in the bathroom. It seems that she was convinced that no encroachments on the honor of her precious Nyurka were foreseen, and we would not steal silverware either. Such trust was costly, too expensive to be destroyed by an occasional scandal. -Back to the idiots, - I stood at the window. - What's next? - Where are you driving? What apiary? Which Sussex?! Sherlock Holmes only moved to Sussex in 1903, if not 904! And in 900, she and Watson are sitting in London, on Baker Street. The case of the six busts of Napoleon, understand? - So what? I yawned. - And the fact that Watson is a widower! The first wife died about six years ago, he marries the second later. You pile up a blunder on a blunder! We'll never get out of this shit! -Quiet, my child The tea is cold. However, I loved this cold one. -You are corrupted by the internet, Nederese. Internet and its meticulous readers. All the evidence you drive me into a corner - spit and grind. At best, jump out to the forum and shower me with banana skins. Yes, overlays. And what? - What do you want? - I? For the program to get onto the "War of the Worlds" highway. - And for this you bring down the reliability? Have you read The White Company? -N-no, - Tyunya was taken aback. - A chivalric dilogy by Conan Doyle. Two novels, between which a quarter of a century passes, if not more. Sir Nigel, in the first novel, goes on a hike on a horse named Pommers. And in the second - on the same horse named Pommers. Are you not embarrassed by a long-lived war horse? By the way, in the second novel, Sir Nigel does not recognize when he meets his faithful servant and comrade-in-arms, who has accompanied him for many years. Can you imagine? Don Quixote doesn't recognize Sancho Panza! It would be possible to write off the blunder on the short-sightedness of the knight. But he must remember the archer's first and last name for sure. - Horse, - Tyunya returned to the sofa. Horses don't live that long. - Exactly. Moreover, this horse is either nightingale or black. A mutant chameleon, an incognito prince from Mars. Baby, I'm not feeding the whole text to the program. I feed it with excerpts, key episodes. Then she fights on her own. And the fact that she pecks from my palm is characteristic of the work of Wells and Conan Doyle. They wrote like that, not caring too much about petty facts. This did not interfere with either readers or critics, God bless them. I give the program a vitamin of freedom, I disaccustom to cling to trifles. If I were you, I would pray to Isidore of Seville, the patron saint of the Internet, for something completely different. - About what? -Magic, baby. Magic stolen from you. - Bullfinch! - It's elementary, Tyunya. You are not the only one connected to the Internet. Nyurkin's car - too. The program, not wanting to exit "by emergency", creates a consistent version. I hint to her that petty contradictions don't count. So far, she is drawing all the juices from the stories about Sherlock Holmes. But magic takes its toll. Soon the program will start pulling up the magic fact. I'm surprised it hasn't started yet. And then, Tyunya, hold on! Are you still praying to Isidore of Seville? I don't know how the saint, but the devil definitely heard me. The printer buzzed, a sheet of printout crawled out of it, rustling. - What is there? Tyunya asked in a whisper. "Girl," I answered grimly. There was indeed a girl in the picture. A fair-haired baby, in her right hand she held an ancient lantern. The lantern looked heavy, like the sins of the world, but the girl coped with it without difficulty. Behind the girl, the street of the old town opened up: a cobblestone pavement, houses with turrets and signboards. The street was drowning in the diluted ink of the evening. The wall of the nearest house was brightly illuminated by a lantern. The devil was in the details: the girl's smile was startling, and the shadow that the cute child cast on the wall was ten feet tall, with wings and horns. I knew a book whose illustration was dragged off by the program and adapted to the distorted "War of the Worlds". However, the source didn't matter. What's the difference now? Remember the devil, he is on the threshold. -Magic, - Tyunya whispered doomedly. - Fantasy. -Mystic, - I corrected. - Still a mystic. Shadow on the wall and all. Mystic - fear not named. Let's hope this is the end of the matter. As if to protest, the printer buzzed again.
- Bring it to me! I will feed her ashes and sour milk! - Peg states that the creature hides in a closet under the stairs during the day. I checked, there is no one there. But that doesn't mean anything! She is a witch, I tell you! Do you know what her name is? - Creature? You said it yourself: Teeth-like-a-harrow...
- Search, - I ordered Tuna. Those teeth will pop up somewhere. Nodding, Tyunya took up the tablet. There was nothing on the new printout but a bit about a witch. Plus one more line: "Mr.Liggins' name was Balthazar." To be honest, I didn't like the new Balthazar much more than Harrow-Teeth. Intuition suggested that surprises should be expected from him. I slightly opened the door leading from room 6, as I silently called Nyurka's room, to the living room. On the balcony, demonstrating the dexterity of the rhesus monkey, Baba Fima jumped from stool to stool. She despised the frost: the balcony was glazed, but winter is winter. The space went white before our eyes, devoured by pillowcases, sheets and duvet covers. The frail figure of Baba Fima darted about in this whiteness, like a ghost from Vazastan - creepy, but cute. And I thought that she was scurrying in the bathroom. Well, yes, where in the bathroom to hang so much goodness? -Superstition, - Tyunya said behind my back. The speed of her search has always awed me. - "Superstitions of Victorian England", Natalia Kharsa, Ekaterina Couty. Centerpolygraph, 2011. Here you have Harrow Teeth, and Lazy Lawrence, and Nell Longarm. And closets under the stairs full of gnawed bones. -Superstition, - I thought. - It's still nothing. - Why? - Because the book, consider it a documentary. The Verbalife program is not a creator, my joy. Not even a master - so, apprentice, give and take. It is not given to create fundamentally new entities. In the event of a conflict, it can only support credibility with anything. The trouble lies elsewhere - having propped up one thing, our beauty is very soon forced to prop up the prop itself. Snowball effect... - Bullfinch, and Bullfinch... Where are you looking? - There, - I abstractly waved my hand. - And what do you see? - Stone, Tyunya. Crossroads, and on it - a stone. Below - green moss, at the top - a raven. And on that stone it is written. Tyunya sighed: - If you go to the left, you will lose your horse. If you go to the right, you will be married. You'll go straight - you'll lose your head. I remembered another, epic version: -How to go straight - I live not to be, to go to the right - to be married, to go to the left - to be rich. - I also remembered a later, fabulous version: -If you go to the left, you will lose your horse, you will save yourself; you go to the right - you will lose yourself, you will save the horse; If you go straight, you will lose both yourself and your horse. - It's funny how "to be married" allegorically transformed into "you will lose yourself, you will save the horse". Wise people, you will not take away. -So it is with us, - Tyunya thought aloud. - If you go to the left, you will go to the -War of the Worlds. Magic - to the nail, in the sense, to a minimum. And correctly we close under the fanfare. You'll go straight... I turned to her: -. you'll lose your head. Correct closing is impossible, we turn off in an emergency. That's for sure: you will lose your head! Do you know that Baba Fima wanted to cut the plugs? - Bullfinch! You are hero! You didn't let me, did you? Tyunya broke off, realizing that she was talking nonsense. If I had allowed it, the effect would have been immediately noticeable. -You'll lose your head, - she muttered guiltily. Is that better than being killed? In our case, it's definitely better. I understood her perfectly. The program had a strict ban on the death of a character with whom the client identified himself. This served as a pretext for eternal demonstrations on the network - quasi-suicidal, rabid hamsters, demanded that they be provided with the freedom of literary suicides. We called them "infringers". Danko, tearing out his own heart, Hamlet in the foreground, d'Artagnan with a marshal's baton in his hands, Kolobok, dancing on the fox's nose - a list of objects of particular value to the infringed, numbered in the hundreds. The -lose your head - option was much more real, and most importantly, outwardly harmless. It was not in vain that I got excited when Baba Fima mentioned traffic jams. If she cut off the electricity, Nyurka would really come to her senses. After that, the grandmother would inevitably throw a scandal at us - the granddaughter is alive and well, there is no migraine, and we, the fucking rescuers, are making a fuss! Probably, a complaint would have dashed off, a squabbler - it would have happened to Serafima Petrovna. Go and explain to your grandmother, granddaughter and bug that the consequences of the "emergency exit" do not appear immediately, and in the "carnival", using the turnovers of our psychologists, a form.. a decent middle-aged lady is running along the subway escalator. Mink coat, stiletto boots. How she manages not to break her legs is a mystery. "Dirty elves! - shouts a decent lady. -Lasers to starboard! - The face is red, tears of delight blur the makeup. At the very threshold, the lady still falls. They pick her up, take her to the tray where they sell batteries. The lady apologizes, says she can go. Thanks for the help. No elves, no lasers - complete sanity and decency. About what happened a minute ago, the lady does not remember..the reception room of the dental office. The tall guy waiting his turn gets up. "You! he says to the nurse who is registering. Do you think you fooled everyone? Do you think she drowned herself, and the ends are in the water? Ophelia, you are a witch! The nurse is confused. "Witch! The guy smirks wryly. - You ruined the centurion's lady! You dance with mermaids in the moonlight! - When he pulls out a jackknife, the nurse squeals. The guy opens the knife, closes it, sits down and waits for his turn. Tell him about the witch-Ophelia, who ruined the lady - he will be surprised. When and where a decent lady with a tall guy will again fly off the coils - God knows. At home? on the street? in the supermarket? As Lyudmila Gurchenko sang in the old film "Shadow": "Don't lose your head!"
- Left, - I say. - We go to the left, Tyunya. - I would like. And if it's straight? - Then turn right. We will be married! Joy in my voice - even load cars. I am a bad actor. Cardboard wagons, composition with fake Christmas tree decorations. The -right - option - I don't even want to discuss this hemorrhoids now. -Bullfinch, but Bullfinch, - Tyunya says in a whisper. -Is it true that you were a knight? - - Shmytsar. - Yah you! They say there was such an order. Order of the Holy Bestseller. There was an order, and you were a knight. Not now, right? - What an order, Nederese! Look out the window... - I'm looking. You're lying, you just don't want to confess. Bullfinch, why don't I know anything about the order? - Did not come out in circulation. - You always have jokes. The printer interrupts us. This laser beast has already firmly entered the situation, considering itself a full-fledged participant in the process. However, that's the way it is. The printer is the only window in the -rastuda, where the program fights with the magic virus for the correct closure. On the leaf is a tentacle. A fleshy tentacle with suckers. -Martian, - Tyunya exhales with relief. -The Wellsian Martians were with those— - -Not with those, - I object. - Bullfinch! Well, what are you forever. The printer throws out another illustration. Judging by the inscription below - "Interior illustration to HG Wells' novel "War of the Worlds" from reprinting in "Amazing Stories", August 1927" - this is the cover for the magazine reissue. The Martians lie side by side, dead or near death. Their tentacles - as thin as the antennae of insects - are spread out on the floor. And the alien invaders themselves are more like larvae than octopuses. Around - collapsed tripods. -Hero of Wells. - I think I'm right. I don't want to check, - I assumed that the tentacles of the Martians are hands, similar to human, only mutated in the course of evolution. Where are the suction cups on such tentacles? - Fingers? - Tyunya persists. - Hardly. I don't like this picture... - You're a reinsurer, Bullfinch. Well, tentacle. Well, with suckers. The sea animal is an octopus, and all things. What is the magic here? I am silent. Chapter Four The Million Dollar Conversation. 
1. I want to go home. 
From Dr.Watson's Notes Holmes took a little over an hour to interview the neighbors. Thanks to Tom, we saved time by not going into those houses whose owners were absent. This time my friend's questions were not varied. Holmes performed routine, but, alas, necessary work. -Did you see the destruction of the Liggins house? - Did you watch from here? From this window? Allow me. Indeed, everything is in full view. And what did you see? Did it really explode? It didn't catch fire and collapse, but it exploded? Amazing! I mean, of course, I meant "very unfortunate." And what happened next? Yes, I understood everything: a luminous cocoon, and in it - Jenny. No, I believe you. This was seen by dozens of people. Continue, I beg you. So, just stood there and cried? Did she see her relatives die? Remind me what their names were? Silas and Martha? Are you sure? Ah, so after all, Balthazar and Melchior? Did you happen to notice Jenny was holding something in her hands? A piece of paper? Pure or with text? Like a page from a book? Very good. Was the paper in Jenny's hand when Tom took it away? Thank you. You helped us a lot. And so - over and over again, with slight variations. I did not notice any particular discrepancies in the testimony of neighbors. Some remembered the paper in Jenny's hand, some did not. Someone came out of hiding when it was all over and didn't really see anything. However, Holmes, oddly enough, looked pleased. What conclusions my friend was able to draw from these stories, one could only guess. However, I had no doubt that sooner or later Holmes would share his conclusions with me. "Let's go to Jenny's," he announced with a heavy sigh as the door of the last house on the Oak Close closed behind us. It's time to talk to the girl. The need to question the poor child did not please Holmes in the least. However, we were left with no choice: all the threads of this mysterious case converged on Jenny. Vicar Simpson's house, which we passed in the morning, was on Church Street, almost opposite St. Mary's. We got there by five o'clock in the afternoon. The vicar was in the church. The door was opened to us by an old woman with a surprisingly disposing face. Dressed in a house dress made of fine wool, with frills and a lace collar, in an old-fashioned cap, she looked like a kind grandmother from a children's fairy tale. Holmes pushed our new assistant forward ahead of time. Hesitating and stammering with embarrassment, he introduced Mrs. Priestley "gentlemen from London who want to ask Jenny a couple of questions." The housekeeper frowned, instantly losing all good nature, and resolutely barred the door. -Walking and walking, - she muttered, looking past us. -They haunt poor Jenny! She already suffered so much - God forbid! She remained a complete orphan, and they all go and ask, and Jenny is getting worse and worse, she would have to see a doctor, and they. Here our assistant showed unexpected quick wits, screwing in the place:-  This gentleman is just a doctor! Mrs. Priestley looked at me with obvious suspicion, but, it seemed to me, with hope. I raised my hat: - Dr.Watson, at your service. "Will you examine the poor child?" - the housekeeper changed her anger to mercy. - Well, of course! - Take a seat at the table. I'll bring Jenny. She hid in the house, and we settled down at a wooden table under the apple trees. First, Mrs. Priestley brought us three steamed mugs of homemade cider - last year's apples from the branches obviously went into it, hanging over our heads - and only then led the girl out into the garden. At first glance, there was nothing special about her: a child of about seven in a modest blue dress and red shoes knocked down at the toes. Her blond hair was neatly styled by Mrs. Priestley's caring hands. Jenny avoided looking at us, and I understood her: the Liggins' niece had not yet recovered from a severe shock, and here were strangers. As the widow so aptly put it: "They haunt the poor thing..." - This is a doctor, he will definitely help you! You want to be healthy, don't you? Only the doctor needs to examine you first. Don't be afraid, it doesn't hurt... - Don't! Jenny tossed her head. - You don't have to look at me. - Why? - I don't want! I'm not sick. - What do you want? Jenny? I stopped Mrs. Priestley, who was about to intervene, with a gesture, and, squatting down, looked into the girl's face. -I want to go home, - she whispered in a barely audible voice. - Home? I'm sorry, but the Liggins' house has been destroyed. - I don't want to go there. I want to go home. - In the house where you lived with your dad and mom? - No. You can't go there. "But where do you want to go?" Where is your home? The girl was silent. I noticed that the corner of her mouth was twitching arrhythmically - an undoubted sign of an experienced nervous shock. A strange expression froze on Jenny's face - it seemed that the little one could not decide in any way whether to smile at her or burst into tears. Alas, I have little understanding of nervous disorders, especially in children. But there was still something I could do. -Jenny, - I said, as gently as I could. Come on, you help me, and I will try to help you. Fine? - Fine. - That's agreed. Now I will listen how you breathe, whether you have a cold. Will you tell me... Mrs. Priestley, would you please bring me a clean teaspoon. - In my house, all the spoons are clean! - the housekeeper proudly proceeded into the house. Holmes immediately whispered, leaning to my ear: - Watson, ask her about everything that happened at Oak Close! You can do it better. What did she do, what did she remember. And a leaf! Don't forget the sheet. And I'll distract Mrs. Priestley so that she doesn't interfere. I nodded and took out a stethoscope, since the last few days I always had it with me, like a loaded revolver. A funny combination, if you think about it. But at that moment I was not up to irony. Breathe, Jenny. Deeper. Now don't breathe... Everything was fine with the girl's lungs and bronchi, there were no characteristic noises and wheezing. That Jenny is physically healthy, I could say without any examination - my medical experience was enough for this in abundance. But we doctors have our little tricks. If the patient is distracted by an examination, he usually answers questions without thinking, and becomes much more talkative. I have already used this trick in practice, including in relation to children. -. breathe calmly, slowly. That's it, good. Where were you when the fire happened? - I played in the yard. - Played? Great. Breathe deeply. And what happened next? - And then. How it rumbles! It's scary... - It's all right, Jenny. Do you know what rumbled? You're a big girl... - These are guns, I know. I already heard. - Where? When? - Earlier. And here is our house... Well, not ours, but Aunt Martha and Uncle Silas... - Your aunt and uncle were called Martha and Silas? - Oh! I meant to say: Aunt Molly and Uncle Bat Bart Uncle Balthazar. The whole house caught fire like a fire! Breathe easy, Jenny. Nothing to worry about. It's over, it won't happen again. Nothing threatens you. Imagine that you had a terrible dream. Presented? The girl thought for a moment, forgetting to breathe, and nodded. -Just a bad dream. Do you remember him? Tell me. I'm a doctor, you can tell me. Here's the spoon, doctor. -Thank you, Mrs. Priestley. -I beg your pardon, - Holmes delicately touched the housekeeper on the shoulder. "Could you give me a couple of minutes?" While Dr.Watson is examining Jenny, I would like to ask you. Holmes stepped onto the path leading through the garden around the house, turned to Mrs. Priestley - and after a short hesitation, she followed my friend. Their voices quickly became unintelligible and soon faded away. Only Tom remained with us, but he sat quieter than a mouse. The loader did not interfere in anything, only from time to time took up his mug of cider. How did you know it was a dream? Jenny suddenly asked. Frankly, I was confused and managed to squeeze out only: - Well, I'm a doctor! Fortunately, the girl was satisfied with the answer. - It was very hot in the dream. Everything was on fire. I started calling my aunt, then my uncle. They didn't answer. Then a piece of the book came to me. His wind brought, right into his hands. I thought: maybe it says what should I do? I read and read and couldn't read anything. And I can read. I can! The letters were like this... Jenny wiggled her fingers in an amazing way. And again, and again. The movements seemed vaguely familiar to me, but I could not understand what they meant. What were the letters, Jenny? - Well, such. - she almost cried, unable to find the right word. I wanted to reassure her, but Jenny suddenly beamed: - Wrong! Like arrows and houses! And then they became different. There were arrows and houses, but they became. - Have the letters on the sheet become different? - Yes! And did you manage to read them? - No. I mean, yes. They were still wrong, but I read them. Aloud. I read it and didn't understand anything! - That is, you could read the letters, but the words were unfamiliar? - Yes! Jenny rejoiced. - Don't you remember those words? -No, - Jenny was genuinely upset. I enjoyed watching my trick work. The girl did not just talk - her face turned pink, her eyes came to life, the corner of her mouth hardly twitched. The child excitedly recounted a terrible, but fascinating dream. - I read them, read them. And then everything around lit up! She lowered her gaze. What happened next, Jenny? I encouraged her. - In a dream? Everything around lit up - and? .. - I don't remember further. There were terrible spiders: iron, with three legs. They are big, big, and I look at them from above. Spiders are big, but small for me. It's because it's a dream, right? I wanted to drive them away with a broom. It's a pity there was no broom in the dream. Then I began to wave my hands at them and yell at them to leave. They are gone. Our neighbors came instead. Aunt Molly and Uncle Balthazar were gone. And our house... theirs... Was not at home. I started crying, Uncle Tom came and took me here. Jenny was silent. Is that all you remember? I asked carefully. - Yes. When will they take me home? -To take you home, you need to know where your house is, Jenny. I do not know. And Uncle Tom doesn't know. And Mrs. Priestley doesn't know. Where is your home, Jenny? The girl thought. Her mouth twitched again, and an expression appeared on her face that I had already seen. It seemed that she could not decide in any way: to smile at her or cry? I mentally cursed myself. ruin everything with one careless question! It seems that the question of the house is very painful for her. Jenny whispered something. - What? I leaned closer. - Please repeat. - Hartford. However, I was not completely sure that I heard the word correctly. 2. Perplexed Sherlock Holmes. 
They were waiting for them at the britzka. The little man, agile like mercury, is already exhausted. Waiting for such people is no worse. Having torn off the bowler hat, the little man did complex manipulations with it, after which he returned it to its place. - Mister Holmes! - the amazing visitor shouted, not waiting for Holmes and Watson to approach at a distance more convenient for a confidential conversation. - Dr.Watson! Lord, how glad I am to see you! Lord, I bring you good news! What is there! To hell with the news! I brought you a million! With whom do I have the honor? inquired the doctor, inclined to be suspicious. Watson's hand slipped to the pocket where the revolver was hidden. - Pfeiffer, Michael Pfeiffer! Have you heard of a million? - A million problems? - Million dollars! What do you say to that? -A dollar can be freely exchanged for gold and silver, - Holmes mused aloud. - No, I beg your pardon. from this year, by decision of the government of the United States of America - only for gold. Zero point ninety-four hundredths of a drachma to the dollar. In total, we get about three thousand six hundred and seventy-two pounds of precious metal. Do you have the gold in your bag, Mr.Pfeiffer? The little man grinned. -Are you kidding, sir? - From what? It is unlikely that you, an American, and therefore a pragmatist, crossed the Atlantic just to laugh at my jokes. Liner "RMS Oceanic", if I'm not mistaken? Ho-ho, Mr Holmes! Pfeiffer shook his finger at the detective. "You won't catch me on your hook!" And yet, how did you guess? Holmes shrugged his shoulders imperturbably: -A man like you could only sail on the largest steamer in the world. "Oceanic" surpasses even the famous "Great Eastern" in length. True, you sailed second class. It's democratic, I approve. - You have a luggage sticker, Dr.Watson explained. - On a bag. With the name of the ship. It's already getting dark, but it's shiny and the text is easy to read. - Bravo! Now that you've explained everything... Stop! How did you know I'm American?! Kettle, huh? Bowler hat like Butch Cassidy? Or my accent? - Button down collar. For us Englishmen, this is an unforgivable license. Although, as a doctor, I have always argued that tight hook-and-eye collars are extremely unhealthy. And then a pink shirt. These are worn in France, and even in the States. Brooks Brothers, if I'm not mistaken? Holmes looked in amazement at his faithful friend: - Watson! I don't recognize you. -Yes, - the doctor replied modestly. - I'm a dandy. And your humble biographer. The sun hung over the distant hills: a crimson ball of wool. The aroma of blooming gorse rolled over the silent Maldon in waves. From vicar simpson's garden, counterpoint to the gorse, the sweet smell of nasturtiums and withering rhododendrons wafted through. The driver dozed on the irradiation, every second risking falling to the ground and breaking his neck. Having thrust its muzzle into a sack suspended from its neck, the horse quietly crunched the oats. Next to the horse, fearing more than anything that he would be thanked and told to go away, stood Tom Radcliffe. The porter was dying to look somewhere, to see something, and to immediately guess something. - So, - throwing the bag into the britzka, Mr.Pfeiffer bowed jokingly, - let's start from the beginning. Michael Pfeiffer, Cinematographer! At your service, gentlemen! I have the pleasure of representing the interests of the American Mutoscope and Biograph Company. My friend Arthur Marvin filmed a film called "Puzzled Sherlock Holmes" in a New York studio. Before the film is released to the general public, my bosses would like to resolve the issue of rights. You, Mr.Holmes, as the prototype of the hero, and you, Dr.Watson, as the author of many stories about Mr.Holmes. I will note without false modesty that it was I who persuaded the boss to include you in the contract, doctor! The plot of the film has nothing to do with your stories, and the boss at first categorically objected to your participation. - Mutoscope - the doctor became gloomy. What is this infection? -A device for individual viewing, - Holmes explained ahead of the cinematographer. - Film frames are printed on flexible cards and placed on a circular core. The viewer manually rotates the rod, the cards are illuminated by electric lamps according to the Henry Marvin system. By the way, Mr.Pfeiffer, is this a relative of your friend Arthur? -Brother, - Pfeiffer agreed. - Brother. So you're saying the movie has already been made? - Completely. But we are planning a continuation. - Removed, but did not go on sale. Copyright? I appreciate such scrupulousness, Mr.Pfeiffer. But I'm not ready to sign any kind of contracts until I get acquainted with the material. - Mister Holmes! I'm staying at the Lime Guest House, Market Hill 21. It's on the same street as the police department. My assistant is on duty in the room. The portable mutoscope is assembled and waiting for you. One word from you, dear sir... - Take your time. - The length of the tape is small! It's not even three hundred feet! -Thirty seconds, then. - And yet I repeat: do not rush. First, my friend Watson and I would like to hear from you the general outline of the plot. Pfeiffer assumed the pose of a speaker: - With great pleasure, sir! We will make a splash in the cinema market! So, you, Mr.Holmes, enter your drawing room on Baker Street. There you find that you are being robbed... - Me? - You! This is the point of intrigue! You are robbed, you resist, grab the poker, but then the robber disappears into thin air. Invisible Man, you know? You are amazed, you light up a cigar... - A pipe, - corrected Holmes. - I prefer the phone. This is America, sir! What tube? You are lighting a cigar flavored with Partagas... In confirmation of what he said, Mr.Pfeiffer took a cigar out of his inner pocket, bit off the tip, spat under the horse's hooves and lit it, striking a long match. The cigar was extremely stinky, making the doctor wince and the horse whinny softly. -. and before you, fine sir, release a couple of rings, the robber appears again. You grab your revolver, but the scoundrel disappears. -And so eight times, - muttered Watson. - Amazing intrigue. Glad you liked it, Doctor! In the finale, the robber appears in order to to escape through the window. But at the same time, your property disappears, Mr.Holmes, passing into a state of invisibility. You are puzzled, this is the final frame. - Invisible Man? Holmes began to fill his pipe. The doctor waited impatiently for the detective to smoke. Watson liked the smell of Virginia tobacco with a touch of Bartley - an Irish recipe that Holmes preferred - much more to Watson than the earthy stink of Partagas. -The invisibility of a burglar would greatly complicate my work, Mr.Pfeiffer. Here you are right. However, I have some thoughts on this. But I don't like the ending at all. Am I standing puzzled? Does this even make it into the title of the movie? No, such an ending is out of the question. "Part two, sir?" the cinematographer suggested. You catch the robber, but he escapes. And so on until while the viewer is ready to bear us their money? -And so on until then, - Holmes leaned forward. His hawkish profile is clearly visible in the cloud of smoke - until you stop misleading me. Do you want my permission? Mine and Dr.Watson? Then why did your film premiere already? May, huh? You release the film, but do not rush to register it officially. And you still have the audacity... - Sir! Mr.Pfeiffer took a step back: - Precious sir, your participation in the profits will begin from the moment of rental! Already started! And yours, doctor! I'm waiting for you at the hotel - if not today, then tomorrow. On any day convenient for you, gentlemen! Let's sit down at the negotiating table, drink a sip of whiskey, discuss the terms. Like business people, like gentlemen, finally... At the middle of a sentence, he disappeared into the twilight. -The Invisible Man, - said Tom. -Have you lost anything, Mr.Holmes? - -Gone, - the doctor answered instead of Holmes. - Copyright. And I'll lose my self-respect if I don't leave the American Mutoscope and Biograph without pants. Contract? They will swallow their cigars when they know our conditions. -You are a predator, my friend, - Holmes laughed. He studied the britzka with interest, from where the American's leather bag had disappeared without a trace. You are a hungry lion. I sympathize in advance with the cinema of America. 3. The last sailor of the "Son of Thunder" from where the American leather bag disappeared without a trace. You are a hungry lion. I sympathize in advance with the cinema of America. 3. The last sailor of the "Son of Thunder" from where the American leather bag disappeared without a trace. You are a hungry lion. I sympathize in advance with the cinema of America. 3. The last sailor of the "Son of Thunder"
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). The purplish-gold disk of the sun touched the rooftops of the city in the direction where the well-known St. Peter's Hospital was located. Long evening shadows stretched from the houses across the street, the opposite window glowing with molten gold, reflecting the sunset light. Twilight slowly descended on Maldon, covering the city with the evening coolness, so desired at the end of a hot June day. In the light breeze that blew in from the sea towards evening, the branches of the apple trees in the vicar's garden rustled lullingly. Both people and nature were preparing to go to sleep. -What could be more peaceful and serene than a summer sunset in a provincial town? - I involuntarily thought to myself. Even the American with his contract did not spoil the evening. Well, not too much. For a moment, it suddenly seemed to me that everything was back to normal. There are no and never were Martians, wars, chaos, flight, tragedy of human deaths. There were no terrible and amazing events: the heroic death of the "Son of Thunder", burning houses, a frightened girl who miraculously stopped the combat tripods. There were no six exhausting days and sleepless nights in the hospital. Everything that happened is a dream, bizarre and terrible. I almost managed to convince little Jenny of this! Now I'll wake up, and. - Mr.Holmes! Dr.Watson! From the side of the High Street, a buggy almost tipped over at the bend, rattling frantically on the cobblestones. Alas, the dream continued. Or, on the contrary, did the scream and clatter of wheels that broke the drowsy silence bring me back to reality? - Mister Holmes! The driver drove while standing, ruthlessly whipping the horses. Against the background of the setting sun, his figure seemed black, as if charred - and therefore sinister. - Dr.Watson! I was about to dodge to the side, not wanting to be hoofed, when the driver reined in a mere three yards away. Upon closer inspection, all of his ominous halo dissipated. The charioteer turned out to be a young soldier who was no less lather than a horse. Big drops of sweat ran down his boyish, flushed face, and his chest heaved heavily. -Captain Wallace sent me! he blurted out, panting. - He asks! You! Urgently! Come to the hospital! Saint Peter! The soldier did not speak, but spat out words, in pauses convulsively swallowing air. It seemed that it was he, and not the poor animal, who rushed through the city at full speed, dragging a rumbling gig behind him. -And why did Captain Wallace need us in the hospital? - Holmes inquired with the imperturbability of a telegraph pole. - The captain said: he came to his senses! You must hear it! - Who is he"? - Sailor! Sailor from the Son of Thunder. -Well, I think Captain Wallace would not have sent for us in vain, - my friend stepped towards the britzka. - Let's go, Watson. And you, private, lead the horse properly. Ride back at a pace, otherwise you will drive the unfortunate mare. When we got to the hospital, the sun had already set, and the yellow cozy lights of candles and lamps were glowing in the windows. A sergeant we knew from Moot Hall was waiting for us at the door with a lantern in his hand. He paced restlessly back and forth. A grotesque shadow followed him along the wall, as if trying to look into the windows of the second floor. - It is you? Finally! exclaimed the sergeant. - Come on, I'll accompany you. The captain is waiting in the ward. As I hurried along the familiar noisy corridor past a row of identical high doors leading to the wards, I tried to figure out which patient I was talking about. A sailor from the Son of Thunder? But I didn't remember that! As far as I knew, no one escaped from the dead destroyer. If a lucky survivor had turned up, during my six days of work in the hospital, I would certainly have learned about him. We stopped in front of the door of the corner chamber. Two burnt artillerymen were lying here yesterday. Both I sent by train to Chelmsford this morning. What nonsense? The sergeant knocked delicately: -Sherlock Holmes and Dr.Watson have arrived, sir. - Come in, gentlemen! Wallace's muffled voice came from behind the door. In the ward, in addition to the captain, Dr. McCormack showed up. - He came to his senses! he notified me, ignoring the others present. And he hurried to lower his voice: - But we considered him hopeless! Still not sure which patient he was referring to, I glanced over McCormack's shoulder at the bunk. There lay a young man completely unfamiliar to me, covered up to the waist with a light blanket. On the chest one could see a tight bandage, which is usually applied for fractures of the ribs. The face was disfigured by extensive hematomas a week ago. The swollen black-purple swellings had already begun to turn yellow around the edges, which made the guy look like a living corpse. The wounded man's eyes were open, he looked with interest from one visitor to another. The second bed was empty. - What about him? I asked. - You do not remember? McCormack was surprised. -However, what am I talking about? In recent days, we have all had so much work to do—do you remember all of them? He has a concussion, fractures of four ribs, severe multiple soft tissue bruises and internal bleeding. To be honest, I didn't think he'd make it. But this morning the bleeding stopped spontaneously, breathing became even, and the patient regained consciousness. He said he was very hungry and dying of thirst. And when they fed him and gave him a drink, he began to tell such things. At first, I considered his words to be the delirium of a darkened mind. But then he decided to send for Captain Wallace. Strange thing: while McCormack spoke, vague pictures and someone's remarks began to emerge in my memory. My first day in the hospital. The wards are overcrowded, and the wounded are all coming. They are laid in the lobby and corridors, released and hastily washed utility rooms. Next stretchers. -Let go! Let pass! He is the only one from the Son of Thunder who survived! We can't let him die!" As if through a fog, I see Dr. McCormack. He leans over the wounded. -Are you really from Son of Thunder? - he asks. The question echoes in my head. -Yes, sir, - the wounded man opens his lips with an effort. -Sailor John Skrow, sir. - And loses consciousness. -. sailor John Skrow, sir, echoed from the bed. The voice was weak but clear. I missed the question asked by Holmes. However, it is not difficult to guess what my friend asked. -I'm glad you're here, colleague, - McCormack interrupted me again. - I have to go, I have an evening round. Make sure that the conversation lasts no more than half an hour. Better yet, twenty minutes. John is on the mend, but he is still very weak. -Yes, of course. - I took my watch out of my pocket and noted the time. 4. Tentacles. 
The story of John Skrow, a sailor from the destroyer "Son of Thunder" When the captain gave the order "Full speed ahead!" and our destroyer rushed at the enemy, I was where I was supposed to be according to the combat schedule: on the platform of the stern twelve-pound gun. I was the second loader in the crew, sir. The Son of Thunder quickly gained full speed - all twenty-seven knots. The Martian tripods were closing in, but there was no fire command. Soon the leading Martian released black gas at us, and I thought we were finished. But the cloud of gas only doused the port side, and we slipped through. I could hardly believe in our happy deliverance and, it seems, even burst out laughing with joy and relief. I rejoiced early! The second Martian fired his beam at us. The ship was thrown a good ten feet into the air, something exploded, I breathed in hellish heat - and I tumbled overboard. Then I was sure that I was flying straight to hell. But the Lord was merciful to me. Stunned, I fell flat on my face into the water, and the burning pain of the blow brought me back to my senses. I was lucky twice: I was thrown over the starboard side - and far enough so that I was not hit by a propeller. As I surfaced, I saw the Son of Thunder, shrouded in smoke and steam, fire a volley, and another, and the Martian collapsed into the waters of the bay. Not remembering myself, I shouted "Hurrah!" - and almost choked. My position was unenviable. It was almost two miles to the shore, and my whole body was in pain, and my head was constantly turbid. I was afraid at any moment to lose consciousness and go to the bottom. After all, at first I was hit by an explosion on board, and then I was also thrown into the water. I understood that there was no way I could swim two miles to the shore. But the bay was full of civilian ships and boats, which meant that there was hope that they would notice me and save me. Actually, that's just what I was hoping for. I swam to the shore. I raked with my hands with the last of my strength, poorly understanding what I was doing and where I was swimming. After all, there, in front, were the Martians, and I swam straight to them! And then it exploded so that I felt the blow with my whole body! The bay around was almost boiling, I screamed in pain and swallowed water again. There was smoke and steam all around, water seethed like in a cauldron, something flashed, clanged and rumbled... Then the water parted like the waters of the sea in the Bible, and I saw Him!. Who "him", sir? His ! No, not our Lord, rather the opposite. No, sir, and not the Devil. Although... If you, sir, saw Him, you wouldn't know what to call Him either! At first I thought that a giant octopus had risen from the depths. Yes, it had tentacles—each thicker than me, and a hundred feet long! I'm not lying, sir, I swear to you! They did not grow around the beak, like an octopus, but like a human beard. Yes, sir, tentacle beard! And under it is a warty body the size of a two-story house! Like a toad, sir! With such a toad that you see in a dream - you won't wake up! It seemed to me that He was pushing off the bottom. Wyrley Channel Bay is not too deep, especially for such a monster. What repulsed? Feet, sir. Yes, he had legs. Like a horse. Oh, a very big horse - well, you understand me, sir. It seems with hooves - I didn't see it for sure. How many legs? Didn't see it either. Maybe four. Or maybe six. And more membranes on the back, like the wings of a bat. He opened them once and then folded them. No, sir, he didn't try to take off, that's for sure. And then He arose from the depths, in clouds of steam and smoke, and raised such waves that I was spinning, thrown away, and then carried back. Straight to Him! But He, of course, did not pay attention to me. I saw through the smoke that He grappled with the last remaining Martian in the bay. He wrapped his tentacles around him and dragged him into the water. The Martian tried to fight back, even cut off a piece of a tentacle with his beam. But that only pissed him off! He threw the Martian into the air, threw the tripod into the bay with a swing - and already there, at the bottom of the Wyrley Channel, he began to trample it with his horse legs! The device that fires a heat beam fell into the water, and it boiled at once. I realized that I was going to be boiled alive, but then He grabbed me with the tip of a tentacle. I felt like I was in a slimy vise. The stench turned me inside out. At the touch of His flesh, my clothes hissed and unraveled, as if strong acid had been splashed on them. A few more seconds and the caustic mucus would have reached my body. It would be a truly terrible death! I'd rather die with the Son of Thunder or be hard-boiled in the waters of the Wyrley Channel! I don't know if he disdained me, or - lo and behold ?! - took pity on me. The tentacle shot up into the air - and I, like a projectile from a cannon, flew through the smoke above the water, straight to the shore. I got lucky again. I fell into shallow water; went obliquely into the water head first and hit the bottom. Luckily, it was muddy and soft. However, I do not remember how I surfaced, how I got to the shore. I only remember seeing a green blade of grass - very close, a couple of inches from my nose - and fainted. I woke up on the way to the hospital, where I was carried by kind people. At first they thought I was dead, but among them was a retired military paramedic. He put his ear to my chest and heard that my heart was still beating. Yes, that's all. I have nothing more to add. No, I don't know what kind of creature it was. But I've heard an old maritime legend... 5. In the night guard. 
- Tell me, sir, - the corporal began cautiously. - Is it true that the devil himself saved the sailor from the Son of Thunder? The corporal leaned forward, so eager to hear the answer to his question. But the fire shot out sparks, and the corporal, willy-nilly, had to move away. -It's amazing how fast the news spreads in this city, - Holmes said, fighting a yawn. - And why, one wonders, invented the telegraph? -Nonsense, - said the doctor in an irritated tone. - Cheap gossip. Sailor Skrow is delirious and hallucinating. There is nothing surprising in this: the poor fellow received a severe concussion and concussion! Trying not to breathe, Tom took another step closer to the fire. He walked more silently than a mouse, and he was also hidden by a dilapidated fence near the Liggins' house. The darkness of the night outside the space lit by a fire thickened twice as much - nevertheless, Sherlock Holmes, without even looking in Tom's direction, he raised his voice: - Stop playing robbers, young man. Since you still can't sleep, join us. Confused, Tom climbed out of his hiding place, shifting from foot to foot. If he fell through the earth now, he would thank the Lord for mercy. - Excuse me, sir! I didn't mean to peek. I just - -Following Captain Wallace's orders? - - Yes, sir! I mean, no, sir I just couldn't sit at home! But, excuse me, sir... How did you know? -Many underestimate the sensitivity of human hearing, - Holmes paused, lighting his pipe. - And most importantly - his selectivity. A person is able to tune in to a particular sound, especially if he is a musician. The ear of a violinist, even an amateur violinist, is a magnificent instrument. The sound selected in advance can be caught without paying attention to extraneous noises, even if the volume of this sound is low. I assumed that someone would appear here, so I tuned in to hear footsteps. And I heard - in spite of our conversation, the crackling of branches in the fire and the howl of a dog in a neighboring street. But before that, I heard the gate creak at the far end of the Oak Close. Who could it be if not you? The old Mrs. Shanning, who took it into her head to take a walk in the moonlight? Mr.Nash, whose gate hinges are carefully oiled, but the latch clanks so that even the deaf will flinch? - Thank you sir. I got it, sir! - In that case, sit down. You're not going to stand like a pillar all night, are you? - No, sir. Thank you. Tom sat awkwardly on the ground next to the corporal. He didn't ask about Captain Wallace: he didn't want to bother Mr.Holmes with questions. And most importantly, he himself guessed, and now he was extremely proud of himself! When the gentlemen left the hospital, Mr.Holmes let Tom go home. He and Dr.Watson went to the britzka, and Captain Wallace called Radcliffe. -Accompany these gentlemen, - the captain told Tom. - Do whatever they say. If suddenly something happens - something serious, do you understand me, Tom? - run to me! Better on horseback. You know where to find me. Don't worry about the salary." And he shoved half a sovereign into Tom's hand! -What are you, sir! Tom was confused. He wanted to say that he was ready to help for free, but he realized in time: if the captain pays him a salary, it means that he, Tom Radcliffe, was hired by the Directorate of Military Intelligence of England! -Don't hesitate, sir! I won't let you down! Rule Britain! And if there is any trouble, God forbid, run to you! - Mr.Holmes and Dr.Watson were just getting into the cart. It is seen, Mr.Holmes tuned his musical ears in a special way - and he heard everything, although Captain Wallace spoke quietly. - But you, dear Tom, are completely unable to restrain your marvelous bass. Especially when you are worried, - Holmes remarked with a smile. -I didn't even have to listen. -No, - said the doctor in response to Tom's astonishment, -my friend can't read minds. It's just written all over your face. -Mimicry and gestures, - added Holmes. -You, my friend, are an open book to a skilled observer. Feel free: this, in part, tells us that you are an honest person. Unfortunately, most criminals are much better at hiding their motives. But with proper concentration... Where are you looking, Tom? You don't have a face! Did you see a ghost? - Yes! With a trembling finger, Radcliffe pointed to the ruins of the Liggins' house. - Amazing! Holmes, oddly enough, he was not at all worried and even visibly delighted. - That's what we've been waiting for. A greenish glow flickered over the ruins. In it, driven by the wind, two vague figures glided. Goosebumps crawled up Tom's back: he recognized Mr.and Mrs. Liggins! The corporal reached for his revolver holster, but his hand stopped halfway. Apparently, he remembered how he had already shot ghosts last night. Dr.Watson got up, wanting to see better, and now he was looking at the lively dead with the close attention of a doctor - it seemed that the doctor was trying to determine the signs of an exotic, and most likely fatal disease by the appearance of amazing guests. And Sherlock Holmes, without the slightest hesitation, went straight to the Liggins. On the way, he politely raised his cap: - Good night! The ghosts of Holmes were ignored. -We apologize for intruding into your domain! - The shadows still darted back and forth over the pile of broken bricks and charred beams. From time to time now Mr.and Mrs. Liggins hung in one place, as if they were trying to find an important loss. -So I thought, - muttered Holmes. -But you still had to make sure - He resolutely began to climb up the ruins. However, when the ghosts were only a few yards away, the Liggins couple began to fade, quickly fading into the night air. Holmes overcame the final section with a swift jump, almost crashing into Mr.Liggins, but at that moment both ghosts disappeared without a trace. -. and then, - Holmes chuckled, - the robber dissolves into thin air. The glow went out. Instead, a secret lantern in Holmes's hand flashed brightly - Tom did not see it until the amazing beekeeper pulled back the curtain, and the yellow oily light flooded the ruins. For some time, Holmes scurried through the ruins - exactly the third ghost. He illuminated himself with a lantern, peering into those places where the light he directed fell. At last Holmes returned to the fire. -Alas, - he was disappointed, -I was unable to locate the source of the image. - Source? without saying a word, the doctor and the corporal were amazed. - Well, of course! Gentlemen, do you believe in ghosts? For a full-fledged version, your story was not enough for me, Corporal. But after meeting with Mr.Pfeiffer, everything fell into place. Do you know that the predecessor of the current cinema was the so-called "magic lantern", or "horror lantern"? A telling name, isn't it? These blurry images were called "foggy pictures" and at first they were projected onto clouds of smoke or fog. And the "lantern" itself was hidden from the audience. Very similar to "ghosts" which we had the pleasure of seeing. Tom thought that he did not get any pleasure from the appearance of ghosts, rather the opposite, but considered it good to remain silent. -It's not hard to compare Mr.Pfeiffer's appearance in Maldon—and the ghosts you told us about, Corporal. I'm still convinced that this is a clever cinematic illusion. Unfortunately, I did not find the device from which the image was projected. It may have more range and better focus than I thought. Tomorrow I want to look around this place in daylight -And that won't do you any good either, Mr.Holmes. A stranger stood by the fire. When he showed up, no one noticed. Even Sherlock Holmes - the very equanimity - was slightly surprised. The stranger was not a local, and most importantly, not an Englishman - even Tom realized that. He wore a long to the toes, a gabardine mackintosh with a stand-up collar, throwing a cloak over his shoulders with the grace of an aristocrat - so that he did not at all hide a black tailcoat pair with a dazzling white shirt-front. On a pale, waxy face, crimson lips, thick as pitch eyebrows and sparkling eyes stood out sharply. A strong, slightly lisping accent completed the picture. - Why did you decide so, mister. - Oh, my damn absent-mindedness! I'm sorry, I forgot to introduce myself! Vladislav the Impaler, Count Orlok. Assistant Mr Pfeiffer, at your service. - Assistant? Holmes smiled. - Your Excellency, is this not too small a position for a titled person? An answering smile twisted the count's bright mouth. -America, Mr.Holmes. A country of equal opportunities. I note that the possibilities of a titled person, ruined by circumstances and forced to flee from her native Carpathians, are scanty. You hide your pride in a safe and take on any job. You need to eat at least once a day, and the nutritional value of memories, whatever one may say, is small. And I beg, gentlemen, only without "your excellency"! - How would you like to contact you? Simply put: Count. You don't care, but I'm glad. -As you wish, Count. So why did you think that my searches would not yield results? - Because there is no "horror lantern" here. There is no other projection apparatus. In addition, as you rightly noted, "foggy pictures" are projected onto clouds of smoke or fog. Do you see fog or smoke? Indeed, the night air was quiet and transparent, and the fire gave off almost no smoke, and even that was carried away from the ruins. -I cannot help admitting that you are right, Count, - Holmes stated dryly. -I'll refrain from asking tactlessly what Mr.Pfeiffer's assistant is doing here at night. I'm much more interested in your version of this phenomenon. And you definitely have it. They looked at each other without looking away - Sherlock Holmes and Count Orlok. Tom thought that this is how fist fighters study the enemy before they meet in a duel. -I will gladly answer both of your questions, Mr.Holmes, - the earl was the first to break the protracted pause. -I heard about the ghosts in the ruins of the Liggins house and wanted to see them for myself. It could be worthwhile material for a film. As for the version of the phenomenon... These are ghosts, gentlemen. Ghosts of the highest standard, without any cinematic illusions. Believe me - I know a lot about illusions. -So you're saying that something from the realm of the supernatural is taking place here? - - Without a doubt. And the ghosts of the Liggins, and the powers that little Jenny called upon, and much more. The Count walked along the border of light and darkness, collecting his thoughts. At times, his mackintosh and tailcoat merged completely with the darkness of the night, and the white shirt-front seemed to be a glare of a fire. -You don't do things related to mysticism, do you? - he asked, stopping three paces from Holmes. - With the occult? With magic, I'm not afraid of this word? Your interests lie entirely in the realm of the rational, that which can be explained by logic and science. It is so? - Let's admit it. Go on, Count, please. The icy courtesy in Holmes's voice could freeze the Gulf Stream. But the count himself was as cold as the chilly breeze of November. -In this remote town, a power has awakened that you have no idea about. It cannot be broken down into logic. She cannot be crucified on the cross of science. My advice to you, Mr.Holmes, and to you, dear Dr.Watson: sign a contract with the American Mutoscope and Biograph and leave Maldon. Catch robbers and murderers, treat patients, write memoirs. And I recommend forgetting what we witnessed here. Then, I hope, the awakened monster will forget about you. - Forgive me for interrupting you, count, - the doctor suddenly intervened. -But as a doctor, I have no right to remain silent! - Judging by your pallor and a number of other signs, you have an advanced form of anemia. I note that I observed this disease in many who were excessively inclined to spiritualism and other devilry. Take a look at yourself in the mirror: more beautiful, sorry, put in a coffin! You should drink carrot and beet juice daily. I also recommend decoctions of wormwood and wild rose, nuts with honey. Yes, and also garlic. Garlic for sure! Count, you need to take action without delay. - You are absolutely right, doctor, The Count nodded. - I'll take action. I will definitely take action. He took a step back and vanished into the shadows of the night.
Sideshow Horror-horror?
 for a moment it suddenly seemed to me that everything was back to normal. There are no and never were Martians, war, chaos, flight, tragedy of human deaths. There were no terrible and amazing events: the heroic death of the "Son of Thunder", burning houses, a frightened girl who miraculously stopped the combat tripods. There were no six exhausting days and sleepless nights in the hospital. Everything that happened is a dream, bizarre and terrible. I almost managed to convince little Jenny of this! Now I wake up and...
Cell phone, mother! My finger hovered over the Enter key. - Yes! I'm listening! - Bullfinch, buy some bread. - Nastya, I'm very busy. I don't know when I will. - Are you in the "night"? - Yes. "Night" - the elimination of the consequences of hacking - this was the only reason that allowed me to tell Nastya in plain text: "I'm very busy." All other cases required roundabouts and ambiguities. Otherwise, Nastya, my sun, was terribly offended. Oh, you're busy, but I'm not busy, forever you will not be interrogated. Everyone has their own cockroaches. - Direct cardiac massage? A, Snegir? - Direct massage of the rectum. What's Mishka? - Ran to the skating rink. - All right, it's good to move. The boy must be skinny. - He is already - only ribs. Without stopping the conversation, I threw a paragraph into the system. The hint -no and never was - is an analogue of a glass with effervescent -Fervex. Bring down the temperature, relieve the chills. Throwing went like clockwork. I commanded on the admin panel, not a single muchacha will refuse such a macho. One could only hope that it would be a candle in a sore ass, and not a shovel of shit on a fan.. yes, respectable audience. Rude. I confess, I strike with my forehead. My mouth with soap does not help. - Bullfinch! And this is Tyunya. Examines another printer miscarriage. - All right, Nastya. Sorry, the trumpet is calling. - Buy bread. - I will buy it! Having cut off the connection, I turned to Tyuna: - What is there? - Nightmare. The fresh illustration was indeed a nightmare. Such a funny nightmare, a clown from the world of fears. He sat on a square pedestal covered with incantations. However, it could well have read: -I take off the crown of celibacy: cheap, cheerful - - only in the language of the Atlanteans or lemurs. The fat uncle, covered with scales, with legs ending in something like horse hooves, was thoughtful. His posture was reminiscent of Rodin's thinker, except that he folded both hands on his knees. The head of a melted snowman, a beard of tentacles. On the back is a roll of membranous wings. -Mermaid, - said Tyunya. - Male. -Rusal, - I said. - According to the passport - Cthulhu. The inscription under the drawing, in fact, a sketch, agreed with me: "A sketch of the fictional character Cthulhu, drawn by his creator, HP Lovecraft." -Tentacles, - Tyunya winced. - You were right. -Look, - I ordered, and only then realized that this was the order to the dog. Holmes, Martians, Cthulhu. Wells, Conan Doyle, Lovecraft. Something like that. We need to know what the program attracted. - I quickly! Today I was lucky with women. Nastya was charm itself, Tyunya swallowed my harsh tone without scandal. Even Baba Fima walked past the door on tiptoe - you see, she was imbued with the importance of the moment. Life experience suggested, infection: lucky in love - beware of cards. I was expecting a trick beforehand, and the trick came. - Bullfinch! Found! - Well?! - Neil Gaiman, A Study in Emerald. Found by Conan Doyle and Lovecraft. I knew this story. Well, yes, Holmes and Watson, Sebastian Moran and Professor Moriarty are the heroes of Conan Doyle. London, time of action corresponds. It seems that Cthulhu - I mean the word "Cthulhu" itself, and the scaly thinker with a beard of tentacles - was never mentioned there. But the story featured the Great Old Ones - terrible kings and queens who seized power over humanity. Martians with tentacles, Cthulhu with tentacles; war of the worlds, capture of the Earth... In short, the darkness of internal connections. - Horror? Tuna asked. - Horror-horror? - Don't think. I quickly considered options. Throw in a counter-theme? No, it will make it worse. Sometimes it's better to remain silent. You look, it will dissolve itself. - You should think Tyunya growled angrily. - Who pushed Holmes? So he pulled your Cthulhs along with him. - Pulled, - I agreed. - But it won't last. It's all gone now, you'll see. - Are you an optimist? You're a fool. - I'm realist. Gaiman's story does not strengthen the hacked War of the Worlds. Too much to redo. And not just anywhere, but in the foundation. Take "Etude." beyond measure - and the Martians on Earth will be met not by artillery batteries and the "Son of Thunder", but by the Great Old Ones in the flesh. Cthulhu vs combat tripods? Azathoth, nuclear chaos, against the heat beam? Nyarlathotep, soul eater, against black gas? I would like to see it... - Here, - Tyunya pointed to the smiling Nyurka. That's what she wanted. - No, the program will not risk it. Too cumbersome. There was more confidence in my voice than it actually was. -Sherlock Holmes against the Martians, - Tyunya continued with a series of associations. - No, not this way. Sherlock Holmes against magic. I didn't argue with her. It was not a contradiction, but a way to solve the problem - from Sherlock Holmes against magic to Sherlock Holmes against the Martians.
... gentlemen, do you really believe in ghosts? Do you know that the predecessor of the current cinema was the so-called "magic lantern", or "horror lantern"? A telling name, isn't it? These blurry images were called "foggy pictures" and at first they were projected onto clouds of smoke or fog. And the "lantern" itself was hidden from the audience.
- Bullfinch, I'm afraid, - says Tyunya. - For Nyurka? - I'm smiling. - Don't be afraid, baby. We'll pull it out. - We'll pull Nyurka out. I'm afraid to go "at night" alone. At first I don't understand. -In the night - is ours with Nastya. We came up with this to somehow designate my work, and Tyunya has nothing to do with it. I catch myself in a strange, absurd, childish insult: as if I had been robbed. - Why alone? And where are you going to take me? You will leave sooner or later. You will be given a new intern. And I will be issued on a full-time basis and sent to free swimming. Or even worse, they will load the trainee, like you - me. I'm afraid, bullfinch. I look at Tyunya as if I see it for the first time. On Tyunya - a thunderstorm of the seas. Tyunyu is the idol of girls dancing on the Internet. Antonina Nederez, iron lady. The iron lady has wet eyes. -Fool, - I say. You need to be able to do this: so to speak, -fool, so that it sounds like -Tunechka. Or even as -Tyu-yu-yu-nechka!. It's hard, but I manage. -Fool, - she agrees. - Stupid. Fool! - You're an angel. Guardian angel. I give you a guarantee that all your future clients will fall head over heels in love with you. Tyunya looks at Nyurka in a helmet. -God forbid, - she says. -That was just not enough for me. - How much more pleasant - seeing progress, I develop success - emerging from a hyperbook that has fallen into a stupor, to see not my unshaven face, but a pretty face. - Go to hell, bullfinch. -. a flower of fragrant prairies! Tyunya, all the way. Not the gods burn the pots. - I think slowly. I'm bad with styling. I'm wrong with the choice of "external character". Holmes? I would introduce Conan the Barbarian. Why Conan? - Conan Doyle. Conan the barbarian. Direct association. I'm stumbling. Fortunately, Tyunya is joking. - Dead, Bullfinch. In general, I love a clean plot: I came, I saw, I conquered. - Here! Won! - Drop the hype. I do not believe. In Tyuni's remark, the Stanislavsky bell rings. - To the car! I command. - What? - Alive to the car! Run! She obeys. Pulling his head into his shoulders, Tyunya sits down at the keyboard. - Knock! - What? - You know what! Think less! She touches the keys. - Faster!
... on the back of a chair hung an unlined summer coat made of striped alpaca. Seeing Holmes with the company, Mr.Pfeiffer.
"Okay," I furtively wipe away sweat. - Very good.
I am a big fan of your literary talent, doctor. I have a complete collection...
I knew she could handle it. It was more important to make Tyunya herself find out about this. Don't believe, find out. This isn't the first time she's thrown such a tantrum. But before the tantrums were brighter, and the results were worse. -Well, you're a fool, - Tyunya replies inappropriately. I build a chain of associations. I like. Chapter Five Behind the scenes of theaters: anatomical and military. 
1. Semi-talentless trifle. 
- Look! Tom suddenly exclaimed, pointing with his hand at the huge, half-walled window of the restaurant that belonged to the Lime Guest House Hotel. - Mutoscope! Realizing that he had made a mistake, the loader turned purple with embarrassment and made a clumsy attempt to correct the situation: -Well, this one Invisible Man! - -No, Tom, you are right, - Holmes looked thoughtfully in the indicated direction. -It really is a mutoscope. Or, if you prefer, a human mutoscope. Michael Pfeiffer, a representative of the American Mutoscope and Biograph, was eating his brunch at the restaurant. He tucked a starched white napkin behind his collar, unbuttoning the top button, apparently hoping to look like a true Englishman. In this Pfyer did not succeed, but his whole appearance, shiny with pleasure, spoke of a wonderful mood. Opposite the cinematographer sat a pretty girl—or rather, a young woman in her early twenties, wearing a casual dress. White matte skin, brown hair, styled in two knots, a fresh, baby blush on her cheeks made the beauty look like an angel. Next to Pfeiffer's companion, on the back of a chair, hung an unlined summer coat made of striped alpaca. Seeing Holmes with the company, Mr.Pfeiffer pulled out a napkin and waved it like a white flag, offering change at the mercy of the winner. - Lord! - rushed from behind the glass, or rather, from the double window, open wide open. - Over here, gentlemen! Waiter! Whiskey to my friends! Whiskey with ice! Gentlemen, what are you doing?! - Well, what are we? the doctor asked grimly. -I can't wait to talk to this gentleman on social topics. In particular, to discuss the initiative of his vile assistant. I trust Captain Wallace will wait? - Of course, my friend, - Holmes nodded. I share your enthusiasm. Tom, would you mind keeping us company? - I?! What Tom feared most was that he had misheard. That Mr.Holmes's question seemed to him - no, it is not possible that such people as a good doctor and a cunning beekeeper invited a modest loader to the same table with them. Tom was as tired yesterday as if he had unloaded a coal train. It would seem that he did nothing, he just drove, waited, listened, tried to compare and reflect. In the morning, the body ached, the lower back did not unbend; rocked, as with a feather. But if someone asked Tom Radcliffe, whether he wants to continue to accompany Holmes and Watson, even feeling like the fifth leg of a dog, Tom would nod desperately, unable to utter a word. - You, young man. Your presence during the conversation with Mr.Pfeiffer seems to me highly desirable. - Holy Virgin! Mr.Holmes, just give me an order... "And I'll jump from the bell tower," Tom added mentally. - I'll go to the Martians in hand-to-hand combat. I'm marrying Mrs. Priestley. Mr.Holmes, just hint what to do for you - The waiters had already put in the missing cutlery and were now carrying the last one - of course, they didn't take Tom into account. Holmes and Watson bowed coldly to Pfeiffer, who, however, mistook their coldness for purely English hospitality, and turned to the lady, expecting the cinematographer to introduce them. Instead, the girl herself got up from the table and extended her hand to Dr.Watson. Mentally apologizing to his distant wife, the doctor was about to kiss this hand - it must be said, most graceful - when the girl turned her hand over, and the doctor was rewarded with the strongest, almost masculine handshake. -Adele, - the girl introduced herself. - Miss? Uh... miss... - Just Adele. I'm a big fan of your literary talent, doctor. I have a complete collection of your works. -I am still alive, - Watson modestly reminded, meaning that the collection of the lovely Adele may not be complete. And not very old. -Which makes me happy, - Adele nodded, not in the least embarrassed. Oh, Mr Holmes! As for you, you are my idol. -Glad to hear it, - Holmes held the girl's hand in his. -I hope you also use my deductive method to the best of your ability? - Like Captain Wallace, huh? - Somewhat. Take a seat, gentlemen. Damn it, thought Tom, sinking onto the edge of his chair. -I also fifa - Not that he was counting on a handshake or even a simple nod, but he immediately did not like the girl. Even more than before, I didn't like Mr.Pfeiffer, the invisible man, who is also a mutoscope man. As a challenge, Tom agreed to a sip of whiskey, while Holmes and Watson politely declined Pfeiffer's invitation. However, Tom took a small sip, rather for appearance - the deceased mother did not approve of men drinking in the morning. -Advertising, - the cinematographer said in a tone that seemed to be continuing an interrupted conversation. - Personally, I am a zealous supporter of anti-advertising. Well, who, pray tell, is interested in an honest person and an exemplary family man? Now drunkards and womanizers are in fashion. Do you agree with me, Mr Holmes? Holmes leaned back in his chair. -To a certain extent. The world is corrupted, I will not hide. - Here! So, we will advertise you in the right way. "A drug addict who does not have a single positive character trait" - what do you think about this? - Drug addict? Holmes's lips twitched into a slight smile. - A character with a minus sign? Is this about me? - Certainly! I would look for a slogan to advertise someone else... - And who is the author of this aphorism? - A certain Bernard Shaw, writer. do you know each other? - Oh yeah! the doctor answered instead of Holmes. - Graphomaniac, author of the most mediocre plays. "Caesar and Cleopatra", from which Shakespeare turns over in his grave. "Heartbreaker", as a challenge to everything pure and bright, which embodies the institution of marriage. What about Widower's House? And he still dares to call Mr.Holmes a drug addict?! I hope he spoke about me in the appropriate way? Come on, give me a reason to slap the insolent one! -Unfortunately, no, - said Adele. -Mr.Shaw said nothing about you, either good or bad. A young friend of Mr.Shaw spoke about you - one Russian, a correspondent for the newspaper Odessa News. As my friend wrote to me, he recently arrived in London from Odessa, with his young wife. Interrupted by odd jobs; now, for example, he whitewashes catalogs in the British Museum. To be precise, Dr.Watson, the Russian was not talking about you, but about your notes dedicated to Mr.Holmes. - What? the doctor and detective asked in unison. - What exactly? - He called your work "semi-worthless trifle." - What is his name? -Nicholas Levenson, - Adele pronounced the name of the newspaperman in French. - He is illegitimate and prefers his mother's surname: Korneichukov. Those Russian surnames! You can break your tongue! Personally, I like Levenson much more. Holmes closed his eyes, remembering: -Odessa? I've been to Odessa... Watson, do you remember Trepov's murder? When did it happen? -Twelve years ago, - said the doctor. He saw very well that Holmes was playing forgetfulness. - Exactly! Our Odessa citizen Levenson-Korneichukov then probably went to kindergarten. Marching to the music drew funny pictures -Semi-talentless, - while finishing a dozen eggs and bacon, Pfeiffer smacked his lips, as if tasting the word. - Amazing! I love this duality. You can submit so that the second half will be brilliant. The audience will be delighted. Conflict is the basis of dramaturgy! - And what do you want to do with a trifle? Holmes asked. - Mister Holmes! Catch your killers and leave advertising to the professionals! A trifle is the key to success. I mean commercial success. It is the trifles that collect, while the lofty truths vegetate in poverty. I already know! Do you want scrambled eggs? - Thanks, no, - hardly hiding disgust, Holmes looked at the Babylonian pandemonium, which the cinematographer arranged in his plate. - And you, doctor? - I am not hungry. "Me," Tom muttered timidly. - I would not refuse, sir. If possible, of course. I have money too There was not enough money. But Tom would sell his last pants just to have breakfast at the Lime Guest House, in the company of such gentlemen and ladies. Then for the rest of your life there will be something to remember. - What are you, young man! - judging by the tone, Pfeiffer was happy that at least someone decided to keep him company. - I'm serving! Hey, who's there? Scrambled eggs for my young Hercules! With the best bacon! "And spinach," said Tom, feeling his wish come true. - With a whole bunch of spinach! -In the meantime, eggs are being fried, - Dr.Watson moved a chair closer to the American, -I would like to hear from you a comment about the insolence of your assistant. Or maybe even an apology. Mr.Pfeiffer's eyebrows shot up. He exchanged glances with Adele, whose face was scrunched up in amusement, as if the girl were holding back a laugh. - Insolence? My assistant? - Exactly! This night he I think he told us too much. And you... - At night?! - Yes! -Adele, baby, - Mr.Pfeiffer grunted loudly. -Did you spend the night with those two gentlemen? - No, I know New York girls are free-spirited. But to that much?! - Don't fool me! the doctor exploded. -What does Miss have to do with it What does your charming companion have to do with it? - I'm talking about Mr.Impaler. Vladislav the Impaler, your assistant! -Adele, my child, - the cinematographer waved his fork. - Stand up please. The girl stood up without protest. -Allow me to introduce, gentlemen, - Pfeiffer enjoyed the situation from the bottom of his heart. - Adele Pfeiffer, my daughter, and also my assistant. Senior Technician at the New York studio owned by American Mutoscope and Biograph. If you need to shoot a movie, fix a car engine, or, say, debug the Martian tripod - feel free to contact her. As for Mr.Tepescher with his insolence, we do not have the honor of being acquainted. The next five minutes passed in deathly silence. Mr.Pfeiffer was smoking a Partagas, grinning with truly transatlantic malice. As a dessert, Adele, armed with a magnifying glass and tweezers, mutilated and reassembled the onion clock. Tom fought the monstrous scrambled eggs, doing his best not to slurp. Holmes sucked on his unlit pipe, lost in thought. Dr.Watson looked anxiously at his friend, but judging by the cunning wrinkles at the corners of Holmes' eyes, a quarrel was not expected. -Yes, - said the mutoscope man placidly as the silence turned into a dangerous cloud, -by the way. Mr.Holmes, do you know if there is anything left of the Liggins' property? -I think so, - Holmes nodded with magnificent indifference. - What exactly are you interested in? If the library, so I have to disappoint you. Burned out without a trace. - Portrait. Medium-sized portrait by Basil Hallward. Who is in the portrait? -A young man in his twenties. I myself have not seen the portrait, but my customers say that this is a typical hero-lover. Like Max Shrek, only slimmer. Are you familiar with Shrek? Well, with this, from the Berlin State Theatre? Did you say customer? -We have nothing to hide, Mr.Holmes. The banker Mellon, Andrew Mellon, is interested in the portrait. He is ready to pay a tidy sum for this daub. The cinematograph feeds from hand to mouth, gentlemen. Sometimes you have to take everything that is offered. Before sailing, I was informed from London that the portrait had been purchased at an auction personally by Balthazar Liggins, three years ago, for ridiculous money. Before that, for five or six years, the price of a job had been steadily falling - no one wanted to take it. - Why? - How should I know? Pretty female faces must have been in fashion - or, say, those terrible Jews of Rembrandt. - Jews? the doctor wondered. Why Jews? - Who? - in turn surprised Pfeiffer. - Uh, doctor, you are a big joker. 2. Anatomy of the Martians. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson - Tom, I have an assignment for you, - Holmes turned to our companion when we left the restaurant and ended up on Market Hill. - Listen, sir! The guy stretched out at attention, imitating the military. He seemed to think he was on duty. - Take a walk around the city, look into taverns, talk with friends. I am interested in everything strange and unusual that has happened in Maldon over the past week. From the attack of the Martians to the present day. It doesn't have to be about Jenny and the Liggins. If you can find eyewitnesses, talk to them. - About what? Tom yelled. And he was embarrassed, realizing that he was in a mess. -Sorry, sir, - he added in a lower tone. - I understood what. Do not worry. -We shall meet in the evening, - Holmes patted the porter on his mighty shoulder. So they calm the horse - and you will tell what they learned. I was staying at the Blue Boar on Silver Street. - Yes, sir! I'll do everything! -And one more thing, - Holmes held back the guy, who was already ready to rush in search of miracles. - Find me a shop or shop where I can buy a violin. Stradivarius is not necessary - something simpler will suit me quite well. Jokes about Stradivari good-natured Tom, of course, did not understand. However, he nodded wisely, "Yes, sir, I'll find out." On this we parted - Radcliffe went to collect rumors and look for a violin for Holmes, and we entered Moot Hall. They let us through without further delay, and soon we found ourselves in Captain Wallace's office. - I see, captain, - Holmes remarked, greeting, - your forecast was completely justified? -Yes, Major Forester had to change his orders last night, - the captain struggled to keep from laughing. - Three dozen indignant citizens gathered under the windows, who were not allowed into the police department. They were joined by a lot of onlookers and loafers. But I invited you for a different reason. Would you like to take a look at the physical evidence? - Which one exactly? - Tentacle. The tentacle of the monster Jon Skrow was talking about, cut off by a heat ray. It is stored on a glacier. I stepped forward. "You sent people ashore and they found the tentacle?" - No! He was found the day after the Battle of the Gulf. "And you didn't say a word about it?" Usually my friend is quite restrained in showing emotions. He believes that feelings harm logical thinking. But now both the voice and the whole look of Holmes clearly showed his astonishment, bordering on indignation. Captain Wallace, on the contrary, was all perplexed and embarrassed. -I'm sorry, sir, it's completely out of my head. Until I heard the sailor's story, I was sure that it was just a tentacle of a very large octopus... - And you didn't remember him in the hospital, you barely heard the story of Skrow? I don't recognize you, captain! Not to compare the sailor's story with a similar find?! Wallace sighed ruefully. So much has gone down! The study of tripods, interrogations, secrecy. And then all this hell! Come on, gentlemen. Now you will see for yourself. We went down to the basement, past the barred cells where four thugs were sitting. Their appearance expressed universal sorrow and despondency. -Marauders, - the captain of the prisoners certified. These are not our clients. Catch by the police - The thugs looked alike, like siblings. I do not rule out that they were brothers. With a clatter of keys, Wallace unlocked another door, and we descended to the tier below. It was much colder here. it was as if winter was hiding in a dungeon under Moot Hall, intending to get out in due time and claim its rights to the outside world. - Here, if you please, see. The captain hung the lantern on a hook fixed to the low ceiling and, in addition, lit a few sagging candles. On a massive marble table lay a piece of brown-green tentacle about a yard and a half long and over a foot thick where it was cut. It was this section that interested me in the first place. -Be careful, Watson! Holmes warned. -If the sailor's story is even partly true, the tentacle will be covered in caustic goo. I wouldn't be surprised if it's also poisonous. Nodding, I took the candle and brought it closer to the object of my interest. The cut was smooth, glossy and as if baked. This is how the heat beam of the Martians was supposed to act on living flesh. This indirectly confirmed the story of the sailor, which I until the last minute considered pure nonsense. I noticed that the blood caked on the edge of the stump was not red, but rather dark green. However, the lighting in the basement was bad, I could be wrong. - What do you say, doctor? -Very similar to how a beam works. There was a sergeant in the hospital whose leg had been cut off by a beam. The cut looks identical. -What can you say about the tentacle itself? - -Well, I'm not a cephalopod specialist. But from what I have seen, I can conclude with a certain degree of probability: this is the tentacle of a giant octopus. The poor fellow accidentally fell under the heat beam. Indeed, that explained everything! No mysticism, no ancient monsters rising from the bottom of the sea! Wallace's original suggestion seemed the most logical, and I had no reason to disprove it. - Are you sure, that the tentacle of an octopus looks exactly like this? Holmes also took a candle and moved closer, almost sniffing the find. I noticed my friend wince. I was no less irritated by the sharp smell of ammonia, rot and something else - unfamiliar, but more than sickening. -Pay attention to the translucent veins that run along the entire tentacle, - Holmes fell into the tone of the lecturer. -Their branches lead to suckers. And the veins themselves barely noticeably pulsate, change color and seem to glow from the inside. The stump still seems to be alive with life, despite the distinct smell of decay. I have never heard of the remains of life being preserved for a week in a severed octopus tentacle! Perhaps this is the limb of a Martian? The captain hastened to object: - No way! Martian tentacles are much thinner. They are devoid of suction cups and generally look completely different. You can compare yourself. Unhooking the lantern from the hook, he walked deeper into the long, narrow room, inviting us to follow him. Soon the light of the lantern snatched out of the darkness two carcasses overlaid with ice. I involuntarily recoiled. I have read descriptions of Martians in newspapers; a number of articles were accompanied by drawings, allegedly made from life. But they did not even remotely convey the true appearance of the aliens! The surface of the shiny brown carcass looked like a slimy mushroom cap. Almost the entire body of a Martian, as far as I understood, was a huge head with a monstrous brain enclosed inside. This body-head had a triangular mouth with a beak-like growth hanging over it, and two large eyes - now cloudy and icy. More than a dozen tentacles at the edges of the mouth - at the time I didn't bother to count them, but Holmes later informed me that there were sixteen of them: two bundles of eight tentacles each. These leathery appendages were indeed devoid of suckers and bore little resemblance to the stump that rested on the marble table. Despite the fear and disgust, the interest of the researcher woke up in me. I wouldn't mind stopping by to examine the Martian in more detail. And I would not even refuse to participate in the autopsy if I had such an opportunity. But my friend surprisingly quickly lost interest in the dead monster. -You are right, captain. The limbs of the Martians are nothing like what we have seen. I think we need to investigate your find more. The study of the dead Martian could not help Holmes solve the riddle before him. So he tried to get the Martian out of his head as soon as possible. His thoughts returned to the subject, which, in the opinion of Holmes, was relevant to the investigation. However, I couldn't figure out how the stump of the tentacle had to do with poor Jenny and the marvelous destruction of the Martians. Having taken away the lantern from Wallace, Holmes proceeded back to the marble table, and from there his indignant voice was not slow to be heard: - What kind of jokes, captain? Who changed the tentacle?! Wallace and I were right next to each other. On the table lay a tentacle that looked like a thick, glossy rat's tail a yard and a half long. No doubt it was the limb of a Martian. It seems that at the beginning of the study, the tentacle looked a little different. I vaguely remembered suction cups, a pulsing vein with a luminous liquid. No, nonsense! Of course, none of this happened. I was simply embarrassed by yesterday's story of a sailor in the hospital. -What change are you talking about, sir? - the captain wondered. -Everything is still here. The tentacle is in place. You and I went to look at the corpses of the Martians, to compare their tentacles and this stump. We have verified that they are identical. It's a Martian tentacle. Holmes looked at the captain for a long time and very attentively, and then quickly bent down and shone the lantern under the table. Of course it was empty. My friend spent another couple of minutes searching the basement, but apart from us and the dead Martians, he found no one. Opening the door, he looked up the stairs. At the same time, the door creaked so desperately that there was no doubt that if someone had risked sneaking into the basement, we would have heard him a mile away. What is your opinion, Watson? Holmes asked. I shrugged. -I have nothing to add to the captain's words. The tentacle is in place, nothing is missing. I don't understand what's bothering you. -Look at him, please. Is it the same as it was before? Or has something changed in it? I took a closer look, bringing the candle to the stump: - It seems that there are minor changes. But I'm not sure... I seem to recall that it was thicker... with suction cups... But no, it's unlikely! Where did the Martians get suckers from? I straightened up, grimacing at the putrid stench. -Excuse me, Holmes, my head is throbbing. It must be from the stench. "What about the stench you mentioned?" - As before, disgusting! I couldn't contain my irritation. "It's getting stronger, Holmes!" Don't you find that the smell has changed? I decided that Holmes was mocking me, although this was contrary to his usual manners. No, I don't! -Me too, - said the captain. Out of the corner of my eye, I noticed that there was some movement on the table, and turned around. The tentacle of the Martian spread right before our eyes, turning into a fetid mass. Soon all that was left was a puddle of disgusting brown slime. -They should be kept on ice, - the captain remarked dispassionately, reminding me of Holmes with his tone. -Otherwise they decompose very quickly, as you can see. - Come on, gentlemen. There is nothing more for us to do here. And Holmes was the first to proceed to the door. 3. Children and characters. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). We were about twenty paces from Moot Hall when Holmes delicately held my elbow. -I see something is bothering you, dear Watson, - he said. -And I'm sure it has a lot to do with our case. -I don't feel comfortable, - I had to admit. -I have never had a mental breakdown before. - Tell me more. What are these delusions? How many were there? Under what circumstances? Believe me, this is very important! I had a nasty suspicion that Holmes did not care about my health at all. Apparently, his truly amazing logic connected my mental anxiety with the investigation he was conducting. -My memory is bifurcated at times, - I began. -When we returned to the table, at first it seemed to me that you were right, my friend, and the tentacle had a different look. I even clearly remembered suckers and veins. But almost immediately I was convinced that the tentacle had not changed - it was originally smooth, shiny, without any suction cups. Now I am leaning towards this, but the quirks of false memory have not yet completely dissipated. -That's not the only dilemma, is it? - - Yes, something similar happened to me in the hospital ward, when I listened to the sailor from the Son of Thunder. I couldn't remember this guy. I was sure that two burnt gunners were lying in the ward earlier, and not John Skrow at all! But gradually I remembered how the sailor was brought to the hospital the day after the Battle of the Gulf, as he called his name. Holmes, I still remember those two gunners! They were among the wounded whom I sent by train to Chelmsford. Who has been lying in the corner chamber all these days? -Alas, Watson, I have no answer to your question. But I really hope to get it in the very near future - and not without your help. Are these all the delusions that you remember behind you? I hesitated. - There was another moment, but I don't know if it can be attributed to delusions. When I was talking with little Jenny in the vicar's garden, at some point it seemed to me that the girl. - Come on! Holmes encouraged me. -That girl, - I gathered my courage, -is not real. I fell silent, realizing that I was dressing up as pea jesters. My friend did not rush me, seeing that it was difficult for me to formulate a thought. - It suddenly seemed to me that in front of me was not a living child, but a character. - Character? - A literary character from my notes. Or even not mine, but some author unknown to me. Passing, third-rate character. Have you read my notes? You know that to liven up the story, I sometimes insert people into the narrative, which were not in real history? -I know, - Holmes nodded grimly. -I never liked it. If you take a true story as a basis, then please stick to the facts! If, for example, Martians attacked the Earth and burn people with a heat beam, and they are opposed by the army, with artillery and warships - mysticism and devilry in describing such a war of worlds is simply inappropriate! But I seem to get carried away. Go on, dear Watson, I'm all ears. -So, Jenny saw me as a character. You come up with an appearance for her, compose lines, gestures, manner of speaking. And then you see that this character is completely superfluous, that he is simply not needed - and cross out three paragraphs dedicated to her to start from scratch. That, in fact, is all. This feeling lasted less than a minute. Then I asked Jenny to open her mouth wider and say, -Aaaa!. I wanted to use Mrs. Priestley's spoon to examine the girl's throat. Everything was in order with the throat, and I realized that the child was in front of me - frightened and confused. - You have described everything very vividly, Watson. Thank you. I am sure that all your so-called "delusions" have a very real reason. And this reason is directly related to what is happening in Maldon. Is there anything significant going on in the city? I was surprised. -Ever since the Martians were defeated here, the area has been quiet - -That's the main oddity for you, - my friend smiled enigmatically. So have you found the answer yet? - There is a set of assumptions, but they do not add up to a coherent picture yet. Too many facts. I need time to put them together. Please don't rush me! When the picture is in my mind, you'll be the first to know, I promise. And now I feel that my thoughts start to go in circles. For a while I must stop thinking about this matter. Too bad my violin stayed in Sussex. Now she would help me a lot. - Crew! Captain Wallace's voice interrupted us. From behind Moot Hall came a graceful landaulet drawn by a pair of bays. On the box sat a familiar corporal, with whom we guarded the ghosts at the Liggins' house. -I see, - Holmes remarked, -the captain was about to personally inspect the progress of the study of the captured tripods. I hope he doesn't mind if we keep him company? I have long wanted to look at these machines up close. It will distract me like playing the violin. Are you with me my friend? - Where can I get away from you? I sighed. 4. American spy that my violin was left in Sussex. Now she would help me a lot. - Crew! Captain Wallace's voice interrupted us. From behind Moot Hall came a graceful landaulet drawn by a pair of bays. On the box sat a familiar corporal, with whom we guarded the ghosts at the Liggins' house. -I see, - Holmes remarked, -the captain was about to personally inspect the progress of the study of the captured tripods. I hope he doesn't mind if we keep him company? I have long wanted to look at these machines up close. It will distract me like playing the violin. Are you with me my friend? - Where can I get away from you? I sighed. 4. American spy that my violin was left in Sussex. Now she would help me a lot. - Crew! Captain Wallace's voice interrupted us. From behind Moot Hall came a graceful landaulet drawn by a pair of bays. On the box sat a familiar corporal, with whom we guarded the ghosts at the Liggins' house. -I see, - Holmes remarked, -the captain was about to personally inspect the progress of the study of the captured tripods. I hope he doesn't mind if we keep him company? I have long wanted to look at these machines up close. It will distract me like playing the violin. Are you with me my friend? - Where can I get away from you? I sighed. 4. American spy with whom we guarded the ghosts at the Liggins' house. -I see, - Holmes remarked, -the captain was about to personally inspect the progress of the study of the captured tripods. I hope he doesn't mind if we keep him company? I have long wanted to look at these machines up close. It will distract me like playing the violin. Are you with me my friend? - Where can I get away from you? I sighed. 4. American spy with whom we guarded the ghosts at the Liggins' house. -I see, - Holmes remarked, -the captain was about to personally inspect the progress of the study of the captured tripods. I hope he doesn't mind if we keep him company? I have long wanted to look at these machines up close. It will distract me like playing the violin. Are you with me my friend? - Where can I get away from you? I sighed. 4. American spy. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). Pretty soon our landolet got out of the city and rolled along the country road, drowning in clouds of dust. The road ran along the outskirts, and then turned into the fields - to where, against the backdrop of a cloudless blue sky, the fighting machines of the Martians froze: sinister statues. As I remembered, this area was called Lime Brook. - Any news from the front? - Holmes asked the captain, who was located opposite us. -London newspapers don't come out for obvious reasons, but the local ones write such nonsense that they feel ashamed of the provincial journalists. But you surely know! The captain was glad to brighten up the path with a conversation: -After the defeat at Mauldon, the Martians retreated to London. Since then, they have not made any serious attacks. I'm sure they were stunned by this debacle. Now the Martians are afraid of us, but they are preparing something in response. Observers report: At night, the sky over London glows in the manner of the aurora borealis. In the area of ​​Regent's Park and Primrose Hill, regular flashes of green flames and puffs of smoke are visible from afar. Strange lights were seen in the sky. There are serious concerns that the Martians have built a flying machine and are testing it. - God! I couldn't resist. -If that's the case, only a miracle will save us—like what happened here! - -That's why the Maldon case was considered extremely important, and you were invited to investigate, Mr.Holmes. If we find a clue, if we learn to control the force that stopped the Martians under Maldon, victory is in our pocket! -Is it possible, - Holmes remarked gruffly, -that the army and military intelligence only hope for a miracle? - Why not strike at the Martians now, while they have not recovered from the defeat? Send warships into the Thames, bring up long-range artillery, send sappers to mine mines? -Fighting is taking place around London, - Wallace said dryly. It seems that he was offended by the army and military intelligence of England. - Positional fights? Holmes stated. - Quite right. The Martians are firmly holding the line. Our troops suffered serious losses. It was decided to stop further advance and to fire at the positions of the Martians from the maximum distance. But this is strictly between us, gentlemen! I urge you not to expand on what I just told you. -Of course, Captain! Rest assured, this important information will not go anywhere further than us! My friend, in his usual manner, made fun of the interlocutor - because, by and large, the captain did not tell us anything really important. Losses? Positional fights? What could be the secret in this? But Wallace did not seem to notice the irony of Holmes, taking everything at face value. Three-legged metal colossi were already looming over us. Close up, they staggered the imagination with their strangeness: giant insects, guests from another planet, ascended above the people crawling on the ground. I looked up at the deadly machines and did not immediately notice that our landolet had stopped. We arrived at the place. The section of the field on which the Martian tripods froze was surrounded by a barbed wire fence. Where the road ran into the fence, there were clumsy, hastily knocked together gates - we stood in front of them. There was an unhealthy revival behind the gates. Half a dozen soldiers, led by a sergeant, had gathered near a tarantass drawn by a kaura mare. They were arguing with someone desperately; with whom exactly, because of the soldiers' backs it was not visible. On our arrival, the soldiers, engaged in a verbal altercation, didn't pay any attention. Captain Wallace had to remind them who was in charge here. - Everyone be quiet! he barked, jumping out of the landaulet. - Smirrr-on! Open the gate! Discipline returned to the army. Everyone was silent, in the blink of an eye lined up in one line. The sergeant ran up to the gate and opened the doors for us. - What's going on here? Wallace was in no hurry to turn his anger into mercy. - Allow me to report, sir! - Report, sergeant. - American spy arrested! - You will answer for this! - a female voice was not slow to respond, in which indignation seethed. Miss Pfeiffer appeared from behind the soldiers. Clad in an olive riding robe, the Mutoscope Man's daughter strode proudly down the line, looking like an inspector at a review. The soldiers, to whom no one gave the command "freely", only followed her with frank glances. Stopping in front of Wallace, Adele gave him a furious look. There was a blush on her cheeks, sparks in her eyes - Miss Pfeiffer was just amazing how pretty! The Amazon was very suitable for her, fully justifying its name. -Do you want a scandal, captain? So I'll arrange! Not enough interplanetary for you, there will also be international! Wallace even backed away under the onslaught of the frenzied miss. - Sir! the sergeant intervened. "She's infiltrated a protected area!" - The gates were open! Adele was not slow to retort. Nobody stopped me! Is that true, sergeant? - Yes, sir! -Then why were they closed now? - -Lest the spy escape, sir! - She has an unknown weapon! - Weapon? -Infernal machine, sir! - "It's not a weapon, you idiot!" How many times do you have to repeat! - Weapon! - stubbornly stood on his sergeant. -Like a Martian, only smaller! - - This is. - Where is your infernal machine? interrupted the captain. - In a tarantass! - R-r-disperse! Wallace snapped. Soldiers jumped in all directions, revealing a mahogany-colored lacquered tarantass to our eyes. On the back seat lay a stumbling block - part metal, part wooden box with handles and a short pipe sticking out of it. Inside the pipe, something clearly gleamed. -I told you, sir! - Compare! The sergeant pointed to the box, then raised his hand to indicate the nearest tripod. Indeed, helplessly sagging tentacles tightly wrapped around a similar device, only much larger: a metal box, a pipe. - This is not a weapon, - the voice of Sherlock Holmes sounded distinctly in the ensuing silence. This is a film camera. If I'm not mistaken, the American system "Urban", according to the patent of the Lumiere brothers. - The second model! Miss Pfeiffer said proudly. - The newest! -I vouch for this miss! - I hurried to help the girl. She is a senior technician at the New York Cinema Studio. Emeriken Mutoscope and Biograph Company. -Sergeant, have you heard of the cinematograph? - Wallace asked over his shoulder. - Yes, sir! -But you never saw cameras for filming? - - No way, sir! - From now on, this gap in your education is corrected. What I see with my own eyes and the recommendation of two respected gentlemen is more than enough for me. Miss Pfeiffer, I apologize for the unfortunate misunderstanding. This will not happen again in the future. He bowed gallantly to Adele. -Apology accepted, Captain. Now can I inspect the tripods? - Sorry? You probably want to shoot them for the film? - Yes. Are you against? - I do not mind. - I appreciate it! seems to have calmed down a bit Adele was ready to boil again. -Of course, I will take advantage of your kind permission. But I don't just want to shoot - I want to study these cars! Understand how they work! -With all due respect, Miss Pfeiffer, machines, especially alien ones, are not women's business. The tripods have been dealt with by a group of military technicians for a week now; they are assisted by a consultant. Shoot as much as you like, but we'll deal with the cars ourselves. Miss Pfeiffer snorted indignantly, -And how much progress have you made, may I ask? - -There are some successes, - the captain returned to his usual equanimity: in this he tried to imitate Holmes. You can even take pictures of some of them. Now my people will mind their own business, and you will mind yours. Let's not interfere with each other. -As you say, - Adele agreed with suspicious peacefulness. She went to the tarantass behind the camera. When the girl had gone ten paces away, the captain breathed a sigh of relief, took off his cap and quickly wiped his sweaty forehead with a handkerchief. -Watson, - Holmes asked, -don't you think that we are in paradise? - And he explained in response to my bewildered look: - We see marvelous machines - the creation of a scientific and engineering genius of another planet. A charming girl takes them on camera - the last word in earthly technology. The military is studying the Martian mechanisms, and we have the opportunity to join them. Here it is - the triumph of science, logic, rational thinking and a sense of beauty! And most importantly, no devilry and dubious miracles within sight. Isn't it great? You are absolutely right, my friend! I enthusiastically agreed. - Here you can truly rest your soul! And with a light heart we moved to the tripod. He took off his cap and quickly wiped his sweaty forehead with a handkerchief. -Watson, - Holmes asked, -don't you think that we are in paradise? - And he explained in response to my bewildered look: - We see marvelous machines - the creation of a scientific and engineering genius of another planet. A charming girl takes them on camera - the last word in earthly technology. The military is studying the Martian mechanisms, and we have the opportunity to join them. Here it is - the triumph of science, logic, rational thinking and a sense of beauty! And most importantly, no devilry and dubious miracles within sight. Isn't it great? You are absolutely right, my friend! I enthusiastically agreed. - Here you can truly rest your soul! And with a light heart we moved to the tripod. He took off his cap and quickly wiped his sweaty forehead with a handkerchief. -Watson, - Holmes asked, -don't you think that we are in paradise? - And he explained in response to my bewildered look: - We see marvelous machines - the creation of a scientific and engineering genius of another planet. A charming girl takes them on camera - the last word in earthly technology. The military is studying the Martian mechanisms, and we have the opportunity to join them. Here it is - the triumph of science, logic, rational thinking and a sense of beauty! And most importantly, no devilry and dubious miracles within sight. Isn't it great? You are absolutely right, my friend! I enthusiastically agreed. - Here you can truly rest your soul! And with a light heart we moved to the tripod. that we are in heaven? And he explained in response to my bewildered look: - We see marvelous machines - the creation of a scientific and engineering genius of another planet. A charming girl takes them on camera - the last word in earthly technology. The military is studying the Martian mechanisms, and we have the opportunity to join them. Here it is - the triumph of science, logic, rational thinking and a sense of beauty! And most importantly, no devilry and dubious miracles within sight. Isn't it great? You are absolutely right, my friend! I enthusiastically agreed. - Here you can truly rest your soul! And with a light heart we moved to the tripod. that we are in heaven? And he explained in response to my bewildered look: - We see marvelous machines - the creation of a scientific and engineering genius of another planet. A charming girl takes them on camera - the last word in earthly technology. The military is studying the Martian mechanisms, and we have the opportunity to join them. Here it is - the triumph of science, logic, rational thinking and a sense of beauty! And most importantly, no devilry and dubious miracles within sight. Isn't it great? You are absolutely right, my friend! I enthusiastically agreed. - Here you can truly rest your soul! And with a light heart we moved to the tripod. The military is studying the Martian mechanisms, and we have the opportunity to join them. Here it is - the triumph of science, logic, rational thinking and a sense of beauty! And most importantly, no devilry and dubious miracles within sight. Isn't it great? You are absolutely right, my friend! I enthusiastically agreed. - Here you can truly rest your soul! And with a light heart we moved to the tripod. The military is studying the Martian mechanisms, and we have the opportunity to join them. Here it is - the triumph of science, logic, rational thinking and a sense of beauty! And most importantly, no devilry and dubious miracles within sight. Isn't it great? You are absolutely right, my friend! I enthusiastically agreed. - Here you can truly rest your soul! And with a light heart we moved to the tripod.
Sideshow By Senka helmet. 
- Pretty, what, - said Tyunya. - Mi-mi-mi. Looks like Yesenin. No, DiCaprio. That's how I would eat it. The printer gave out an indescribable charm. A handsome man looked at us languidly. A wave of curls in the middle was divided in two - and fell down like a pair of wings, covering the temples and ears. Impeccable oval of the face, eyebrows apart. The mouth, of course, was crying out for kisses. With his left hand, the narcissist rested his cheek, pointing his index finger gracefully at the corner of his eye. On the nameless one, a ring with a large stone sparkled. Neckerchief, fluffy trimming of the sleeves and collar of the coat - light, sketchy graphics turned the hint into art. -Don't eat it, Tyunya, - I warned. - You choke. - And what? - And then. What do they write to us about the good fellow? - Oscar. Not a person, but a movie award. Oscar Wilde. Tuna thought about it. It seems that she remembered the sexual preferences of the writer Wilde. Her face darkened with every second. -I won't eat, - she agreed. - Inedible. - What else do they write to us from abroad? Besides Wilde? - Portrait. The Picture of Dorian Grey. - More? - Nothing. Nothing else, - with each sound, Tyunya's voice lowered and slowed down. It seemed that the old vinyl record stopped with the needle not removed. - Bullfinch, where is the portrait from? Why a portrait? This is a factor, bullfinch! The attraction factor of the third kind Tunin's eyes widened. It was just right to believe that Oscar Wilde in the picture came to life, changed his orientation and made an immodest proposal to my companion. He also pinched his ass, prankster. - Are you afraid? I asked. - Of the third kind - Are you afraid?! - The third one. Well, what does the portrait have to do with it ?! - Sit down! Search! - I pushed Tyunya by force to the table, to the keyboard. - Do you want independence? - D-didn't want to! .. - You're lying, I wanted to! Looking for connections! Line up! - And you? - I am not here, I am out! Sour! Dead! Flew away! -. but promised to return. - Figushki! Seek connections, I say! Tyuni's fingers ran over the keys: adagio, allegro, presto. The run accelerated with every second. I did not look at the monitor, pacing around the room like a tiger in a cage. If I had a tail, I would whip it on the sides: on my sides, on the Tyunins, and most importantly, on the sides of the fool Nyurka, the girl in the helmet. - Well? - I'm looking for. - There are three types of attraction factors. I reasoned aloud, knowing that I was preventing Tyuna from concentrating. So it was necessary: ​​far from always you are allowed to concentrate on business. They distract, interfere, and you know, break to a poorly visible goal. In recent years, I have read to music, deliberately choosing strange combinations of words and sounds. Learned to be a Caesar, to do two things at the same time. - The system attracts additional material, focusing on internal connections. Factor of the first kind: coincidence of time and place of action. Possibility. - The possibility of a personal meeting of the characters, - muttered Tyunya. - Aladdin and Ali Baba, sesame and lamp. The possibility of painless combination of storylines. Personal acquaintance of the authors. - Not enough! Dating is not enough! - Direct intervention of one author in the work of another. Leading to tangible consequences. Annoyed, I noted. This is good. - What else? - Dependence of intrigue on the material involved. Yes! Both The War of the Worlds and The Picture of Dorian Gray were first published in magazines, and then, exactly one year later in both cases, as a separate book! - Names of magazines? - "War of the Worlds" - "Pearson's magazine". The Picture of Dorian Gray - Lippincott's Monthly Magazine. Give publishers? - No need. Years of publication? - "War." - one thousand eight hundred and ninety-seventh. "Portrait." - one thousand eight hundred and ninety. - Not good! It's not even the third kind. Search! - Here! When Wilde was asked about Wells, he said: "Scientific Jules Verne". No, it's not good. Borges writes about this, we do not know if this is true. Find out? - What do you think? - Golyak. So we are on our way to Captain Nemo. - Look! Factors of the second kind: factors of the first kind with a significant discrepancy between genres, trends, and stylistics. There are inconsistencies with the source. Further: material, whose commonality with the source is built through an intermediary. Baba Fima stuck her head in the door: - Borshchichka? I warmed up. I stormed out of the nursery and closed the door. - Thank you! You are just a miracle! Do you mind, we'll be a little later. - It will cool down. A little more, I realized, and the trust earned by the sweat of my brow would perish. Refuse borscht - but what is there! just let it cool down! - and we will return to the state of civil war. - Taking tests! - I gave out the tone of Dr. Frankenstein. And pointed to the door. - At Nyurka, or what? - Aha! Can't be interrupted. Here he finishes, and immediately - borscht. - Analysis is correct. It's for health. And you came out, thank you. No need to smile as a girl is being analyzed. I'll bring the jars now, with lids. - No need for jars! - You are young. Silly. Analyzes are always in jars. Not in your hands? These are special tests. Virtual. - Yah? - I'm telling you exactly. Virtual - this is when. - You do not hold me, a dove, for a person at all, - Baba Fima grinned, showing healthy young teeth. The dentures would be straighter and not as sharp. - Vertukhalnye? This is when you do not rob your prostrate, do you ruin your eyes? - Did you have Poles in your family? Everything, I didn't have enough for more. - My mother. From Stanislav, indigenous. Lada, I'll pour the borscht into a saucepan. Free yourself, eat. I'll warm... My return was marked by the cry of Tyuni: - Bullfinch! Your mother, Bullfinch! Who introduced Holmes? Since there was glee in the scream, I didn't hesitate to admit the obvious: "I'm sorry, baby." Sinful. - Here! Joseph Marshall Stoddart, the American editor of Lippincott's Monthly Magazine, came to London in August 1889 to organize a British edition of his magazine and expressed a desire to see Conan Doyle, the author of his favorite Study in Scarlet. Dr. Doyle received an invitation to dinner at the Langham Hotel, which will be mentioned several times in the stories of Holmes. "Next!" - In addition to Conan Doyle, Stoddart invited two more: Parliamentarian Gill and Oscar Wilde. Languid, elegant dandy Wilde and huge Doyle, dressed in his best suit, in which he looked like a walrus in Sunday clothes. - Hot! Stoddart invited both of them to write something for the magazine. Wilde created The Picture of Dorian Gray, and Conan Doyle - The Sign of the Four. - Hot! -Abandon everything impossible; what remains will be the answer, no matter how incredible it may seem. It's from The Sign of Four, Tyunya! - And finally! Everyone get up; maestro, touch! It was Oscar Wilde who gave Conan Doyle the advice to turn the story of Sherlock Holmes into a full-fledged series! Dorian Gray, godfather of the Baker Street Detective! Factor of the first kind! -Curtain. - I sat down on the floor. - Tyunya, you are a genius. no matter how incredible it may seem. It's from The Sign of Four, Tyunya! - And finally! Everyone get up; maestro, touch! It was Oscar Wilde who gave Conan Doyle the advice to turn the story of Sherlock Holmes into a full-fledged series! Dorian Gray, godfather of the Baker Street Detective! Factor of the first kind! -Curtain. - I sat down on the floor. - Tyunya, you are a genius. no matter how incredible it may seem. It's from The Sign of Four, Tyunya! - And finally! Everyone get up; maestro, touch! It was Oscar Wilde who gave Conan Doyle the advice to turn the story of Sherlock Holmes into a full-fledged series! Dorian Gray, godfather of the Baker Street Detective! Factor of the first kind! -Curtain. - I sat down on the floor. - Tyunya, you are a genius.
 and I will note, dear audience, that the involvement of factors of the third kind is a direct path to an emergency shutdown. And so - nothing, we live. We wear helmets and smile.
Borscht was - overeating. Baba Fima pushed a lot of garlic and bacon into it, slurped sour cream, and sprinkled dill on top. My timid objections were swept aside - as it turned out, I can't kiss because I'm at work. Tyunya ate on both cheeks, tired of the marriage of dandy-Wilde and walrus-Doyle. Puffed up, the hostess admired us. Paradox? In any case, I had the good fortune to observe this amazing combination of moods. -Senka's brother flew in from America, - Baba Fima said without preamble. Apparently, it was assumed that we should know both Senka and his imported brother very well. - On leave. Sala does not eat, infection. Says cholesterol. Garlic does not eat, says it smells. Borscht does not eat. In borscht, they say, solid gameo. - And what does it eat? Tyunya asked matter-of-factly. - Cereal with milk. With fat free. That's certainly gemeo. Varka, my neighbor, when he walks his watchdog, he puts such a gameo in a bag. Spatula. Then he carries it to the trash: throw it away. And Senkin's brother crunches and praises. Pale, skinny, mouth like a consumptive... Eh, America, stepmother, what are you doing with people?! I already felt that this was no accident. Serafima Petrovna was driving towards something, bent the conversation into a yoke, preparing to pick up the pail. - I'm hinting to him: moonshine, huh? Apple? From the village? He made a face - no, I look, he drinks. I drank once, twice, ate cholesterol. The third under the borscht, the sixth flight. We talked. He strove all about Nyurkin's helmet. Complained about life. - About the helmet? - Yeah. He wants the same, but he can't. - No money, right? Tuna chuckled. - A bourgeois without pants. - There is money. There are no brains. That's what he said: his brains are unsuitable for your helmets. Even plugged into three sockets, there will be no sense. lied, A? -I didn't lie, - I fell off the empty plate. - There are such people, Baba Fima. They put on a helmet, start the program, read a paragraph, another, a page. And - nothing. They can't get into the hyperbook. They read letters, sometimes words. They climb everything with a ruler, measure cholesterol. It's kind of like putting on a life jacket and trying to dive. You climb into the depths, and you are pushed out. -Not according to Senka, that means a helmet, - Baba Fima drawled thoughtfully. - I mean, not according to Senka's brother. You tell me, bird-writer. Senkin's brother, who is he - happy or unhappy? . Chapter Six The Maltese Cross and the Devil on the Weather Vane measure cholesterol. It's kind of like putting on a life jacket and trying to dive. You climb into the depths, and you are pushed out. -Not according to Senka, that means a helmet, - Baba Fima drawled thoughtfully. - I mean, not according to Senka's brother. You tell me, bird-writer. Senkin's brother, who is he - happy or unhappy? . Chapter Six The Maltese Cross and the Devil on the Weather Vane measure cholesterol. It's kind of like putting on a life jacket and trying to dive. You climb into the depths, and you are pushed out. -Not according to Senka, that means a helmet, - Baba Fima drawled thoughtfully. - I mean, not according to Senka's brother. You tell me, bird-writer. Senkin's brother, who is he - happy or unhappy? . Chapter Six The Maltese Cross and the Devil on the Weather Vane. 
1. Logic and intuition. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson We stood in the shade under the bottom of the Martian machine and smoked: Holmes - a pipe, I - a Gurkha cigar. Your obedient servant became addicted to "Gurkhas" twenty years ago, while in India, and then in Afghanistan. Who would have thought that in the shop of the provincial Maldon my favorite variety would be found, and even at a ridiculous price? - Hey, watch out! resounded over our heads. The voice seemed to come straight from heaven. The rope ladder hanging from the tripod swayed, and the nearest soldier immediately grabbed it, holding it to facilitate the descent of military equipment. - It is unlikely that the Martians get into their cars and leave them in this way, - Holmes thoughtfully watched the convulsions of the technician. - In place of the Martians, I would have provided a more convenient option. Let's say a device that lowers the conning tower to the ground. The drive of this device must be both inside and outside. Without finishing, Holmes resolutely stepped towards the gigantic leg. His transition from words to action was, as usual, instantaneous. I followed my friend. A camera whirred nearby as Miss Pfeiffer began filming. Mounted on a tripod, the camera in the girl's hands looked like a dwarf Martian war machine taken prisoner by a brave Amazon. -On the one hand, the device should be protected from accidental operation, - Holmes muttered, feeling his leg with thin, sensitive fingers, like a doctor palpating a patient. - On the other hand, it should be easily accessible in case of a combat alarm. So the device is at the very bottom, no more than three feet from the ground... He knelt down, carefully examining the shiny surface. - Perhaps the device is located on the other leg? I suggested. - Everyone has it! I did not notice when Miss Pfeiffer managed to be near. -You are quite right, miss, - agreed Holmes. -Looking for the right foot is a waste of time. There are no special marks on them. Here! - Mark? - No, groove. It's definitely a cover. The device is no doubt under it. - Miss, we seem to agree? Everyone is doing their own thing! Captain Wallace also knew how to sneak silently. Perhaps, among the four people gathered under the tripod, I alone did not possess such a wonderful talent. Looming over Miss Pfeiffer, the captain swayed slightly from heel to toe, hands clasped behind his back. Most of all, he now resembled a school teacher who caught a student cheating. - Does anyone break the agreement? Adele was innocence itself. "Gentlemen, am I disturbing you?" - Not at all! Holmes and I responded with one voice. - You see, captain? Wallace didn't have an answer. He only saluted and took a step back, ceasing to sway. Holmes, meanwhile, fought with the lid, but the alien machinery was in no hurry to reveal its secrets to the earthling. - It is unlikely that it opens with a key: it takes a long time, it is difficult. The key can be lost... And where to store it? Martians don't wear vests with pockets. And I don't see a well... Miss Pfeiffer and I, without saying a word, moved closer. Adele looked over Holmes' left shoulder, I looked over Holmes's right. The captain coughed meaningfully, but Miss Pfeiffer, with true American insolence, ignored the hint. Holmes's fingers ran swiftly over the rectangular lid, whose contour I now clearly saw. My friend seemed to be playing a complicated passage on the piano. How many tentacles do they have? Adele suddenly asked. - Sixteen. It is unlikely that they use them all, but... Thanks for the tip, Ms. Pfeiffer! Holmes' fingers touched all four corners of the lid at once and pressed down. With a soft rustle, the lid folded like an accordion and slid aside like a Chinese sliding screen. A shining gutter with a gray rough outgrowth in the center opened up to our eyes. Holmes immediately pressed it, but nothing happened. A number of other manipulations also did not work. - Dr.Watson, may I have your cigar? Do you smoke, Miss Pfeiffer? I wondered. - I have with me. - So you will allow? In complete confusion, I handed her a smoking cigar. - Mr.Holmes. My friend moved to make room for the lady, and Adele, sitting down, touched the gray growth with the glowing light of a cigar. At the same moment, there was a loud clang above our heads, and the conning tower of the tripod began to descend rapidly. - Hurry, get out of here! the captain commanded with concern in his voice. Holmes remained where he was. Looking at him, Miss Pfeiffer and I remained. "The Martians wouldn't put themselves in danger of being crushed," he explained with a smile. -We are not in danger here. The main thing is not to stand in the center of the triangle that the legs of the machine form. He brushed his knees gently and looked admiringly at Adele. I did not remember that since the memorable story with Irene Adler, my friend looked at women like that! Bravo, Miss Pfeiffer! How did you guess? -Elementary, Mr.Holmes. This growth in the gutter immediately reminded me of a pile of ashes from my father's cigar. I remembered Mr.Pfeiffer's terrible Partagas and took a puff of the Gurkha returned to me with pleasure. Still, storage in oak barrels is beneficial not only for whiskey and cognac, but also for cigars! Meanwhile, the felling kept descending, but its movement slowed down. Just in case, we got out from under the tripod and stepped aside, watching how the legs of the Martian machine folded at the -knees. -Looking at Dr.Watson, - continued Adele, -it dawned on me. If the mechanical effect does not work, perhaps it is worth trying the thermal one? -Bravo again, Miss Pfeiffer! - Sometimes intuition takes over where logic fails. Thank you for reminding me of this. By the way, this confirms my assumption that the Martians are able to regulate their body temperature. The climate on Mars is much colder than on Earth. If they didn't have that ability, they would simply die here from overheating. But in order to raise the temperature so much. I, frankly, did not expect this! It is unlikely that they set this mechanism in motion with the help of cigars - rather, they touch the tip of the tentacle, causing a local increase in temperature. At the same time, by the way, good protection against uninvited guests. I choked on the smoke, coughed, and almost dropped my cigar. - What's wrong with you, Watson? -Holmes, I definitely don't recognize you! - Is it you? How do you know about the temperature conditions on Mars?! Ever since you said you had no idea whether the Earth revolved around the Sun or vice versa -Times change, my friend, - Holmes sighed. -When the Martians attacked us, I reconsidered my views on the uselessness of such knowledge. And he borrowed some books on astronomy from a neighbor in Sussex. Just at that moment, the conning tower touched the ground and turned along the horizontal axis, tipping over on its side. The lid moved aside, as if inviting entry, and the mysterious interior of the Martian machine opened up before us. - Shall we take advantage of the invitation? I have seen: my friend can't wait to start learning how the tripod works. I will not hide, I myself was infected by his enthusiasm. There was nothing to say about Miss Pfeiffer. - I hope, captain, now you will change your mind? she turned to Wallace. -Without Mr.Holmes and me, your technicians would have been climbing the ladder into the wheelhouse for another month. The captain spread his hands: - Forced to admit defeat. Alas, I am not good at machinery, so I will not venture to keep you company: I will be of little use. Perhaps the notes and diagrams made by our technicians will be useful to you? They were able to determine the purpose of some of the levers. From the clipboard hanging at his side, the captain took out a thin sheaf of scribbled sheets and handed it to Holmes. Good luck ladies and gentlemen! But when you're done, you'll have a detailed account of everything you can find out. -Of course, captain! Holmes smiled with inimitable charm as he accepted the papers. - Who dares to hide anything from the Directorate of Military Intelligence of England? And we stepped towards the creation of the engineering genius of the Martians. 2. Three on a tripod. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). It is simply amazing how quickly Holmes and Adele got used to the wheelhouse! There were six viewing windows in the walls, and almost the entire remaining surface was occupied by countless levers, buttons and helms. How it was possible to understand this mess - I'll never know! My initial enthusiasm faded. I felt lost in the realm of alien mechanics. But Holmes and Miss Pfeiffer were like enthusiastic children who had found the key to a cache full of toys. A chute with a gray build-up - the drive of the lifting device - was found in a couple of minutes. This time Holmes took advantage of the match, warning in advance: "Hold on, ladies and gentlemen!" The warning was not superfluous, because the effect exceeded all expectations. The cabin swayed taking a vertical position - the feeling was like on a ship in a severe storm. We had to grab onto the walls to keep from falling. The lid clicked into place and turned a few times with a rustle, sliding along the screw grooves. The floor trembled underfoot, a metallic clang was heard. It took my breath away: the felling was rapidly ascending into the heavens! The ground behind the porthole went down, the figures of the soldiers decreased. - Rise in a balloon, - Miss Pfeiffer drew an analogy. She didn't look scared at all. For a moment, the ascension slowed, and the cabin froze with a distinct click at a height of a good hundred feet. -What did we inherit from Captain Wallace's techniques? - Holmes and Adele began to hastily look through the sheets issued by the captain, almost snatching them from each other and exchanging short remarks, like: - This is not that. - Opening the lid. - Turning around the vertical axis. - Nonsense! Complete and final nonsense. Feeling like a useless piece of furniture, I began to admire the wonderful landscapes that open from a height. For a better view, I moved from one porthole to another. Pretty soon Holmes, tearing himself away from his papers, scanned the inside of the cabin with a gaze familiar to me, from which little could escape. -The technicians haven't found the main thing yet, - my friend remarked. His gaze continued to scan the walls. What is it, Mr Holmes? - A button or lever that starts the main engine of the tripod. Everything they have been able to use so far is powered by a simple transmission of mechanical force. "Or from peripheral drive devices," Miss Pfeiffer interrupted my friend with the unceremoniousness of a true daughter of America. -I have read every description of tripod action I have found in the press. If we discard the obvious nonsense, we can conclude that the Martians, in addition to the main engine, use a number of additional ones. - Totally agree with you. This, in particular, is indicated by references to green smoke that escapes from the joints of cars during movement. But we need a main engine! Hitherto our technicians have been like a savage who has got a car but does not know how to start it. The savage slams the door, sits down on the seat, turns the steering wheel, puts pressure on the horn. Listening to Holmes' reasoning, I leaned against the wall of the cabin - and almost jumped in surprise. A deafening mechanical howl hit my ears: -Ulla-ulla-ulla-ulla! - - And here is a visual demonstration! - with great difficulty, Holmes managed to shout down the battle cry of the Martians. - Watson, lower the lever, which you just hooked. Yes, this one. Thank you. I hurried to return the lever to its place, and the howl ceased. The echo danced in my ears for a while longer. - Where did I stop? Holmes continued with his usual imperturbability. - Oh, yes, klaxon. Dr.Watson kindly showed us how it works. But in order for the car to start moving, the engine must be started. - Holmes! I wondered. - Do you know about cars? -After I faked my death at the Reichenbach Falls, as you know, I had to leave England. I traveled a lot. While in the south of France, in Montpellier, I took several driving lessons. I foresaw that such a skill could be useful. Of course, the device of the tripod is much more complicated, but a certain similarity with the car cannot be denied. And now, dear Watson, we need your help. - My? But I don't understand anything. - You are the only one of us who has seen the Martian machines in action. Saw it, not read it in The Times! Try to remember which side they were moving forward? Where is their nose, and where is the stern, if we draw an analogy with a ship? Before my eyes stood a tripod, striding through the shallow water towards the shore of the Wyrley Channel. - On the cover there is a protruding armored visor. It looks like a flattened ship's bowsprit. The tripods moved visor forward. - Thank you, buddy! You are an invaluable companion in adventure. All three of us began to look out the windows, twisting our necks to a dangerous crunch in an attempt to see the visor. - Here he is! Adele was the first to exclaim. - So, the starting drive is somewhere here. - These handwheels must regulate the direction. - Everything converges: symmetrical arrangement for the right and left bundles of tentacles... - And this knife switch... On the walls, square windows, which I had not previously paid attention to, lit up dully. - Eat! Wound up! -Does the lady mind a modest carriage ride? - - Mail for happiness, Mr.Holmes! Your levers are the ones to the right of the switch, mine are to the left. - Of course, we have fewer hands than the Martians. -. but together we can do it! - Where is the "small forward"? This lever? - Swivel mount? I think it's him. -Come on, Miss Pfeiffer - The floor swayed. I grabbed the wall, trying very hard not to hit anything. With a ringing melodious clang, the tripod turned into a ship dancing on the waves. Trying to keep my balance, I found myself opposite the side window - and saw how I rose and fell, taking a fifty-foot step, a shiny leg, how frightened soldiers run away, how the earth, bushes and trees, jerkily floats back. We moved! Soon the tripod leveled out, and the pitching subsided. -I found the button of the wobble-compensating mechanism, - said Holmes. - I think there is some analogue of a gyroscope. Should we increase the speed, Miss Pfeiffer? With pleasure, Mr Holmes! The tripod moved faster, but the shaking didn't get any worse. It seems that this amazing machine did not require control of each leg separately. It was enough to set the speed and direction, and the rest of the mechanism did itself. Looking through the window at the fields, copses and lonely buildings, feeling the power of the combat vehicle with my whole body, I experienced a feeling of real delight! The steel muscles of the tripod sang from the energy that overwhelmed them - and my whole being sang along with them. Did I think that I would find myself in the cabin of a Martian runner, and that not the tentacles of aliens, but the mind, will and hands of my friends would control this miracle of alien technology?! But what about me? The role of a passive spectator bored me. My attention was drawn to a luminous rectangle that looked like a window - it was located under the starting switch, between Holmes and Miss Pfeiffer. What are you thinking, Watson? - There are some icons - Be careful! I beg you, don't press anything. I took offense. Holmes spoke to me like a child interested in his father's revolver! After all, I'm a couple of years older than him, and I have experience in Afghanistan. - Drive to the left, Mr.Holmes! Buildings ahead. - There is a left hand drive! The car skidded to the right. I grabbed the brass handles under the window. Luckily, nothing out of the ordinary happened. - I'm sorry. Turns out, their helms are reverse action. The tripod turned smoothly to the left, bypassing the village. It didn't immediately dawn on me that I was looking not through the porthole, but into that very luminous window. The image was very clear, but the colors seemed unnatural to me. And everything looked like it was drawn, or rather, like on the screen of a cinematograph! On top of the image, three walls of the citadel placed colored triangles. Blue - outer contour; inside - yellow; and in the center - a green triangular eye with a blinking scarlet dot-pupil. We are approaching the coast. Slow down, Miss Pfeiffer. - There is to slow down! Apparently, Adele overdid it, following Holmes' command: the car rocked again, I gripped the handles tighter, which I hadn't let go all this time - and they suddenly moved. Together with them, the image in the window moved. Now I saw the seashore: yellow-gray sandbars, barely distinguishable white lambs of the waves, a fishing launch in the distance. At the base of the right grip, my thumb found a protruding button. I pressed it before I knew what I was doing. There was a metallic rustling outside. The triangles glowed brighter, and the dot in the center stopped flashing. Now she was burning steadily with a scarlet light. Our tentacles are moving! Adele said. -Watson! - shouted Holmes. - Your job? - It seems that my. - What did you find there? - This is a window. It shows the terrain on which we are moving. I guess it's a target! I just put it into action. -And you know how to shoot? - There was an admiration in Holmes's question, which was little characteristic of my friend. Having forgiven him all the recent attacks on me, I felt for the same button on the left handle, but prudently did not press it. - I hope I do. - Amazing! Shall we do some test firing? Watson, be our gunner. Let's choose some harmless target, - Holmes looked out the window. -I like that haystack over there. It is rotten and hardly suitable for food. See him? I moved the handles, on the second attempt I found the haystack I was looking for and aimed at the target a scarlet dot in the center of the sight. - I see. - Shoot! Out of place, remembering Colonel Moran, the best marksman I know of and a villain few of them, I held my breath and pressed the left button. There was a whistling hiss, muffled by the walls of the cabin, a heat beam barely perceptibly flashed in the air, and the haystack turned into a blazing fire. Alas, I did not realize immediately to release the button. My hand trembled, the sight shifted, and a streak of fire darted across the field. The grass caught fire, the edge of the oak grove flared up, charred branches fell to the ground, and clouds of dirty white smoke shot up to the sky. Coming to my senses, I removed my finger from the button. - Well, you have done things, Watson! Holmes could hardly contain his laughter. -Time to get the hell out of here, all three of you. And then, as if the artillerymen did not open fire on us, mistaking for Martians. I note that we are doing well in six tentacles. And if you add the lower limbs, as organists do. And he looked around the wheelhouse, looking for pedals. 3. Intuition and logic. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). -Nevertheless, Holmes, - I said. "Doesn't it seem to you that you have deviated from the task set by Mycroft?" We were returning. The tripod moved quickly, but without too much haste. After the shooting, we walked to the shallows, tested the car on a muddy swamp and were satisfied. By this point, Holmes and Miss Pfeiffer had mastered the Martian art of driving enough that we could talk without the risk of biting our tongues at any moment. -No, I don't think so, - said Holmes. The answer would have sounded rude if my friend had not softened the harshness of the words with a good-natured intonation. -I object, your honor, - I smiled. -Mycroft recommended that you sharpen the edge of the deductive method on little Jenny and the mysterious house and arrow page. What are you doing? I don't think Mycroft would encourage your interest in Martian technology if he knew that you are doing this to the detriment of the main business. - To the detriment? Holmes was silent for a while. Knowing the nature of my friend, I also fell silent. But most surprisingly, Miss Pfeiffer also became speechless, demonstrating a surprising sensitivity for a woman. -To judge formally, - Holmes finally said, -then you, dear Watson, are absolutely right. I should be looking for the missing page, not grabbing the levers of war machines. The whole logic of the world stands behind you, Watson. Be proud! And here I am, Sherlock Holmes, standing alone against you and logic. Isn't it a paradox? - By oneself? Adele interjected hotly. - Well, I do not! Holmes bowed with characteristic restraint. -Thank you for your support, miss. I assure you, I— - -I wasn't talking about myself. - Miss Pfeiffer's cheeks flushed slightly. I meant intuition. If all the logic of the world is for Dr.Watson, then for you, Mr.Holmes, such a titan as intuition will rise. - Titan? Holmes considered. - Perhaps you are right. Watson, buddy, don't get me wrong. I used to trust my impulses: this is the result of logical connections that I have not yet fully realized. Okay, let's call them intuition. So, logic pushes me to search for the lost page. But when I obey her orders, I feel like I'm making a mistake. At the same time, when I am doing everything related to the Martians, neglecting the shouts of logic - by the way, Watson, her voice is exactly the voice of Major Forester! I am convinced that I am on the right track. I've changed a lot, haven't I? Get ready, soon I will offer you to do table-turning or invite you to a dinner party with a vampire! - And what? Adele suddenly said, blinking her eyes dreamily. "I wouldn't mind getting intimate with a vampire!" With a sweet, charming, a well-preserved ghoul, preferably an aristocrat. And not with some baron, who went bankrupt under Richard III, but with an earl or prince, the owner of a comfortable estate and the owner of a million dollar fortune. As Mr.Wilde wrote in his play, this is just an ideal husband! He sleeps in a coffin all day, letting you squander his money. In the evening he gets up, puts on a tailcoat - and we go to the opera to listen to Aida. At night, he, using the undoubted advantages of his body. - Drinks your blood, miss. I thought I cut off Miss Pfeiffer's frivolous fantasies on takeoff, but that wasn't the case. - Mine? Adele was dumbfounded. - Doctor, where do such crazy ideas come from? Are you a sex maniac? Half a dollar per liter, and donors will line up with us! I'm rather afraid that my bloodsucking husband will develop indigestion. You don't know how much blood does a healthy energetic vampire consume per week? -America, - Holmes laughed. - The focus of pragmatism. Give an American woman a ghost and she'll turn him into an attraction for onlookers. -Pfeiferland, - Adele clarified. We were approaching the tripod parking lot. Through the scope window, I could already see Captain Wallace pacing nervously along the fence. 4. Suspicious label. 
- Sir! I found her, sir! With these words, Tom entered the fireplace room of the Blue Boar. - Who did you find? the doctor was surprised. - Sensation? - Violin! - Ah. And Dr.Watson, tired of the events of the day, full of vivid impressions, lost all interest in the jubilant Tom. Not too sensitive to other people's emotional experiences - Tom knew such a sin behind him! Radcliffe, however, caught a hint of irritation in the doctor's mood. This was intensified by a remark thrown to the side: -Another sleepless night! - Tom at first thought that the reproach was addressed to him, and wanted to reassure the doctor, to say that he, Tom-annoyer, would leave now, and come later tomorrow to give the doctor a good night's sleep. - Don't worry, my friend! - Holmes waved his hand to Tom, and the whole prepared monologue crumbled to dust. -You have absolutely nothing to do with it. On the contrary, you are a great fellow! It's just that our dearest Watson has problems with his musical ear. You won't believe it, but of the entire "Aida" he likes only the triumphal march. Can you imagine? -Yes, - agreed Tom. I also love marches. - And to be louder? - Yeah. - I thought so. Well, let's have your violin! - Yours, sir. - Did you buy it? I will immediately return the money to you. - What are you, sir! The junk dealer Dreiser gave it away for free. When I told him who was looking for the violin, Dreiser turned green. Stands green, knee-deep in rags, and cries. Here, he says, he survived. You, says Tom, just tell Mr.Holmes from whom you took the violin. And tell Dr.Watson. Maybe I, the unfortunate one, where he will prescribe - I will be honored with eternity. What is he talking about, sir? -I'll prescribe, - the doctor promised ambiguously. He will have eternity. Give me the violin, Tom. I want to see this treasure. God, what rubbish. if I were you, I would make Dreiser pay you extra as a scavenger. The violin case looked even less presentable in the doctor's well-groomed hands than in Tom's mighty, calloused palms. Skinned, covered in scratches and scuffs, he was miserable and miserable, like the coffin of a poor man. Actually, the shape of this case resembled a coffin for a baby. -German, - remarked Holmes, ignoring his friend's frank disgust. - Such "coffins" are supplied by Cologne and Bremen. Looks like rosewood. They danced on it, right? - They cut the fish. It stinks of offal. Do you see the painting? Where is it preserved? Handmade. -Rafael, - the doctor quipped. - By order of Pope Leo the Tenth. - Brass locks. The handle is leather, someone else's. It was attached when the original broke. Staples are different. Did not find a similar one? I believe a thief brought a violin to our benefactor Dreiser a couple of years ago, Not earlier. The doctor's eyebrows crept up on his forehead: - Why a thief? An impoverished violinist gives the instrument to a junk dealer for a couple of coins. His fingers are trembling, he can no longer play, and a glass of gin is a great temptation... - No, this is not a violinist. The musician would mortgage the instrument, hoping to redeem it over time. Secondly, dear Watson, the violin is not the kind of junk you can easily part with. There is a feeling of affection, spiritual affinity. - Holmes! Didn't you teach me to trust the facts, and only the facts? What is this argument: spiritual affinity? -Alas, my friend. I'm getting old, I'm getting sentimental. Open the case, please. The violin looked like a crippled veteran. The lacquer had peeled off in places, and there were a lot of scratches on the deck. The curl that crowned the neck was chipped at the edges and looked like an ugly bump. The vein strings broke off, curling into an untidy ball. Fortunately, in the case, along with a decrepit bow and rosin, a set of spare strings was kept, but even Watson, not being a musician, understood that happiness is very relative. - The neck is elongated, - Holmes commented, turning the chair to the doctor. - The curl is quite original; In fact, it was original. Light mahogany body, most of the lacquer has come off. Watson, is there a lot of dust inside the case? - Not too much. - Blow into the resonator holes. Is there a mark on the back? - Seems to be yes. The doctor moved closer to the fireplace. The firewood crackled merrily on the cast-iron bulls, the reflections of the flame fell like blood stains on the violin. The instrument appeared to be wounded, whom Watson saves from death. - Do you see anything? - Maltese cross. -Are you sure the cross is Maltese? - - Absolutely. Yeah, here are the initials. - Whose? - I have no idea. "A" and "S" in a double circle. Below: "Faciebat Anno 1736". - This is all?! Not noticing that Holmes's voice, usually calm and mocking, changed in an amazing way, the doctor almost stuck his nose into the violin's efu: - No, not all of them. AntoniusAntonius Stradivarius Cremonensis. -Oh yes, - said Holmes. - Antonio Stradivari from Cremona. Manufactured in one thousand seven hundred and thirty-six. Tom, tell your junk dealer that he's guaranteed an eternity. The doctor will take care, I promise. Watson, is the brand burnt into the tree? - No, - the doctor has not yet had time to recover from the shock. - There's a label. Typographic label; or maybe a stamp in the form of a cliché. Fake? - Year of manufacture. Are the first two digits printed? - Yes. - Are the last two digits entered by hand? - Yes. The ink is very faded... - I'm afraid it's the original, - Holmes spread his hands. - Signor Stradivari opened a family factory in Cremona. One of the maestro's sons made the back walls, the other the front ones; the maestro himself was primarily engaged in lacquer... The family produced up to thirty instruments a year. The label you found, dear Watson, is a sign of the company. -If this violin is so bad, - Tom almost wept with disappointment, -I can borrow another one from Papa Leisman. Can you just tell me how long? "Don't," Holmes answered seriously. - I'll play this one. 5. Face in the night. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). Turning from side to side, I cursed that ill-fated moment when I decided to move from the closet opposite the hospital to the roof of the Blue Boar. The idea of ​​settling down closer to Holmes seemed to me a diabolical temptation, which, in fact, it was. Operating until late at night, I fell asleep much sweeter in a squalid rented room than now, to the satanic laughter that rushed from the neighboring apartments. Sherlock Holmes tuned the violin. When, after long torment, a dream descended on me - oh, I plunged not into sweet oblivion, but into a real nightmare. A naked Adele Pfeiffer was chasing me, rushing through the streets of Mauldon on a frenzied tripod. Her camera shattered everything around her, spewing a blue beam. Crazed ghosts danced in the beam, looking damned like the Liggins. When I ran out to the shore of the bay, I found a ship going out to sea. Least of all, this ship resembled a modern steamship - rather, Noah's Ark, overflowing with all sorts of creatures. On the upper deck, my precious wife stood with her hand on the rail and shook her finger at me. I wanted to explain to her that there was nothing between me and Miss Pfeiffer, but I couldn't get it out. Holmes, emerging from the black whirlwind, began to calm me down. He had exceptionally pale cheeks and very sharp teeth, especially fangs. I recommended him a good dentist—my namesake from the City—and woke up in an icy sweat. Getting dressed was a matter of five minutes. The door to Holmes' apartment was unlocked. I entered without knocking, intending to show by this the seriousness of my intentions. But my friend threw up his hands apologetically, disarming me with remorse from the threshold. Holmes clutched a violin in his left, a bow in his right. Really, the storm of the underworld was pale, but Holmes's teeth - he just smiled - looked the usual way. -Sit down in an armchair, Watson, - said Holmes. - I'll play you a lullaby. Will Brahms suit you? -A lethal dose of morphine will do for me, - I muttered, sitting up. The lullaby did not put me to sleep, but it should be noted that it calmed my nerves. Now that the walls were not distorting the sound, I noticed that the violin had an amazingly clear soprano tone. This was already the second Stradivari that Holmes got. He bought his first instrument from a Jew on Tottenham Court Road who traded - a rare coincidence! - used items. I well remembered how happy my friend was: for fifty-five shillings he got a violin worth at least five hundred guineas. However, the new acquisition had two clear advantages: better sound and absolute cheapness. Holmes did not miss the expression on my face. He realized that he was forgiven and that I liked Brahms. -They say, - he remarked, without stopping the game, -that Stradivari once bought a whole barge of timber. These were not ordinary logs or boards. No, these were the wreckage of the ship, which amazed the most experienced shipbuilders. It was rumored that these were fragments of the ark on which our forefather Noah was saved. Since then, the maestro has made every violin -He made it from the wreckage of the ark, - I suggested. -Alas, Watson. Stradivari lived a long time and worked hard. He created at least six hundred instruments. No matter how huge Noah's ark was, it would not have been enough for the entire legacy of Stradivari. But in some ways you are right. According to legend, every work of the maestro contains a piece of Noah's Ark. The exact location of the insert is unknown. Everything else is ordinary spruce and maple. - Nonsense, Holmes - I felt how the tension releases me. -The same nonsense as the gossip delivered to us yesterday by good-natured Tom. Remember? Badass Connery saw the devil on the roof of the inn. The devil sat on a weather vane and brushed his teeth with a brush of his own tail. Mother Lennorman found her daughter languid and in a state of exhaustion. The only thing that was achieved from the girl was the remark: -He is so refined! - Two small abrasions were found on the poor girl's neck: she said she got hurt with a hairpin. At midnight, the banshee screamed, or maybe Connery, the bastard, who saw the devil. On the ashes of the Liggins' house... At these words, I glanced out the window and jumped as if stung. A face was pressed against the glass, white as the moon, with black holes in the eyes. Long dark hair fluttered above, resembling tongues of fire. Grabbing the poker along the way, I rushed to the window, jerked the latch out of the groove, flung open the sash, swung - and felt like a patient of Bedlam. Naturally, there was no one outside except my wild fantasies. -Excuse me, Holmes, - I muttered, feeling my heart jump from a gallop to a trot. - It got crazy. You know, when you sleep little and worry a lot -I know, - my friend answered softly. - What did you like? He made me describe the hallucination in detail, after which he sighed: -I understand you, Watson. I myself do not like a number of oddities for which I cannot find an explanation. - What kind of oddities? I asked. I swear, I was waiting for anything, but not the answer that sounded: - For example, our meeting at the station. - What are you talking about? All the old sarcasm came back to me. -Don't you think the devil in the weather vane is much more unusual than the meeting of two gentlemen at the Maldon station? - -No, - said Holmes seriously. - It does not seem. Watson, I got from Sussex to Maldon too fast. Say good luck? Let's say. You, my friend, changed your mind about sailing to France just in time. Shall we write off your natural courage? Okay, so be it. Another stroke of luck was the day the ambulance train left, as was the fact that you didn't go to Chelmsford to escort the wounded. And finally, the very first Moldonian we meet turns out to be a witness to the battle with the Martians, an eyewitness to amazing miracles and the savior of poor Jenny. I don't believe in coincidences. And someone gets them one by one, like a sharpie - aces from the sleeve. All my experience is that this is a diamond much rarer than ghosts in the ruins or a girl throwing lightning. - What are your conclusions? I asked eagerly. It seemed to me that Holmes would now get a solution, like the aforementioned cheater - well, out of respect for Holmes, I will say differently: how a magician removes a live chicken from a cylinder. Alas, I was deceived in my expectations. -It's too early to draw conclusions, - Holmes shrugged his shoulders, thinking about something. -More Brahms? - No, Brahms - later. I have to ask you. Unfold that map I borrowed from Captain Wallace. And take a candle, it's dark in here. The map of England that Holmes was talking about - very, I note, detailed - took up half the table. I raised the candle higher, trying to disperse the darkness that was accumulating on the borders of foggy Albion. What is the name of the town where Jenny lived? -Harford, as far as I could hear. Or Hartford? -I know Hartford in Cheshire, - Holmes bent over the map. -It's in the northwest of England, the Martians didn't get there. It is unlikely that the girl would be taken from a safe county to a war zone. So, Cheshire doesn't suit us. Careful, Watson! A drop of hot wax fell on the card. Holmes deftly pried the wax off with his fingernail and tossed it aside, but a stain remained on the map. -Watson, you have tarnished the county of Wiltshire! - Holmes smiled, but I still felt embarrassed. -I beg your pardon - -Never mind, my friend. Just be careful with the candle. If my memory serves me right, there is at least one more Hartford in England And here it is! It looks more like a place where Jenny could have been delivered. Not far from London, west of Chelmsford - almost on the same parallel. Judging by the captain's notes, the Martians have been there. And yet... Why wasn't the girl taken north? It's much safer there! Maldon is very close - it is easy to guess that the Martians will soon get here. -Perhaps because she has relatives here? - I suggested. -Is there no one in the north? - - Sounds logical. And yet. With these Liggins you need to keep your eyes peeled. They are not indigenous Moldovans - they moved here about ten years ago. But no one remembers where. Another oddity, my dear Watson: in towns like Maldon, as a rule, everyone knows everything about each other. And here the Liggins have been living for ten years, and we have not achieved stories about them. Then Jenny appears - and also from nowhere. Okay, let's say she's from Hartford. What does this give us? Almost nothing. Thoughtfully, Holmes clasped his fingers - they crackled slightly - and walked up and down the room. Lifting my head from the map, I saw a familiar face in the window: the moon with gaps in its eye sockets. Flattening his nose against the glass, the ghostly eavesdropper was keenly interested in our cartographic research. I remember that I closed the doors with a latch after an unfortunate incident with a poker; learned by bitter experience, I did not take off like a madman, but only slowly stepped towards the window - and found that the vile mask crumbled into a flock of black spots. Flakes of ash, bats, leaves torn by the wind - whatever or whoever they were, this filth swept away. - What is there? asked Holmes, who stood with his back to the window. I sighed. - Pale face? - Yes. -I saw him, Watson. Three times before you arrived. For the first time it appeared when I managed to achieve a clear sound of the G note in a small octave. The second and third times I do not associate with specific notes. -And you, - I gasped, -are you talking about it so calmly? - -Would you prefer me to knit a poker with sea knots? - Everything points to the fact that this is a hallucination, my dear Watson. Anyway, it's not human. - Are you sure?! - Of course. You noticed, is it cold outside? Maldonian nights, even in summer, are unkind to vagrants. The face is pressed tightly against the glass, but the glass does not fog up from breathing. And I, my friend, have not yet met people who can not breathe. -I met, - I muttered. - Alive? Holmes asked. - Dead. - Well, it's nonsense. The dead are the sweetest creatures. Quiet, calm phlegmatic. Don't you know, doctor? Unless, of course, we do not take into account Professor Moriarty, who managed to give us trouble even from the underworld. Remember the fake vampire you and I caught in Sussex? I also told you then that our private detective agency. -. stands with both feet on the ground and will continue to stand like that in the future, - I interrupted Holmes. - Reality, you said, is a fairly wide field for our activities. And with ghosts. - That's it. Let them not address us with ghosts. Play you a lullaby for an encore? -Enough, - I said. - I'll go to my place. I am ashamed to admit my weakness, but at that moment it seemed to me that outside Holmes' apartments, all the ghosts of England would leave me alone. At the door Holmes' question caught up with me: -Tell me, Watson, what do you think about hypnosis? My answer was not long in coming: - We surgeons prefer the scalpel. 6. A Midsummer Night's Dream. 
Tom didn't know what woke him up. Noise? Vote? Usually, after a day's nap, Tom slept like a log and certainly didn't have the habit of jumping up before dawn. He lay holding his breath, listening to the night, and wished his ears were as musically sensitive as Mr.Holmes's. The silence was so complete that soon Radcliffe began to imagine an insinuating whisper crawling through the house. No, I can't make out the words, for the life of me. The pitch darkness that filled the house was brought to silence by a sister. You can't see a single thing, as if the room was flooded from floor to ceiling with ink. In the ink pool, Tom seemed to see strange swirls - a kind of whirlpools of darkness, walking from corner to corner. He couldn't resist and moved. The old bed groaned desperately, the obsession disappeared. Night as night, room as room. What did wake him up anyway? I won't sleep, Tom realized. He had an irresistible urge to go outside. Look around, get some fresh air. Walk to the ruins of the Liggins' house - fortunately it is very close. See how the guards are doing. Marveling at his impulse - too, the inspector was found! Tom began to dress. For some reason he dressed in the dark, by touch, although he remembered for sure that there was a candle and a box of matches on the table. It was noticeably lighter outside than inside the house. There were no streetlights on Oak Close, but countless stars strewn the sky, shimmering with scatterings of golden embers. Near the ruins, a fire burned, shooting occasional sparks. By the fire, three guards were sleeping side by side. Here is vigilance with discipline! - Hey! Tom called. Sony didn't even take an ear. Radcliffe stepped closer, peered into the pale faces, and his heart skipped a beat. - Hey, wake up! He shook the nearest soldier by the shoulder. He didn't think to wake up. Chilling from a bad premonition, Tom put his ear to the sentinel's chest and breathed a sigh of relief. Alive! At least the heart is beating. Got drunk, right? Tom sniffed the air: the soldiers did not smell of alcohol. What an attack?! He began to shake all three of them in turn; plucking up courage, he loudly slapped one of them on the cheeks with his palms. No result! The soldier's cheeks didn't even turn pink. His face remained pale and distant, and an eerie, dreamy smile froze on his lips. - Yes, what is it? Tom exclaimed in despair. The whisper returned; this time Tom could clearly make out the words. - Hurry up, Tommy - Who is here?! Radcliffe turned his head, trying to determine where the voice was coming from. A whisper, similar to the hissing of a ball of snakes, crawled from everywhere: - Hurry up! You won't wake them up... Only Missster Holmssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssss. Bring him in, Tommy. Bring me before dawn... hurry up... Tom believed. Tom ran. And what could he do if the sky in the east had already begun to brighten hardly noticeably? The door of the Blue Boar was locked. At the desperate rumble of the door knocker, an extremely disgruntled Mr.Squatter, the owner of the hotel, appeared and ordered the "drunk varmint" to get out. - Mister Holmes! yelled Tom. "Get out, drunkard!" I need Mr Holmes! Urgently! - Bolvan! I'll put you in the cold! Mr.Squatter was about to describe in detail the bleak vistas that awaited the midnight visitor, but behind the host, from the stairs leading to the second floor, a familiar voice sounded: -What's wrong, Tom? And immediately after: - Let this young man pass. Mr.Squatter, annoyed by the interference of the guest, had to retreat, and a minute later Tom was already reporting: -. they are alive! They just don't want to wake up! I did this and that. And then a voice: they say, run, Tom, after Mr.Holmes! Only he will wake them up. Unless, of course, he will be in time before dawn. - Before dawn? Very interesting. Tom found that Mr.Holmes was dressed as if for a walk, and he had a familiar case in his hand. Apparently, Mr.Holmes intended to wake the soldiers by playing the violin. -Did you see the speaker, Tom? - Tom drooped guiltily. -No, sir. - Dont be upset. I'm sure he'll show up. -Should I run ahead, sir? - No, we will go together. They did not manage to get far: Dr.Watson appeared on the stairs - not getting enough sleep, irritated and with a revolver in his hand. Where are you going, Holmes? Don't pretend, my friend. You all heard very well. Our friend Tom can't speak softly. The Jericho trumpet in comparison with it is the babble of a stream. You wanted to leave without me! -I wanted to, - Holmes did not argue. -And I'm very glad that I didn't succeed. Understand, Watson: he, whoever he is, needs me. This is definitely a trap. - A trap? The doctor's mustache perked up belligerently. - I'll remember it for you, Holmes! You wanted to fall into a trap without me! What blatant selfishness! Let's not waste time, gentlemen. Dawn is coming. - You're right. We're short on time. Already in the street the doctor grumbled: - Why do you need a violin? Better bring a revolver! -I also took the revolver, - Holmes said calmly. The question about the violin remained unanswered. What blatant selfishness! Let's not waste time, gentlemen. Dawn is coming. - You're right. We're short on time. Already in the street the doctor grumbled: - Why do you need a violin? Better bring a revolver! -I also took the revolver, - Holmes said calmly. The question about the violin remained unanswered. What blatant selfishness! Let's not waste time, gentlemen. Dawn is coming. - You're right. We're short on time. Already in the street the doctor grumbled: - Why do you need a violin? Better bring a revolver! -I also took the revolver, - Holmes said calmly. The question about the violin remained unanswered.
Sideshow Bytes with beats. 
- Pah-pah-pah! Tuna muttered. - So as not to jinx it! I responded cheerfully. - Pah-pah-pah! -. so as not to jinx it. -. pah! .. -. so that! .. And one more thing: knock-knock-knock! Knuckles on wood, for insurance. It would be necessary for unpainted, but where can I get it in a modern interior, unpainted-unvarnished? Every second time I pounded on the forehead. A joke with a beard, like Hottabych's, but now any help would be welcome.. was shaping up. Judging by the dynamics of the processes that the program threw out to us, it took shape. And Nyurka, who was quietly lying on the sofa, stopped twitching at the corner of her mouth. A thousand times "pah-pah-pah" over the left shoulder! - In the Far Far Away kingdom, - said Tyunya, - in the thirtieth state, in the foggy Albion of Queen Victoria the Long-ruling. - Well? I encouraged. The Martians are back, magic is on the run! Bullfinch, will you treat me to a cup of coffee? On the way back? - I'll treat you to tea. In a sachet, no sugar. - You goon, Bullfinch. "F-zh-goon!" the bastard printer agreed. For a while, I stared blankly at the printout. Time went on and on, turning from something indecently long. - What is there? Tuna asked. - Text? - No. - Picture? - No. - And what? - Tyuni's eyebrows crept onto his forehead. - Notes. - Which? - I have no idea. Black ones. I didn't understand the notes from the word -completely. Especially when they throw you a leapfrog of squiggles, a fragment without beginning or end - and a minimum of words to explain this disgrace. Do not take spells like "lento" and "sempre legato" seriously?! -Our conversations with you, Bullfinch, - Tyunya began with dangerous slowness. This is how the panther shrinks into a ball before being thrown, reminiscent of the dialogues of Dumas père. The master was paid line by line, the master began to inflate the dialogues. A? Well, yes! What? Nothing? Please explain! I will not! A? I will not, and that's it! Give me your notes, I'll fill them in a search engine. - Is there an editor for musical notation here? - I'll think of something. - A? - Well, yes! We both jumped as the organ blared from the speakers. Melody in the upper voice. Evenly running quarters of the lower voice. The rhythm of a leisurely step: a walk along the autumn alley. Melodic figurations of the middle voice. Sighs, supplication: descending minor seconds and descending thirds. Do you think I've been enlightened? Am I getting into music? It was all written on the next page of the printout: voices, thirds, figurations. The main thing was missing: the title of the work. Some chorale, but what? Whose? And most importantly: what the hell? The arrangement of the chorale spoke of a modern invasion. Delicately but synthesized sounds were confidently woven into the church sound of the organ. The music ended rather quickly: two or three minutes, and that's it. Not enough for a chorus. Choral prelude? Before I could complain aloud about the brevity, the music returned in a different arrangement. The lower and middle voices remained behind the organ, the upper one was led by the trumpet. The golden trumpet of an angel who rose above the world. -Timofey Dokshitser is a pipe, - the printer informed, buzzing a little. - Olgerts Tsintins - organ. J.S. Bach, Choral Prelude in F Minor "Ich ruf zu dir Herr Jesu Christ". The F-minor prelude sounded in the film Solaris, edited by Eduard Artemiev - I slapped my forehead: -Solaris! Well, of course, Solaris! - Solaris? Tuna thought about it. - Starring George Clooney and Natasha. I don't remember what kind of Natasha. No, Bullfinch, there was no such music. The error came out. - Starring Donatas Banionis, - next to Tyunya, I felt like a dinosaur. Sometimes it was forgotten how much older I am than Citizen Nederese. - "Solaris" by Tarkovsky. This prelude was used on the soundtrack. - So what? If only I knew what to say to her! -Have you ever, - Tyuni's eyes sparkled suspiciously, -didn't you want to know what was there? - - Where? - Well, there, - she nodded at the printer, although, perhaps, she should nod at the system unit. - On the other side? - No. Did not want. - Fool. Vulgar materialist. - Let be. - You're old, Bullfinch. You are skewed. And before, in youth? - I didn't want to, Tyunya. Not before, not now. Now, especially. The last thing I wanted to do was go into the details of my turbulent youth. We were led by youth on a saber campaign. - And yet, what is there? She pressed as if she knew something. -Bits, - I shrugged. - Bytes. - Is that all? - Not enough for you? Just imagine: pumped up bytes in leather jackets. Tattoos, beards, piercings. In the hands - beats. Baseball bats. They close the ring: bytes with bits. Ring around you. Like? - Yes. - But I do not. - Why? - If I were the one who knows about -there, - I also nodded at the printer, not wanting to break the tradition, -I would throw you and me to hell! - - In terms of? Tuna didn't understand. - In the literal sense, baby. After all, there is the most tsimes! Battle tripods, spells, a feast of the spirit. Dorian Gray is back! The portrait strikes back! What do we have? The drama of the closed space. You, me, Baba Fima. Three in the boat, not counting Nyurka in a helmet. No, if you throw it away, then only us. To the delight of the venerable public. Are you cutting a chip? -Knights, - Tyunya said gloomily. - Shmytsari. Jeans, hat. Yes I remember. Hey, shmytsar, would you hold your tongue, A? He would have thrown us out. But I will prescribe a pill to the patient! Her fingers ran over the keys: -... I know Hartford in Cheshire. This, - a detailed map of Great Britain appeared on the monitor, - is in the north-west of England, the Martians did not get there. If my memory serves me right, there is at least one other Hartford in England. Not far from London, west of Chelmsford - practically on the same parallel. "" Reasonable, "I approved. Geography beats magic. Geography, physics, chemistry. On whose behalf are you throwing? Holmes? Watson? - Holmes. - Fine. Holmes, as an element of the rescue system, was introduced by me in an administrative way. The program was not able to reject this element, output it to the buffer. However, the breaking-magic of Nyurka, health to her in every convolution, was also introduced under the guise of an administrator. Here we were equal. -Now get together! - I remembered from the classics. - cold-blooded not yet aiming, two enemies with a firm gait, quietly, exactly four steps, four mortal steps. - What is this, bullfinch? The new page displayed a frame from the movie. No, not Solaris. On the screen, in color, in motion, I would recognize the scene - the scenery seemed familiar to me. But in black and white, from an unfortunate angle... The old-fashioned apartment was extremely cluttered. Armchair, sliding screen. A fat bulldog sleeps under the table. Three wide steps lead up to the window; in front of the window is a globe and a scales on a long chain. To the right is the railing of a staircase that must have gone to the second floor. Against the background of the window is a male silhouette. Light makes it impossible to see a person in detail. God knows why, but at the bottom of the printout it said: -The chorale -Ich ruf zu dir, Herr Jesu Christ - was written c. 1529 by Johann Agricola. Full text: I call to you, Lord Jesus Christ! Please hear my prayers, grant me Your grace, do not let me lose heart. True faith, Lord, I pray. Grant me, O Lord, true faith, so that I may live for You, help my neighbor and carry Your word. - -Don't let me lose heart, - Tyunya looked over my shoulder. - That's for sure: do not let. I nodded: -. so that I help my neighbor. Nyurka, lying quietly on the sofa, began to twitch her mouth again. If I were a cynic, I would say that the film "Solaris" has nothing to do with it. Rather, another film is The Exorcist. In the columns, standing on repeat, the prelude in F minor was wandering. -Spit, - Tyunya ordered. I obediently spat over my left shoulder: three times. Chapter Seven One doctor is good, but two is better so that I could live for You, help my neighbor and carry Your word. - -Don't let me lose heart, - Tyunya looked over my shoulder. - That's for sure: do not let. I nodded: -. so that I help my neighbor. Nyurka, lying quietly on the sofa, began to twitch her mouth again. If I were a cynic, I would say that the film "Solaris" has nothing to do with it. Rather, another film is The Exorcist. In the columns, standing on repeat, the prelude in F minor was wandering. -Spit, - Tyunya ordered. I obediently spat over my left shoulder: three times. Chapter Seven One doctor is good, but two is better so that I could live for You, help my neighbor and carry Your word. - -Don't let me lose heart, - Tyunya looked over my shoulder. - That's for sure: do not let. I nodded: -. so that I help my neighbor. Nyurka, lying quietly on the sofa, began to twitch her mouth again. If I were a cynic, I would say that the film "Solaris" has nothing to do with it. Rather, another film is The Exorcist. In the columns, standing on repeat, the prelude in F minor was wandering. -Spit, - Tyunya ordered. I obediently spat over my left shoulder: three times. Chapter Seven One doctor is good, but two is better getting up on repeat, the prelude in f-minor wandered. -Spit, - Tyunya ordered. I obediently spat over my left shoulder: three times. Chapter Seven One doctor is good, but two is better getting up on repeat, the prelude in f-minor wandered. -Spit, - Tyunya ordered. I obediently spat over my left shoulder: three times. Chapter Seven One doctor is good, but two is better. 
1. You called me crazy?
- Lead us in the shortest way! So Mr.Holmes ordered, and Tom led. Very soon he found out that gentlemen can jump over ditches and jump over fences no worse than a well-known native of Maldon, who grew up stealing apples from other people's orchards - and marveled at such unexpected skill. When they got to the place, the stars began to fade quietly, but the sun had not yet risen. We did it! The doctor took care of the sleeping ones: he checked the pulse, lifted the eyelid of the youngest of the guards. Judging by the expression on Watson's face, he did not like what he saw. - Sentry, get up! The doctor cut through such a commanding roar that Tom already sat down. Tom sat down, but the soldiers did not stand up in the slightest. Then the doctor took a bottle of smelling salt from his pocket and put it in turn under each person's nose. He whipped the sun on the cheeks, removed the flask from the soldier's belt and poured all the water on the head of the owner of the flask. All to no avail. - Lethargy? The doctor nervously paced the space between the fire and the sleeping people. - Trans? I have seen such cases in India. Fakirs in a trance did not even react to cauterization with a red-hot iron. But for three at once? The British?! Perhaps there is some kind of paralyzing poison. What say you, Holmes? Holmes did not take part in attempts to wake up the guards. Only once did he bend low over the sleeping ones, as if sniffing the air, and then began to carefully study the ground around. Now, moving away from the fading fire, he carefully looked at the ruins. Don't worry, Watson. I think it will all become clear soon. "And you don't even look at them?" - You are an experienced doctor, I completely trust you. The point here, by and large, is not in these unfortunate people. Their lips don't smell like anything suspicious. But that doesn't mean anything, of course. I'm much more worried about the marks. Rather, their absence. -You did not listen to me, Mr.Holmes, - the ruins replied. - In vain, I swear by the first kiss. Fortunately for you, I am merciful. I give you one last chance. Leave today, by the morning train, and you will remain alive and unharmed. This applies to you, doctor, too. According to the Geneva Convention, the personnel of hospitals and field hospitals are considered neutral while they are in the performance of their professional duties. But nowhere in the charter of the Red Cross does it say that the professional duties of doctors include private investigation. You dare to continue, and I will deprive you of neutrality! -Good night, Count, - Holmes touched the visor of his cap. -Or would it be more correct to say: good morning? - Tom could have sworn the ruins had been empty a moment before. Now, a familiar figure in a gabardine mackintosh towered on a pile of beams, thrown carelessly over the shoulders. The head of Count Orlok was crowned with a dandy top hat. - Your job? Holmes nodded towards the guards. -Don't test my patience, Mr.Holmes. They will come to their senses if you listen to good advice. Otherwise, they will never wake up. But your fate will be much more unenviable! Holmes took a step forward: -I hate threats. I suppose Dr.Watson and I will have to detain you. If you voluntarily give us the antidote, it will greatly alleviate your fate. - An antidote? Fool! the Count hissed furiously. With a shudder, Tom recognized the whisper of a snake that had driven him to the Blue Boar. -There is no antidote for dark sleep! - I can inspire it or remove it as I wish! You miserable people are powerless here! -Crazy, - Watson announced the diagnosis. -You should be locked up in Bedlam, Earl. To protect society from you. From there, you can threaten anyone and as much as you want. - You called me crazy? The count's tone foreshadowed a storm. The figure of the pseudo-assistant cinematographer became unsteady and seemed to flow a little closer. Do you want to keep society safe? Oh doctor! Naive doctor! If you knew how to sew together parts of corpses, reviving the resulting monster, if you were to vivisection animals, turning them into a vile likeness of people - and then you would forever remain a simpleton Watson, fit only for ridicule! You have no idea how dangerous I am! The count's face changed. From pale it became cyanotic, like that of a dead man. The cheekbones, covered with peeling parchment skin, stood out more sharply. Like a carnivorous predator, the upper lip turned up, revealing unusually long and sharp teeth. The eyes sunk into the sockets, and there, in the terrible depths, the crimson lights of the fire danced. - Watson, shoot! Holmes's order was drowned in the roar of a revolver shot. The doctor and the count were only seven paces apart, the revolver pointed at the chest of a creature that had lost the right to be called a man. Tom was sure the doctor couldn't miss. The Doctor didn't miss a beat. The bullet made a neat hole in the count's snow-white shirt-front, strictly opposite the heart. In response, the Count only grinned mockingly. The revolver burst into flames again, and again. The bullets could be seen tearing through the tailcoat, leaving smoking holes in the fabric. Alas, this did not make the proper impression on the count. The Mackintosh flew up like a pair of wings, and in two gigantic swift leaps Count Orlok was at Watson's side, grabbing the doctor by the throat. Holmes rushed to help his friend, but Tom managed to do it earlier, because he was standing closer. He jumped on the count from behind and with a monstrous effort, almost tearing his muscles, managed to tear the hands of the villain from the throat of the wheezing doctor. Success inspired Tom. After all, if a mackintosh can become wings, then luck will give a piece of gabardine a hundred points head start! Yelling like a savage from Easter Island, Tom tried to grab the earl in his arm. So the mighty porter often calmed down his friend Jack O'Brien, when the damn Irishman, having sorted through the whiskey, tried to start a fight. In appearance, Jack was much healthier than the count. What happened next, Tom did not understand. It seems that the count shrugged his shoulders in disgust - and a crazy whirlwind whirled Tom, lifted him into the air, threw him away, onto a pile of broken bricks. The fall nearly knocked the breath out of Radcliffe. Lying on his back, he opened his mouth convulsively, like a fish pulled ashore. Doctor Watson flew off in the opposite direction, but he was more fortunate: the doctor fell not on bricks, but on the sleeping guards. Tom has heard that psychos can be very powerful. But not to the same extent? Or is it because the count is not just a psycho, but completely crazy, like a March hare? Meanwhile, the count turned to Mr.Holmes, and Tom could not believe his eyes: instead of a revolver, Mr.Holmes was holding a violin in his hands! The cheek bowed to the soundboard, the bow touched the strings, extracting the first sounds. Mr.Holmes's hawkish profile was sharpened to the point of a medallion. At least now for a coin, thought Tom. On a golden sovereign instead of Queen Victoria! The Count shuddered. Probably, he could not stand music, and the violin in particular. Swinging forward, the madman was about to throw himself at Mr.Holmes, but the bow moved more vigorously, and the count remained in place. The bow movements were mesmerizing; obeying the touch of a bundle of horsehair, tightly stretched on a cane, the voice of an old violin, clear and deep, soared to heaven, fell and spread along the surrounding streets. Tom lay and listened, spellbound. Never in his life did the Moldon porter hear more beautiful music! Well, what papa Leisman was a master of amusing the people with a jig and driving them into tears with "Green Sleeves", but papa can compete with Mr.Holmes himself? "As the last time!" Tom thought. 2. Poultices for the Dead but can daddy compete with Mr.Holmes himself? "As the last time!" Tom thought. 2. Poultices for the Dead but can daddy compete with Mr.Holmes himself? "As the last time!" Tom thought. 2. Poultices for the Dead. 
The music rocked like a boat on a gentle swell. It rolled in waves of surf, with a confident tread of approaching steps. Prayer reigned over all this, the hope of the highest mercy. Something was wrong with the earl: wanting to get closer to Mr.Holmes, he seemed to be moving knee-deep in water against a hurricane wind. The cyanotic face was distorted by a grimace, at the sight of which Tom wanted to cross himself. Someone was walking towards the count, preventing the madman from moving; someone prayed to heaven for something deeply opposed to the count. -I appeal to You, - shouted Tom Radcliffe, dumbfounded, looking in horror at the battle between the violin and the madman, -Lord Jesus Christ! Please, hear my prayers, grant me Your grace, do not let me lose heart - Tom did not know from what depths of memory this chorale came. The count did not stop trying to get to the stubborn musician, winning the violin inch by inch. Tom forced himself to move. His body throbbed with aching pain, as if Tom had been bludgeoned the day before by the entire Griffith family of lumberjacks. The bones appear to be intact. And the meat will grow, not the first time! Fingers groped for a brick, chipped at the edge. What is a brick to the count if he gets the doctor's bullets like a dead poultice? But Tom was sick of being a spectator. Perhaps, the role of the fool, and then the natural role of the deceased - and those would have come to the heart more. Holmes and the Earl were already three yards apart. Triumphantly, the count grinned; unreasonably long arms stretched forward. Tom stood up and swung his pitiful brick. Dr.Watson raised his useless revolver... Shot! And one more! Splashing black, the count's knees gave way. An inhuman, rasping howl escaped from his throat, more like the sound of tearing metal, and the count fell sideways. Watson stared in amazement at the revolver, as if for the first time he saw him - the doctor did not have time to pull the trigger. The violin was silent. -Sorry to interrupt you, - the ruins said in a thick Dutch accent. - Bah, if I'm not mistaken? Chorale Prelude in F minor? I didn't know that there was an arrangement for the violin... - There is, - Holmes nodded, wiping his sweat. - Yours? - I ask for indulgence. I am a humble amateur. A chilly morning mist hung over the ruins. Against the background of the brightening sky, through a whitish haze, similar to a rare oatmeal jelly, a dark silhouette appeared. Heavy, to the ground, raincoat, wide-brimmed hat with curved edges; in the hands, slightly divorced to the sides - a pair of long-barreled revolvers. Where an ordinary person has a mouth, a crimson light glowed quietly. Tom wafted a scent that could not be mistaken for anything else - the smoke of a Partagas cigar. - Mr Pfeiffer? -Unfortunately, I don't have the honor of knowing you. Abraham Van Helsing, Professor of Medicine and Doctor of Laws. Dr.Watson lowered his weapon: - You appeared just in time, colleague. We are in your debt. Let me introduce myself: John Watson, doctor. This is my friend Sherlock Holmes. Please accept our sincere thanks! Rising to his feet, the doctor made a sharp, military bow to Van Helsing, then began dusting his clothes. "And I'm Tom," said Tom. - I live here. - In ruins? the professor wondered. - No, it's nearby. I'm a neighbor... Not far from Holmes, the count wheezed and writhed, already not much resembling a man. Scraping the ground with his fingers, he kept trying to reach the failed victim, and Holmes prudently took a step back. Van Helzing hid the revolvers and picked up the neat valise from his boots. -No thanks, gentlemen. Sure, in a similar situation, you too would not hesitate to come to the aid of your neighbor. But what an effect! This is the first time I've seen a non-dead affected by music in this way! You almost managed to stop him. I suppose it's a matter of combining the name of Christ, present in the title of the chorale, the genius of Bach... - And the skill of Stradivarius, - Holmes barely suppressed a smile. - Stradivari? Are you talking about a fragment of Noah's Ark? Surely the sacred relic also had its effect on the creature. - Creature? How did he introduce himself to you, gentlemen? - Vladislav the Impaler, Count Orlok. - He lied. The bastard has delusions of grandeur. That's right, chick. If Dracula himself were here, it would be much more difficult for us. - A chick, a creature. Professor, what are you talking about? Holmes slowly retreated, studying the earl crawling towards him. Orlok—or whoever he really was—looked uncomfortably like a half-crushed insect. By this time, Van Helzing was finally out of the mist. The professor appeared to be about sixty years old, but he looked very strong for his age. Stocky, broad-shouldered, with large features and a powerful, clean-shaven chin, Tom thought that the professor would have made an even better loader than Dr.Watson. Let's be honest, poor Tom was willing to think about anything, as long as not about that rubbish that stubbornly sought to get to Mr.Holmes. -Alas, this is my cross, gentlemen, - the professor admitted sadly. -So many times I have faced disbelief, and even outright ridicule, that I have become accustomed to. But now you have living proof! More precisely, conditionally alive. I have heard of your deductive method, Mr.Holmes. Test its sharpness on a creature - or an earl, if you like! So what do we have? Creature, able to put three healthy adult men into such a deep sleep that they cannot be awakened by any means. -A paralyzing poison, - Holmes replied quickly. - And I, - added Watson, - have not yet had time to try cauterization with coals! - Well, you have methods, colleague! It's not poison, and cauterization won't wake them up. The soldiers will wake up when we destroy the creature. But let's assume for a moment that you're right. Go ahead. A being with incredible power - you experienced it for yourself. -His strength is really outstanding. But I have seen mentally ill people who - Who could have been stopped by Bach's chorale prelude? -Perhaps this is one of the manifestations of his psychosis! - Watson persisted. -Where have you seen the mentally ill who are not affected by bullets? - But yours worked! Holmes retorted. -We need to check: he might have metal plates hidden under his clothes. But he didn't protect his knees... - Then I ask you to make sure! Help me, colleague. Together, the doctor and the professor turned the count on his back and, without saying a word, quickly stepped on his wrists. The scoundrel wheezed terribly and tried to twist his neck, wanting to thrust his fangs into the legs of his tormentors, but he did not succeed. - Young man, give me my bag. Having fulfilled Van Helsing's request, Tom hurried to retreat to his original position - away from the count, who snapped his teeth. - Please see! Pulling out a sailor's cleaver from the bag, the professor deftly slashed the count's clothes with a few strokes. Without further ado, he plucked the rags from the bed and tossed them aside. - No armor or chain mail, which was required to be proven. Here are your bullet holes, doctor. Congratulations, you are a great shooter. Two in the heart, one in the lung. How do you think, could a person after such wounds actively act, scattering opponents like rag dolls? -I give up, - Holmes jokingly raised his hands, admitting defeat. His face, however, remained serious. The duel of rationalism with mysticism made a great impression on Holmes. On the other hand, he took the violin with him not by chance, having planned everything in advance, right up to the choice of the chorale, which means that Sherlock Holmes' powerful rationalism was of such an amazing quality that there would be a place in it for the most notorious devilry, stick the devil on the forehead with a name tag , last name and residential address. - I can explain each phenomenon separately. But all together. Yours took, professor. State your version. And don't forget to tell us how you managed to shoot him. - Well, this is the simplest. Here, as with your violin, a whole combination of factors is at work. Contrary to popular belief, silver bullets have no effect on creatures. Lead, silver, no difference. But if a silver bullet is consecrated, and not just anywhere, but in the Vatican itself; if you put an image of the Crucifixion on it, and in addition make a cruciform cut on the head. - Bullets "dum-dum" ?! Watson was outraged. - They are prohibited by the Hague Convention! "...with bits of holy gifts in it," Van Helsing finished calmly. - You saw the result. I don't think the Hague Convention applies to beings like this. But if you insist, doctor, I am ready to enter into a discussion with you on this matter. My experience as a lawyer gives me every reason to believe that I will emerge victorious from the discussion. -Let's postpone the disputes until better times, - Holmes reasoned with the disputants. - So, you claim that before us. - Un-dead! He is nosferatu, a vampire or, Simply put, ghoul! Look at his skin! On his teeth! Even if that doesn't convince you, the sun will rise soon. Dracula would have laughed in our faces in the light of day. But we are dealing with a chick that the sun will kill. - Suppose we have a really unique form of pseudo-life. And what are you going to do with it? - Like what? the professor wondered. -Put an end to his vile existence! - Send straight to hell, where he belongs! -I'd rather start with an interrogation. - In no case! Van Helsing exclaimed in excitement. "Talking to the undead is extremely dangerous!" They have great hypnotic power. Look at these soldiers! You don't want to keep them company, do you? No, to hell, only to hell! A tense silence was his answer. -Yes, yes, yes, - Van Helzing smiled bitterly. - My polyglot friend Arminius from Budapest once joked about my last name: -One Hell Think - - -He Only Thinks About Hell. - There is more truth in this joke than I would like. I swear I'd rather never meet vampires, know nothing of their existence, and quietly pursue medical research. Sometimes I fear that the persecution and extermination of the undead will become an obsession for me. But someone has to stop them?! I've been tracking this one for four months and I'm determined to put an end to it! Will you help me, colleague? The professor drew from the bag a sharp wooden stake about two feet long. The stake was followed by a heavy hammer with a short handle. - A stake should be driven into his heart. "You said the sun would kill him, didn't you?" -I don't know exactly how quickly the undead gain strength. Perhaps he has already come to that edge, after which the vampire gains the ability to resist the sun. I don't want to risk it, gentlemen! -I don't like it, - said Dr.Watson. -But the debt is red in payment. Tell me what to do. Following the professor's instructions, the doctor placed a stake on the count's chest in front of his heart. The creature twitched and writhed, but could not escape: wounds from consecrated bullets affected. In addition, as dawn approached, the vampire weakened before our eyes. He did not ask for mercy and did not curse the people who held him. It seemed that the count suddenly lost the gift of articulate speech. The creature only wheezed and whined like a wounded dog. These sounds sent chills through my skin. Van Helzing recited a brief Latin prayer that sent the Count into convulsions and swung his hammer. A heart-rending howl escaped the Count's throat as the stake entered his chest. With intonations, this inhuman scream resembled a mechanical -Ulla-ulla-ulla! - Martian tripods. Tom backed away, drenched in cold sweat. Van Helzing struck again, driving the stake deep into the creature's body. Blood spattered, thick and black as pitch. The last blow, and the howl ceased. A spasm passed through the body of the vampire, he stretched himself to his full height, becoming incredibly straight and long - and froze. - This is all? Holmes asked. - No. It is necessary to cut off his head and stuff his mouth with garlic. - Well, you have methods, colleague! - Watson did not fail to return his attack to the professor. - As for me, cauterization with coals is more humane. -The word 'humanity', - Van Helsing snapped dryly, -doesn't apply to infernal creatures. Holmes interrupted the polemic of the doctors: -Look! See how his face has changed! Tom dared to approach. Indeed, the face of the ghoul has again undergone a number of changes. The grin and the cadaverous blue disappeared, the features smoothed out. Now the earl looked more like a sleeping man than a dead man. -Then I can handle it myself, - Van Helzing waved his cleaver. Tom barely managed to turn away. -Let's wait a little longer for you to be sure, - said the professor after a few minutes. - The sun will rise soon. Young man, I see you got it. Let me examine you - you may need medical attention. - Is that you for me, sir? - Yes, yes, for you. -Be proud, Tom, - Watson slapped the loader on the shoulder. - You will be treated by a real professor of medicine! Thank you, professor! Everything is fine with me! Tom tried very hard not to offend Van Helsing. The mere sight of this terrible Dutchman made Tom shudder. Radcliffe would rather agree to be treated by the eternally drunk horseman Murdoch! Or, in extreme cases, Dr.Watson. If only not for the professor, to whom the cleaver replaces the plaster, but the revolvers - the clyster tubes! - Well, as you know. And here is the sun! In the east, where the mist-shrouded sea merged with the pale morning sky, a crimson edge of the sun flashed. As soon as its rays touched the lifeless and headless body, the count's remains began to melt and shrink. A gust of morning breeze swept in, whirled the miserable heap of dust, and carried it away. A ghostly shadow wove in the air - a stately nobleman in a velvet camisole. An unearthly peace froze on the face of the ghost. A moment, and the shadow melted without a trace. Are you sure, gentlemen? Van Helsing broke the silence. At the extinguished fire, the soldiers stirred, waking up. 3. Holmes makes a decision where the mist-shrouded sea surface merged with the pale morning sky, the scarlet edge of the sun flashed. As soon as its rays touched the lifeless and headless body, the count's remains began to melt and shrink. A gust of morning breeze swept in, whirled the miserable heap of dust, and carried it away. A ghostly shadow wove in the air - a stately nobleman in a velvet camisole. An unearthly peace froze on the face of the ghost. A moment, and the shadow melted without a trace. Are you sure, gentlemen? Van Helsing broke the silence. At the extinguished fire, the soldiers stirred, waking up. 3. Holmes makes a decision where the mist-shrouded sea surface merged with the pale morning sky, the scarlet edge of the sun flashed. As soon as its rays touched the lifeless and headless body, the count's remains began to melt and shrink. A gust of morning breeze swept in, whirled the miserable heap of dust, and carried it away. A ghostly shadow wove in the air - a stately nobleman in a velvet camisole. An unearthly peace froze on the face of the ghost. A moment, and the shadow melted without a trace. Are you sure, gentlemen? Van Helsing broke the silence. At the extinguished fire, the soldiers stirred, waking up. 3. Holmes makes a decision A ghostly shadow wove in the air - a stately nobleman in a velvet camisole. An unearthly peace froze on the face of the ghost. A moment, and the shadow melted without a trace. Are you sure, gentlemen? Van Helsing broke the silence. At the extinguished fire, the soldiers stirred, waking up. 3. Holmes makes a decision A ghostly shadow wove in the air - a stately nobleman in a velvet camisole. An unearthly peace froze on the face of the ghost. A moment, and the shadow melted without a trace. Are you sure, gentlemen? Van Helsing broke the silence. At the extinguished fire, the soldiers stirred, waking up. 3. Holmes makes a decision. 
- Gentlemen, I have to tell you amazing news. I had to radically reconsider my views on the surrounding reality. Holmes paused, collecting the attention of those present, and tucked a starched napkin into his collar. By the time the four of them reached the Blue Boar, it was finally dawn. Van Helsing's luggage, besides the bag, was a suitcase so heavy that it seemed to be cast from cast iron. The professor had not yet had time to rent an apartment in Maldon, and therefore happily proceeded to the hotel to fetch new acquaintances. Tom volunteered to carry the suitcase, shy in front of the professor. By breakfast the gentlemen had time to change their clothes, Tom alone was left in home clothes, in which he ran out into the street in the middle of the night. The dining room on the first floor of the Blue Boar, where breakfast was served, was noticeably inferior to the Lime Guest House restaurant in terms of luxury. But Tom desperately shy, still felt out of place. Food supplies to the city improved, the flow of refugees became shallow and prices fell. However, Tom could not afford breakfast in hotels even in peaceful times. Especially since he wouldn't even have a penny right now: he only intended to walk to the ruins of the Liggins house and back. But Dr.Watson, having guessed the difficulties of the young man - not otherwise, he learned from Mr.Holmes! - resolutely declared: -I treat! Don't you dare refuse, Tom. If not for you, this bastard would have broken my neck. A good breakfast is the least I can thank you for. Order, do not be shy! Well, Tom ordered. -Don't misunderstand me, - Holmes continued. I am still a realist and a rationalist. But today we had the opportunity to see that our knowledge of the world around us is limited. Let's give the floor to Shakespeare: "There is more hidden in the sky and in the earth than your wisdom dreams about, Horatio!" You better not say! I am sure that the existence of vampires, and the power with which Jenny stopped the Martians, has a completely scientific explanation. It's just that our science hasn't found it yet. So, I made significant adjustments to my views on the world. Now I understand why so far there has been so little progress in the investigation entrusted to me. In the future, I will take into account factors and phenomena that until now I considered impossible, and therefore non-existent. To persist in delusions is a great folly. "Good speech," said the professor, pulling a bowl of pudding toward him. -Even a wise man can err. By the way, what is this story with the girl and the Martians? On the way, the most bizarre rumors reached me, but I would like to hear a more reliable version. Frankly, I am very interested in the Martians and everything connected with them. -Let me guess, - Holmes smiled with one corner of his lips. - You drew parallels between what is known about the Martians and the vampires you are familiar with. As a result, you have found a number of undoubted analogies. Chief among them: both of them are non-human beings that feed on human blood. Bravo, Mr Holmes! I understand that there are a number of significant differences between them - the structure of the body, and the fact that Martians are not affected by sunlight. Although, I must say, the most powerful vampires are also insensitive to it. But this is particular! So it occurred to me: what if the Martians can be influenced by the same means as the non-dead? Smell of garlic? Holy gifts? Crucifixes? - Aspen stakes? said Doctor Watson. - Thank you Doctor! And don't forget the blessed silver bullets! I have officially asked your military to provide me with a captured Martian, or at least a corpse for study. But they refused, and in a very rude manner. Downcast, Van Helsing reached into his pocket for a cigar. Tom imagined the Pope in the Vatican personally consecrating boxes of bullets, and the cardinals, armed with files, making cross-shaped incisions on the bullet heads. No, they won't. There are many bullets, but the Pope is one. Although if you include honest Anglican bishops, starting with the Archbishop of Canterbury. - I understand the military, - nodded Watson. - Without today's impressive demonstration, I would also have reacted to your request. Let's just say: without proper attention. -But I was only asking for a prisoner! - At least the body! Believe me, I did not make any rash statements. I'm a scientist, not some irresponsible adventurer! Van Helsing took a puff on his cigar, but without much pleasure. - Do you really like Partagas? Holmes asked. - Not too much. But this is the only variety that vampires don't smell. I found this out empirically, but did not find a clear explanation for this fact. So what about the events in Maldon? Holmes and Dr.Watson began the story. Tom chewed on his favorite bacon and eggs without tasting it. This is probably how vampires inhale the smoke of the Partagas. As it is customary to write in novels, Tom was all ears - Holmes told the story already known to Tom in such a smooth manner. It would seem that familiar events, but take Mr.Holmes and twist everything so that the incomprehensible becomes clear. But the clear - on the contrary, incomprehensible! -. alas, the girl experienced a strong nervous shock, - Holmes summed up. She can't really say anything. -To awaken such crushing powers, knowledge is needed that a child cannot possess! - the professor objected. -It's the same as if a child single-handedly made a huge cannon and a projectile for it, aimed the cannon at the target and fired a shot. No, that is absolutely impossible! Behind the Moldonian events is someone else, much more experienced in the secret sciences. -But if the cannon is already built and loaded, - Watson intervened, spreading oil on a toast, -a child can put it into action: pull the starting cord or set fire to the fuse. The doctor seems to have gotten into the habit of arguing with the professor. - Exactly! exclaimed Holmes enthusiastically. He ate little, but finished his third cup of coffee. -Thank you, my friend. You've given a very good analogy. In the hands of Jenny fell, as you aptly put it, a starting cord, and she pulled him. Small as Jenny is, she might be able to tell us who gave her the mysterious cord. I do not rule out that the cord was a leaf from the book that interested my brother so much. But, alas, the condition of the girl does not allow us - What if we try hypnosis? the professor interrupted Holmes in agitation. He, sentimental as all Dutchmen, took Jenny's story to heart. -In a hypnotic trance, patients remember things that they cannot remember when they are awake! - - Hypnosis? Holmes and Watson looked at each other doubtfully. The doctor shrugged his shoulders: -Unfortunately, neither I nor my friend are proficient in hypnosis techniques. -But, - Van Helzing smiled, -your obedient servant is fluent in them! - Tom nearly choked on his smile. 4. Portrait in the living room of the vicar who gave her the mysterious cord. I do not rule out that the cord was a leaf from the book that interested my brother so much. But, alas, the condition of the girl does not allow us - What if we try hypnosis? the professor interrupted Holmes in agitation. He, sentimental as all Dutchmen, took Jenny's story to heart. -In a hypnotic trance, patients remember things that they cannot remember when they are awake! - - Hypnosis? Holmes and Watson looked at each other doubtfully. The doctor shrugged his shoulders: -Unfortunately, neither I nor my friend are proficient in hypnosis techniques. -But, - Van Helzing smiled, -your obedient servant is fluent in them! - Tom nearly choked on his smile. 4. Portrait in the living room of the vicar who gave her the mysterious cord. I do not rule out that the cord was a leaf from the book that interested my brother so much. But, alas, the condition of the girl does not allow us - What if we try hypnosis? the professor interrupted Holmes in agitation. He, sentimental as all Dutchmen, took Jenny's story to heart. -In a hypnotic trance, patients remember things that they cannot remember when they are awake! - - Hypnosis? Holmes and Watson looked at each other doubtfully. The doctor shrugged his shoulders: -Unfortunately, neither I nor my friend are proficient in hypnosis techniques. -But, - Van Helzing smiled, -your obedient servant is fluent in them! - Tom nearly choked on his smile. 4. Portrait in the living room of the vicar the girl's condition does not allow us... - What if we try hypnosis? the professor interrupted Holmes in agitation. He, sentimental as all Dutchmen, took Jenny's story to heart. -In a hypnotic trance, patients remember things that they cannot remember when they are awake! - - Hypnosis? Holmes and Watson looked at each other doubtfully. The doctor shrugged his shoulders: -Unfortunately, neither I nor my friend are proficient in hypnosis techniques. -But, - Van Helzing smiled, -your obedient servant is fluent in them! - Tom nearly choked on his smile. 4. Portrait in the living room of the vicar the girl's condition does not allow us... - What if we try hypnosis? the professor interrupted Holmes in agitation. He, sentimental as all Dutchmen, took Jenny's story to heart. -In a hypnotic trance, patients remember things that they cannot remember when they are awake! - - Hypnosis? Holmes and Watson looked at each other doubtfully. The doctor shrugged his shoulders: -Unfortunately, neither I nor my friend are proficient in hypnosis techniques. -But, - Van Helzing smiled, -your obedient servant is fluent in them! - Tom nearly choked on his smile. 4. Portrait in the living room of the vicar - Hypnosis? Holmes and Watson looked at each other doubtfully. The doctor shrugged his shoulders: -Unfortunately, neither I nor my friend are proficient in hypnosis techniques. -But, - Van Helzing smiled, -your obedient servant is fluent in them! - Tom nearly choked on his smile. 4. Portrait in the living room of the vicar - Hypnosis? Holmes and Watson looked at each other doubtfully. The doctor shrugged his shoulders: -Unfortunately, neither I nor my friend are proficient in hypnosis techniques. -But, - Van Helzing smiled, -your obedient servant is fluent in them! - Tom nearly choked on his smile. 4. Portrait in the living room of the vicar. 
No, don't ask! Widow Priestley was outraged. What is there! she was furious. On her list of defiantly immoral suggestions, the idea of ​​hypnotizing a little girl came in second, strictly between Satan worship and ankle-length skirts. Perhaps Satan was even located closer - the pious housekeeper of the vicar poorly understood the meaning of the word "hypnosis", supplying it with signs of a black mass. -Over my dead body! - After a wild night out, Tom wouldn't be surprised if Mr.Holmes—and especially Professor Van Helzing—was there! - the proposal of the widow. Afraid of rashly blurting out too much, the porter got up from the table and stepped aside, under the apple tree. They hadn't been treated to cider today, and in vain: Tom's throat was dry, and he was embarrassed to ask Mrs. Priestley a favor. From here he could clearly see the windows of the left wing of the house, part of the living room - and vicar Simpson on a stepladder. Swinging the hammer, shaking his hand every other time and blowing on his bruised fingers, the vicar tried to drive a couple of long nails into the wall. Below, a portrait in a gilded frame was waiting for its turn. - Mrs. Priestley! My friend Watson is a doctor! The Honorable Mr.Van Helsing is Professor of Medicine. And after that you are able to reproach us. - Capable! And I blame you! Neither a dress with a lace collar nor a cap could hide the transformation of a widow from a kind grandmother into a wild fury. If the gentlemen dared to break through to Jenny by force, the battle with the count would seem to them like an evening walk over the river. - You are unfair. Our plan is absolutely safe. Moreover, it will have a beneficial effect on little Jenny. - The tempter was also affectionate with Eve! - Mrs. Priestley! - Never! The vicar did not want to go out to the guests. Tom watched as, having finished with the nails, Reverend Simpson hangs a portrait on the wall. From the canvas, partly distorted by the pane of the window, Tomu grinned at the most attractive dandy. The word "dandy" Tom had heard from papa Leisman - that's how papa used to tease red-headed Eddie, the youngest of Griffith's lumberjacks - and sincerely considered it a substitute for the word "handsome". Angel, thought Tom. Well, purely for you, an angel, only without wings. Indeed, in the appearance of the young man depicted in the portrait, there was something heavenly, full of secret virtue. - Like? Mr Holmes asked. Leaving the doctor and the professor to persuade the obstinate widow, he silently approached Tom. "Yeah," Tom nodded. Not for a moment did Radcliffe doubt that Mr.Holmes was talking about the portrait. About what else? -I think I recognize the brush, - Holmes reasoned aloud. Gesticulating, he seemed to be stroking a painting from afar, checking the quality by touch. George Hayter? No, Hayter wrote fresh. Basil Hallward? Of course, Hallward! Isn't this the portrait our energetic Mr.Pfeiffer is after? Tom, buddy, do you know how long ago Reverend Simpson got this masterpiece? "Recently," Tom answered confidently. See, he hangs it on the wall. So I bought it the other day. Mr.Holmes threw up his hands: -Tom! Scotland Yard is crying for you! You would be a better inspector than even Lestrade. But why don't you admit that the portrait has been in the possession of the vicar for many years? Let's say it used to hang in the bedroom, but now the owner decided to hang it. - In the bedroom? Tom wondered. - And what? -The portrait of a man in the bedroom of his reverend?! -Yes, - Holmes admitted ruefully. - I messed up here. Well, the vicar's portrait was acquired recently. Did you bring it from London? If so, this happened even before the landing of the Martians. -After, - said Tom. -His Reverend took the portrait from Dreiser's junk dealer. From the person who gave you the violin, sir. -A Stradivarius violin? - A portrait by Hallward? Tom, your junk dealer is a branch of the Louvre! Where did he get this portrait from? Someone brought in a deposit? I'm sure Mr.Dreiser works part-time as a usurer -It's a portrait from the Liggins' estate, sir. When their house burned down... Tom stopped talking. At first he did not believe himself. The lips, tongue, and larynx seemed to take on a life of their own, uttering the devil knows what. But the memory immediately cleared up, restoring peace of mind. As clearly as if it had happened yesterday, Tom remembered seeing the portrait in the hall of the Liggins' house. Well, yes, it hung just below the deer antlers mounted on an oak shield. Balthazar Liggins invited Tom to help haul the new closet up to the second floor. Tom lifted the cupboard alone, chuckling as Mr.Liggins bustled around complaining of pain in his lower back. As he walked up the stairs, looking like a turtle in a shell, Radcliffe clearly saw the portrait - a dandy, an angel without wings, smiling out of the corner of his mouth at the loader. Mr.Liggins, noticing Tom's interest, also said that the portrait had been sent to him by relatives from London. It seems that Mr.Holmes noticed the interlocutor's hesitation: - Are you sure, Tom? - Yes, sir. I saw this portrait myself at the Liggins' house. - When? Tom didn't answer right away. When did he drag the damn closet? - The other day? Holmes insisted. - In the spring? Last year? -Last year, - Tom breathed with relief. - Right? -Without a doubt, sir. So you said: -last year - - and I remembered everything. Last fall, in November. -So, as soon as I said - -Thank you, sir. My head doesn't boil at all. -Soldiers, - the widow Priestley intervened, - demolished all the remains of the Liggins' property in the pantry of Dreiser. Captain Wallace had it kept until further notice, or even sold for poor Jenny. His reverend took the portrait in payment of a debt. - What debt? Holmes asked. The widow pursed her lips. She seemed to disapprove of the vicar's behaviour. -His Reverend thinks he's spent heavily on Jenny. A new dress, shoes. He says that a girl is more voracious than a pig. And then, you can put a pig in the fall for sausages, but where will you put an orphan? Lie! Jenny pecks like a bird. I hinted to his reverend that the portrait was worth a lot of money, much more than the cost of a pretty baby, but his reverend stamped his feet on me. He said he didn't want to hear anything. That will fire me without a recommendation if I don't shut up now. The portrait has bewitched him, gentlemen, take my word for it! So you swear by the name of God that hypnosis will do the child good? -I swear, - said Professor Van Helsing firmly. His oath was drowned out by the alarm sounding from St. Peter's Church. It was just right to believe that Peter, the heavenly keykeeper, who denied Christ three times in one night, did not approve of the Dutch vampire hunter's oath. 5. Riding a wild bull. 
From Dr.Watson's Notes I had a deja vu attack. - Mister Holmes! Dr.Watson! The rumble of wheels and the clatter of hooves approached rapidly around the bend. The echo of the bells was still in the air when a familiar chariot, drawn by a snoring horse, almost toppled over from the High Street. - Mister Holmes! Dr.Watson! - We are here! my friend shouted back. I opened the gate wide, and we both ran out into the street. The driver tugged hard on the reins, bringing the carriage to a halt a couple of yards from Holmes. Only now, shamefully belatedly, did I recognize the voice calling to us. The tarantas was ruled by Adele Pfeiffer! - Good morning, Miss Pfeiffer. What's happened? - Martians! Did they take New York? - They're coming here! More like a tarantass! I stood next to Holmes: - What are you up to, miss? We must stop them! Protect the city! -Are you inviting us to fight the Martians? - Are you out of your mind? -Only the three of us can operate the tripod! - -Miss Pfeiffer is right, - Holmes nodded. Artillery can't deal with them. - Holmes, you. - I know, my friend. I am arrogant and selfish. Let's go! - Let me at least sit on the goats. - I hinted, but Adele glared at your humble servant like a cat: - There is no time! - Professor, Tom! Look after Jenny! Holmes was already climbing into the tarantass. I just had to follow his example. Adele took hold of the reins, whipped the horse, turning the carriage around, and we turned onto the cobbled Mill Road. The tarantass bounced desperately on the bumps, the wheels rumbled so that it seemed they were about to fall off. A two-wheeler rushed towards us. She swayed from side to side, as if both the driver and the horse were drunk in smoke. We barely managed to pass. People hid in their houses, shutters and locked doors banged. As if these ridiculous precautions could keep the hosts away from the heat ray of the Martians! The tarantass turned onto Cross Road, and from there onto Fembridge Road. Miss Pfeiffer knew her way around the city superbly, but she drove mercilessly at the same time. The carriage skidded around corners and I nearly fell out twice; fortunately Holmes held my sleeve in time. -Now I know what a rodeo is, - he said as we pulled out of town onto a dirt road and we could talk without biting our tongues. -I suppose riding a wild bull is much safer. -The Martians are moving from the southwest, from London, - Adele turned her head slightly, continuing to watch the road, which was not superfluous at all. The wind in my face carried the words away, I could hardly make out the meaning of Miss Pfeiffer's speech. -I was visiting Captain Wallace, making arrangements for filming, and then the orderly ran in. Five tripods were spotted just north of Wickford. The fenced area of ​​the field, where the captured Martian vehicles stood, was rapidly approaching. This time the gates were open, and our tarantass, without slowing down, flew inside the fence. The soldiers splashed in all directions, cursing words unworthy of the British military. With a squeal so piercing that I was almost deafened, Miss Pfeiffer abruptly reined in her horse. The unfortunate animal's hooves dug up the turf, and the tarantass stopped next to the tripod. The colossus remained in the same position in which we left it yesterday: legs folded, lid thrown back, the edge of the tilted conning tower touching the ground. It seems that the guards had no idea what danger was coming to Maldon. In any case, military preparations were not noticeable. - Martians! I shouted. Here come the Martians! To battle! In confirmation of the above, gun rumbles were heard from the southwest. - Everything from the tripod! Holmes commanded, climbing into the wheelhouse. We'll try to stop them. Adele, ahead of us, was already hosting inside. - Matches! I froze as I remembered that I had left my matches on the table in the Blue Boar's dining room. But Holmes silently produced a box of Bryant & May from his pocket. - Hold on! The thermal actuator worked even faster than the previous time. Remembering yesterday's oversight with the sound signal, I looked in advance for something to grab on to, fearing to start some other mechanism. Everything repeated: the trembling of the floor under your feet, the metallic rustle of the lid, the melodious ringing in the depths of the cabin - and the rapid ascension to heaven, from which it takes your breath away. - In places! - There are places! The starting switch clicked, there was a buzzing downstairs. I stepped to the brass grips, pressed the right button, activating the scope. Watson, are you ready? - The scope is working. But I don't see the purpose. - U-turn "face" to the southwest! - There is a turn! The tripod rocked, the image in the window began to move quickly to the side. I clung to the handles, trying to level the picture and not fall at the same time. The tops of pine trees flashed by, a piece of sky, a broken line of the horizon, some buildings, barely visible in the distance. It seemed to me that I felt our tripod stepping over with its feet, catching its balance and taking up a comfortable position. I moved and examined the field of the upcoming battle - we became one with the machine! It was an absolutely indescribable, exciting feeling! Miss Pfeiffer laughed like a Valkyrie, -So what were you talking about riding a wild bull? - The car froze. - Reversal completed! - Watson, do you see them? I hesitated with an answer, tossing the handles in search of the enemy. Finally, at the limit of visibility, I made out a vague movement. In the distance, one after another, gray balls of tears swelled up. Something moved in the smoke, approaching us. - There they are! -I see, - said Holmes. - Watson, try to aim. "I'm trying," I muttered, not too politely. One...two...three... Five shiny "spiders" strode purposefully through the fields and copses towards Maldon. They looked harmless and even funny. They were followed by two batteries, but the Martians did not linger to destroy the gunners. They passed by, leaving the shelling. The tripods moved so fast that the gunners did not have time to take the amendment. The shells exploded in vain, without harming the Martians. I must say that I faced the same problem. The combat vehicles moved at high speed - and I did not have time to aim at them a scarlet dot in the center of the sighting window. -It doesn't work, - I admitted. -Keep aiming, - Holmes ordered, -but only shoot for sure. We must not miss the chance, we will not be given a second one. Take aim - warn. After the shot, we will have to maneuver. - There is a warning! I was at war again. Where did twenty peaceful years go?! - We would have such machines in Afghanistan! Forgetting myself, I said it out loud. - Watson, can you quickly move the sight to another target, and then just as quickly return it back? my friend suddenly asked. Instead of answering, I sharply turned both handles to the left and caught sight of a lone pine tree on the shore. Outside, the tripod's tentacles rustled, turning the ray apparatus. Wasting no time, I jerked the handles back: a couple of seconds, and the Martians returned to the sight window. - Yes I can. - Great! I think I know how to distract the Martians from the city. I ask you to follow my commands without asking anything. Our lives depend on it - and the lives of hundreds of Moldovans. Ready? - Ready! - Yes, sir! -Middle forward, Miss Pfeiffer! - With a melodic chime of the joints, our machine moved from its place and rushed towards the Martians.
Sideshow Wells, but not the one. 
- Publisher? -Archibald Constable and company! - - Year of first edition? One thousand eight hundred and ninety-seven! Circulation - three thousand. - "War of the Worlds", book - ninety-eighth. Journal publication - ninety-seventh. Tamara and I go as a couple... - And if by the time of action? Wells has the 900th Wells made a mistake with the great opposition of Mars and Earth. For two years. Whatever one may say, the ninety-eighth. Factor of the first kind. Is there a personal acquaintance between Bram Stoker and HG Wells? - No. - With Conan Doyle? - Yes. After Stoker moved to London. Conan Doyle's play "Waterloo" was staged by Bram Stoker at the Lyceum Theatre. Option: someone else staged, and Stoker, as director of the theater, bought the rights to the play. On the seventieth birthday of Queen Victoria, Waterloo was played at the Lyceum with a large crowd of people. - In what year? - Now. One thousand eight hundred and ninety-seven! Tutelka in tyutelka! Year of the first edition of Dracula! On the 25th of June... - I understand that this is already paranoia... Oscar Wilde? - Yes. - Are you familiar? -Not just acquaintances. Wilde was in love with Florence Balkham, wife of Bram Stoker. Stop! How is it - in love? Wilde... - Well, you never know? And the old woman is a hole. - And yet. - Tyunya! I understand that the love of someone else's wife does not really outrage you. - Horsham! - What is Horsham? - The town near which the Martians landed! - So what? - Horsham is mentioned in Conan Doyle's story "Vampire in Sussex"! There is both Holmes and Watson... - Nonsense! Cold! From the outside, we looked like psychos. Violently mad regulars Saburova dacha. There was a great hunt hunt for Count Dracula. The vampire, the bastard, slipped away. Desperate, we tried to net his literary father, the Irishman Bram Stoker. Here the successes were thicker: the connections were clearly traced. And it all started - do not believe it! - from Alexander Blok. Poets, they climb into the first row.
- ... I read The Vampire - Count Dracula. I read for two nights and was desperately afraid. Then I also understood the depth of this, regardless of literary style, etc. I wrote a commemorative article about Tolstoy in Runo under the influence of this story. This is a wonderful and inexhaustible thing, I thank you for making me finally read it. "
This gave us a cunning printer. Fortunately for us, there was a clarification under the quote: -A. A. Blok from a letter to E. P. Ivanov, his close friend. September 3, 1908." At first I thought it was a coincidence. Minor bug in the system. But the very next page revealed to me the friendly face of his most dead excellency, the Transylvanian bloodsucker. The printer was buzzing, the count was moving sideways. I recognized a few portraits: footage from the silent black-and-white old man Nosferatu, then from a later film by Coppola, where, in addition to Gary Oldman as Dracula, Anthony Hopkins was thrown to me as Professor Van Helsing. The rest was freelance work: the top hat, the stand-up collar, the sensual mouth, the demonic gaze. Fangs, oddly enough, were rare. But the poet Blok returned. The printer made me happy with the information that Blok's article "The Sun over Russia" is apparently the one which is about Tolstoy - told about the vampiric forces that always lurk in the history of Russia and lie in wait for its best people. I imagined Lev Nikolayevich, fleeing from Yasnaya Polyana from the persecution of vampires, and realized that I wanted to go on vacation. I was also informed that, according to V. Tsymbursky, the author of the article -Count Dracula, the Philosophy of History and Sigmund Freud, Blok's impressions from reading the novel -Dracula - were reflected in the cycle of poems -Black Blood. - Bullfinch! There is Wells! Wells and Stoker! - Where? - In Karaganda! In 1937, Wells and producer Houseman organized their own entreprise - "Mercury Theater". In 1938, the Mercury Theater began performing weekly radio plays on CBS. The radio theater opened with a production of Bram Stoker's Dracula. Soon Wells carried out a radio play based on the novel "War of the Worlds", making a parody of a radio report from the scene. - Tyunya! - Of the six million people who listened to the broadcast, one million believed in the reality of what was happening. There was a mass panic. - Tyunya, my sun! This is not the Wells! - What else is not the one ?! It's Orson Welles! American! Namesake! - You're lying! - Orson Welles made a radio show based on the novel by H. G. Wells "The War of the Worlds", putting the whole state of New Jersey on the ears. - It's a pity. And I'm looking: Wells. - You'd better look at this: Blok, "Black Blood". - Eat: - Orson Welles made a radio show based on the novel by H. G. Wells "The War of the Worlds", putting the whole state of New Jersey on the ears. - It's a pity. And I'm looking: Wells. - You'd better look at this: Blok, "Black Blood". - Eat: - Orson Welles made a radio show based on the novel by H. G. Wells "The War of the Worlds", putting the whole state of New Jersey on the ears. - It's a pity. And I'm looking: Wells. - You'd better look at this: Blok, "Black Blood". - Eat:
I know I drank your blood... I put you in a coffin and sing, - On a misty night about a gentle spring Your blood will sing in me! - That's a dirty trick. - Save? - Well, to hell with him! The block was just not enough for us. The magic was returning. Magic struck back. In obedience to the demands of the -breaking - infection, the program dragged, like a child from the table, everything that came to hand. Fortunately, things have not yet reached the factors of the third kind. Connections were traced; besides, I felt in my ass that there was a strong substantive connection between "Dracula" and "War of the Worlds" - a frontal linkage that I had not yet seen. -Blood, - Tyunya said suddenly. - Your blood will sing in me! I tensed: her voice had changed so much. -Your blood is in me, - she repeated. - Well? I asked cautiously. Instead of answering Tyunina, her fingers gave out a powerful crescendo on the keyboard.
- ... such was the organism of a Martian. It may seem strange to us that the Martians showed absolutely no signs of a complex digestive apparatus, which is one of the main parts of our body. They consisted of only one head. They didn't have viscera. They did not eat, did not digest food. Instead, they took the fresh living blood of other organisms and injected it into their veins. I have seen them do it myself and will mention it in due time. The feeling of disgust prevents me from describing in detail what I could not even look at. The fact is that the Martians, injecting themselves with a small pipette of blood, in most cases human, took it directly from the veins of a still living creature. "
- You are a genius, - I admitted with feeling. Martians are vampires. And I, the fool, am racking my brains... Tyunya straightened up: - What do you think, Bullfinch... Will they track us the same way? At first I thought she was a little crazy. Another one burned down at work -In a hundred years, - Tyunya looked into my eyes without looking up. - Someone. Somewhere. Imagine, he will keep track of connections: did we know each other, in what year did our first editions come out, what did you advise me at a friendly party. - At a corporate booze, - I corrected. - Calm down, friend. Nobody will follow us. - Why? - The snout did not come out. It hurts a lot of honor. Chapter Eight The crew of the combat vehicle. 
1. A stranger among his own. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson - We take to the left, - Holmes commanded. The Martians were fast approaching. Shining armored colossi purposefully strode across the green fields like three-legged cranes across a swamp overgrown with duckweed. Noticing our maneuver, they slowed down, and I managed to catch the lead car in sight. -Ready to fire, - I said. - Wait, Watson! I'll tell you when to shoot. - Holmes? - What? "Don't you think our ship needs a name?" To go into battle on a nameless vessel is unworthy of the British! And the Americans! Miss Pfeiffer added. Watson, you are a genius! my friend laughed. - I hope you have already looked after a suitable name? What do you think about Warrior? - The world's first all-metal battleship? The pride of the British Navy? - Yes, sir! - Great! Warrior, to battle! The Martians turned towards us. Second, and a mechanical call rolled over the fields: -Ulla-ulla-ulla! - Leaving the steering wheels, Holmes reached for the familiar lever. The answering howl of our tripod made me sink my head into my shoulders. Get ready, Watson! - my friend hardly shouted over the howl. -Miss Pfeiffer, go ahead! - "Warrior" also went slower. Holmes began to smoothly unfold it. In the scope, I could clearly see both the approaching Martians and the outskirts of Maldon. The city froze in suspense. On the southern outskirts, behind the bushes at the junction of Lime Brook Way and Spital Road, I could make out the gleams of metal: a newly installed artillery battery lurked there. Do you see the battery? Holmes seemed to be reading my mind. - Yes. -And the hay shed next to it? - - I see. - Burn it! - You're crazy! There are people there! - Burn the barn, Watson! Shed, not a battery! And on command, transfer fire to the Martians! Stop car! Watson, fire on the barn! The Warrior stopped dead in his tracks. The howling ceased, and I, having caught sight of a barn with a hewn roof gray with age, smoothly pressed the button. I tried very hard not to let my hand tremble: I would never have forgiven myself if I had caught the gunners with a beam! There has been no rain in recent days. The sun was roasting like hell, and the effect exceeded all expectations. The dry wood and hay caught fire instantly, the flames shooting up a good twenty feet. A cloud of smoke covered the outskirts, completely hiding the battery. This time, I released the button in time, without catching anything superfluous with the beam. - Eat! Holmes exclaimed. - They bought it! I quickly changed aim. Watson, fire! Fire on the Martians! The Martians slowed down even more, turning towards the barn I had set on fire. They took us for their own! Now they were in a hurry to hit the target that my shot had pointed them to. Two of them were already firing heat beams in the direction of the ill-fated barn. Fortunately, the battery was located much to the left, and a smoke screen protected the gunners from the attention of the Martians. In choosing the barn as a distraction, my friend, with Holmes's usual rationality, took into account all the nuances, including the direction of the wind. To delay would be criminal! I aimed a scarlet dot at the cap of the nearest tripod and pressed the button all the way down. With a deafening roar, the enemy machine exploded, spewing green flames and smoke into the sky. - Fire! Fire, Watson! Adele, full speed ahead! The Warrior literally jumped forward. The sight went astray, the beam slid over the hood of the second car, heating it up, but not having time to burn through the armor. From a place we have developed an incredible speed; Holmes turned the steering wheels, maneuvering as he went. I clung to the trigger-handles, but we were tossed like a boat in a storm, and I could not catch the target. The Martians were turning in our direction; Holmes' desperate maneuvers, coupled with Miss Pfeiffer's quickness, in turn prevented them from aiming. To be honest, I didn't understand why they were bullshitting with us. If the Martians began to mow with rays, like mowers in a meadow, and we would not last long. Twice my beam caught the caps of the enemy, but the "bull ride" did not allow me to hold the beam long enough to burn through the armor. - Aim low! shouted Holmes. "Cut off their legs!" I pulled the handles, lowering the beam, but one of the Martians, as if he had heard the advice of my friend, managed to do it earlier. The Warrior twitched and wobbled in precarious balance. Something crashed down below us. He shot off our legs! Adele exclaimed. - Keep your balance! I was sure, that the Martian could destroy us by hitting the conning tower—or all three legs at once. Why didn't he do it?! There was no time to think about the strange behavior of the enemies. We were in danger of falling from a height of a hundred feet - or a scorching beam: having lost our maneuverability, we became an easy target. Staggering like a drunk who has fallen out of a tavern, the Warrior took a few steps, balancing on his two remaining legs. The Martians froze in amazement. Probably, it never occurred to them that a combat vehicle is capable of moving on two legs, like a person! It was a chance. While the enemies did not come to their senses, I stuck to the handles, aiming the sight. - Hold on! That was all Holmes had time to shout out as the Warrior began to roll on its side. The horizon in the sighting window fell to one side, but I still managed to slash the beam - and saw how the enemy tripod was falling apart, how its cabin collapses to the ground between obliquely cut metal legs. And then I was thrown against the wall, and I realized that it was all over for us. Now we're breaking down! I froze, silently whispering a prayer. Perhaps the Lord heard me, because time passed, and we were still alive! The fall has slowed surprisingly. Inside our car, something rang and clicked, on the other side of the porthole, clouds of green smoke swelled and disappeared into the sky, loud hissing and whistling were heard. Swinging and twitching, the cabin fell - but it fell, not fell! - Safety device! - Holmes determined aloud a moment before the felling touched the ground. The landing was hard. I felt a blow all over my body, my eyes darkened. As if in a fog, I saw Holmes standing on all fours. Nearby, muttering curses, Miss Pfeiffer stirred, and we, forgetting about their own bruises, they hurried to help the lady. We survived - isn't that a miracle?! The crippled "Warrior" lay on its side. The luminous windows, including the sight, went out, the rumble under the heaving floor of the cabin slowly ceased. And there were explosions outside! It was strange that the Martians were in no hurry to finish us off - or extract us like sardines from a can to capture us. I remembered what the Martians do with captives, and I shuddered. Later it became clear to whom we owe our salvation. When the Martians froze watching our bipedal jig, the gunners of the battery stationed near the shed I set on fire came to the same conclusion as I did: stationary targets are a gift for the gunner! Seizing the moment, they opened fire. The first volley turned out to be more than successful: one car was blown to pieces by a direct hit, another injured its leg. The remaining tripods, intact and lame, hurried to retreat. About a mile later, the wrecked car exploded for some unknown reason, so that only the last Martian managed to escape. But then, stunned by the fall, we knew none of this. -They took us for theirs, Holmes, didn't they? - I asked, moving my lips with difficulty. - Do I understand correctly? There was ringing in my ears. Circles of fire slowly faded in front of my eyes. For yours, my friend? They came for us! -Do you think, - Adele croaked, -their observers noticed our tests yesterday? - And they decided that there was a Martian in the tripod? Bravo, Miss Pfeiffer! They noticed, decided and organized a rescue expedition. The Martians could not even suspect that people were operating the tripod! By the way, this speaks of a highly developed sense of camaraderie among the Martians: they took a big risk, wanting to save a fellow tribesman, and then to the last refused to shoot at us. Even firing, they only damaged the Warrior, not destroyed it. They believed to the end that there was a Martian in the cabin - along with the people who had taken him prisoner. This is the only thing that saved us. I could not contain my astonishment: -Did you know everything in advance, Holmes?! - Unfortunately no. I assumed and hoped. On the whole, our sortie was a most dangerous adventure. We miraculously escaped destruction, and I am not accustomed to relying on miracles. Although. Holmes thought. Forgetting everything, he began to pace back and forth along the wall of the cabin, lying on its side. He did not look under his feet, but by some miracle he managed not to bump into countless levers and handles. - Although - what? said Miss Pfeiffer. Holmes stopped: -Although you should have gotten used to it by now. It's good for me, not for me, now for us! - incredibly lucky. I told you about it Watson. And now: we surprisingly quickly figured out how to control the tripod. Martians hurrying to Maldon were noticed in time. They did not shoot to kill, worrying about the fate of their fellow tribesman. They easily fell for our barn-shooting ploy. In a battle against five tripods, Watson, an amateur with a heat beam, managed to knock out two enemy vehicles. "Warrior" hid in itself a safety mechanism that did not allow us to die in the fall. Our gunners intervened exceptionally opportunely... After falling silent, Holmes looked out the porthole - it seems that my friend was giving Miss Pfeiffer and me time to comprehend what he said. As always, Holmes was right: we survived by a chain of happy coincidences. On the other hand, if luck or Providence is on our side, what's wrong with that? "Isn't it time for us to get out of here?" Holmes asked. 2.
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). When we were twenty yards away from the downed Warrior, I looked back. The crippled car was a striking contrast to the provincial idyll that reigned around. The juicy herbs of a vast meadow, the honey aroma of flowering gorse, the cloudless blue overhead, and against the backdrop of this pastoral serenity - a metal monster. The conning tower opened the lid, as if inviting them back; silvery tentacles drooped helplessly, the kinks of two titanic legs rose up like a giant M. The stump of the third leg went deep into the loose earth. At some distance ominously black was the box of the beam apparatus, which had collapsed on its side. The cannonade ceased, the powder smoke vanished without a trace. If we ourselves were not participants in the battle, we could decide that it never happened, and the wrecked car has been lying here for a week already. -We will have to make the return walk to the city on foot, - Holmes stated, surveying the surroundings. -Miss Pfeiffer, how are you feeling? - Can you walk a couple of miles? -Thank you for your concern, Mr.Holmes, - Adele smiled, as it seemed to me, through force. Still, we have not fully recovered from the fall. I am used to walking. And then, do we have a choice? I regret one thing. - About what, Miss Pfeiffer? I asked. - About the fact that there was no one to film our battle! The movie would have been amazing! -Yes, truly stunning, - Holmes could not resist, glancing at the -Warrior - we had left. And, without changing his intonation, he added: - We have guests. From the oak grove that grew on the way to Maldon, people appeared. About ten citizens, all with weapons. They resolutely walked towards us. - militias, my friend defined. I'm afraid our luck has run out. Don't make sudden movements. - Why? I wondered. Holmes did not have time to answer. - Well, stand! - from afar yelled a red-faced big man. Throwing up an antediluvian musket, so much so that the tight checkered jacket on the tall man almost burst at the seams, the boor fired into the air. We stopped; Holmes and I, without saying a word, leaned forward, covering Miss Pfeiffer with ourselves. The unloaded musket was no longer dangerous, but the muzzles of the guns and revolvers of the townspeople unequivocally looked in our direction. It was beneath my dignity to shout at one hundred yards. Therefore, he calmly waited for the Moldonians to come closer in order to clarify the situation. No doubt there was an unfortunate misunderstanding. But I could not imagine what it was until I heard the conversations of the militias. -. look, look like people! - And in the newspapers they wrote: they are like octopuses. - Lies! - And dressed in our way. I would have burst out laughing, if not for the expression of anger on the faces of the militias. Surely these people saw how we got out of the damaged car - and took us for Martians! I felt some anxiety: lest someone fire in the heat of the moment at the terrible Martians! I had a revolver in my pocket, and I managed to reload it after firing at the count. Holmes was also armed. But the advantage in firepower remained with the Moldonians. And most importantly: do not shoot them at us?! After all, these are good Englishmen, worthy and brave people who were not afraid to go out with old guns against deadly combat vehicles. It remained to be hoped that no one would lose their nerves. Soon I decided that it was time to break the protracted silence: - Good afternoon, gentlemen. Trust me, you are mistaken. In response, four trunks were taken into sight at once. - You look! - the red-faced man was surprised. He also speaks our language! - Spies! Martian Spies! The accusation of espionage was brought forward by an old man in greasy hunting breeches and a burgundy waistcoat over a crumpled white shirt. The old man's hands were trembling with excitement, the "Sauer" double-barreled shotgun was shaking, threatening an accidental shot at any moment. -That's right, spies! -You've just been promoted, Miss Pfeiffer, - said Holmes. -From an American spy to an alien. Congratulations! Amazingly, even in such a situation, Holmes retained the ability to joke! I, to be honest, was not in the mood for jokes. - What are you whispering there?! - menacingly frowned a man dressed in a shabby canvas jacket and cabbie trousers made of blue velveteen. The barrel of his army revolver was constantly moving, as if choosing between Holmes and me. - Well, shut up! - What are we going to do with them? - Someone asked in a businesslike way. -Shoot like dogs! - - Surrender to the military! - Right! Let it be interrogated! - And I think. - In reconnaissance of them! -Give me the rope, Marty! - - First you need to search. - What do you allow yourself ?! Miss Pfeiffer, without asking our opinion, moved to the fore. From her shout, the arrogant guy, who had put himself in front of the -spies - with a rope, backed away. However, the insolent quickly discovered that he was dealing with a weak woman, and was ashamed of his own oversight: - Talk here! He tried to grab Adele roughly by the arm. Neither I nor Holmes had time to do anything. The guy froze with bulging eyes, pale as death. Two faceted barrels of a small Derringer poked into his forehead. Miss Pfeiffer's finger, which lay on the trigger, did not tremble at all. -Get back, idiots! - Adele ordered. -Weapon to the ground! - The decisiveness of Miss Pfeiffer could be envied by a battalion of grenadiers in full force. Some of the militias retreated a couple of steps - but, alas, Adele could not achieve more. The cocked hammers clicked, it became clear that the case smelled of blood. -Aren't you ashamed, gentlemen?! The militias turned to stone. Holmes, guided by his unmistakable instinct, found the only right words. An indignant Martian spy in pure English shames honest citizens - from this, anyone would freeze in confusion. My friend was not slow to take advantage of the pause: - Treat a lady like that! England, good old England, what have you come to?! Hefty Moldonians gathered to search the lady?! A feat worthy of bloodsucking Martians! A shame! We would gladly and completely voluntarily proceed with you to the military intelligence department. We are frequent visitors to Moot Hall on Market Hill. But after your daring antics... - How do you know? - What are you talking about, buddy? -About Market Hill? - About intelligence in Moot-Hall?! After some thought, the man in the cabbie's pants stammered out, -Sir? -And you, Marty, ask Captain Wallace, - Holmes advised amiably. - How do you know my name? A curious cab driver was interrupted by a rapidly approaching horse clatter. As if on cue, the gazes of the militias turned in that direction. From Maldon, straight across the fields, a rider was galloping towards us. Behind him, well behind, rolled a familiar tarantass. - Captain Wallace! the rider shouted from afar, and I exhaled with inexpressible relief. - Directorate of military intelligence of England! Lower your weapon! That's an order! These people work for military intelligence! On the goats of the tarantass I saw a familiar figure. Surely, it was our friend Tom himself. Judging by the look of the young man, his fists itched to explain to his countrymen their mistake. The militia reluctantly obeyed the captain. They were sure that they caught spies from Mars, and here - such an embarrassment. -Miss Pfeiffer, - I said, -stop aiming at the poor boy. - Do you think? Adele asked doubtfully. - Sure. He understood everything. He repents. 3. Name request failed. 
- Hush, please, - said Professor Van Helzing. - Any extraneous sound can be fatal. He noticed how wide the Widow Priestley's eyes widened, and hastily corrected himself: "Deadly for a hypnotic trance." Of course, Jenny herself is completely safe. Her health, physical and mental, is not in danger. Jenny sat like a doll. The bench was too high for her, the girl's legs dangled amusingly in the air. The heel of the left foot slipped out of the shoe, and the shoe hung, swayed, threatening to fall. Jenny's face showed no fear. On the contrary, all the features relaxed, acquired a strange softness - it seemed that the child knows perfectly well what hypnosis is, and wants to quickly dive into the depths of a trance. Shall we begin, gentlemen? Hypnosis, Tom thought, as Van Helsing fixed his gaze on the girl and made difficult passes with his hands. That's amazing, yes. Half an hour ago, Tom witnessed a conversation between Mr.Holmes and Dr.Watson. Mr.Holmes thought that the professor would use a shiny object, like a locket or a mirror on a chain. The doctor, on the other hand, claimed that Indian fakirs do wonderfully without a mirror. They will take a rope, tie a knot at the end - and throw the knot into the sky. The rope will fly up over the clouds, and its lower end will flutter two feet from the ground, as if the angels of the Lord hung the rope on an invisible hook. The fakir boy will climb it - higher, higher! - and also disappear. And the crowd is clapping their hands and throwing coppers into the bowl. Then the fakir will also clap his hands - once, and there is no rope, and the boy runs into the crowd, all out of breath, as if he had flown down a mountain. Hypnosis, said the doctor, and mental confusion. Tom mortally wanted to go to India. But not now, otherwise you will miss the hypnosis. Radcliffe was still trembling with excitement, unable to calm down. In all his life he did not take so many responsible, and most importantly, independent decisions, did not commit as many dizzying deeds as he did these days. Mr.Holmes, going to fight with the Martians, ordered Tom, along with the professor, to follow Jenny. But Captain Wallace had previously entrusted Mr.Holmes and Dr.Watson to Tom's care. Whose order is more important? Torn with doubts, Tom finally decided that the professor with his revolvers and the widow Priestley with her copper frying pan could do it themselves - and he ran to Captain Wallace with a report. The captain, without listening to Tom's confused speech, rode away on horseback to where the captured tripod stood. Tom, climbing on someone's mare, rushed after him. Fortunately, the mare was saddled, otherwise Tom would certainly have fallen and broken his neck. Later, when it became clear that the tripod had been wrecked in the heat of battle - and with it two gentlemen and one lady - Tom changed the mischievous mare for a tarantass, following the captain on his heels to the crash site. They made it in time: Tom hardly had to work. He only chafed the knuckles of his right fist against O'Brien's unshaven cheekbone, a brute like all Irishmen. "Well done!" the captain praised Tom, looking at the defeated villain. And Miss Pfeiffer kissed Tom on the cheek as she walked, which won the loader's heart forever, taking her place next to the image of the deceased mother. - Silence! Van Helsing recalled. Tom found himself belligerently snoring - and was very embarrassed. He began to watch Jenny closely: the girl sat quietly, her eyelids closed. Still fall down, scared Tom. Sleeping on a bench is dangerous... The widow Priestley was of the same opinion, but the housekeeper was afraid to break the silence, putting at risk the salvation of little Jenny's soul; besides, both Tom and the widow quickly made sure that Jenny was sitting still and was not going to fall. Even the shoe stopped swinging. Sweat rolled down the professor's face. Tom would have sweated less if he had dragged about three dozen sacks of barley. Van Helsing's movements slowed down, his hands moving from top to bottom, acquiring extraordinary flexibility. Jenny opened her eyes and a chill ran down Tom's spine. He did not know where the distance might be, where the orphan Jenny was now looking. The girl's face completely lost any expression, her head bowed like a bird to her shoulder. The professor made a sign, reminding those present of silence. - Where are you? he asked the girl. There was no answer. - Where are you? Van Helsing repeated authoritatively. Silence. - Who are you? Jenny licked her lips with her tongue. Everyone was waiting for the baby to speak, but this did not happen. - Who are you?! Where are you?! The professor's questions radiated such force that Tom became frightened. He prayed that Jenny would answer and not anger this scary man who was shooting "cross" bullets from two revolvers. But Jenny, judging by her behavior, was not at all afraid of the hypnotist, or rather, did not notice his presence. -Fingers, - Holmes remarked in a barely audible voice. - Pay attention to her fingers. The professor tensed, pulling the back of his head into his shoulders. Tom at first thought that Van Helzing wanted to scold Mr.Holmes for interfering, but the professor looked at Jenny's hands - and seemed to guess what the uninvited adviser was hinting at. Tom himself noticed that the girl's fingers were constantly moving. It was as if Jenny was looking for something, looking for something and couldn't find it - or maybe she was playing an invisible piano. Taking a step forward, Van Helzing lightly pulled Jenny's upper lip, then the lower. Judging by the reaction of the professor, the examination satisfied him. - What are you doing? - the widow Priestley could not resist. Luckily, the housekeeper's sinister whisper didn't break Jenny's trance. "Sorry," the professor looked confused. -I'm used to dealing with specific clients. During hypnosis, I had to regularly examine their teeth. - For what?! - Until the teeth begin to sharpen, you can not be afraid of destructive changes. The widow was very worried: - Well, how? Are our baby's teeth okay? -In full, - the professor answered seriously. - I will continue, with your permission? She doesn't answer! She will answer. As Mr.Holmes rightly pointed out, the girl is looking for a writing instrument. Hope, this method will be more efficient. Tom was ready to run wherever he was told, but Mr.Holmes had a notebook and a pencil. With the permission of the widow Priestley, all this was placed at the disposal of the dumbfounded Jenny. The girl opened the notebook, resting it on her lap, aimed the sharpened pencil lead, and waited. -Martians, - Holmes said briefly and distinctly, as one speaks to the weak-minded. - Maldon. Jenny, do you remember how the Martians appeared in Maldon? The pencil ran across the paper: -The low coast of the Essex was already covered with a bluish haze when the Martian appeared. Small, barely noticeable at this distance, it approached along the muddy shore from Foulness. The frightened captain began to scold viciously at the top of his voice, scolding himself for the delay, and the blades of the wheels seemed to be infected with his fear. All passengers stood at the rail and looked at the Martian, who towered over the trees and bell towers on the shore and moved as if parodying a human gait. -Handwriting, - said Dr.Watson quietly. He, like the others, was no longer afraid to frighten off Jenny's trance with an extraneous sound. Tom himself was convinced that now at least the cannons fell, and the girl would not even blink an eye. Where such a strange confidence came from, Tom did not know, and did not dig too much. It just seemed to him that they were dealing not with a child, but with an outlandish mechanism. -You are right, my friend, - agreed Holmes. This is not childish handwriting. - It's not handwriting at all. It is more like text typed on a typewriter. Or, if you like, an editorial in The Times. When I first met Jenny, I noticed the tremor in her fingers. Now I understand: she tried to type. I just don't understand how you can copy the prints of the letter levers with a pencil! - Handwriting? the professor intervened. - What is the meaning of handwriting if it is not a childish syllable! Dear Watson, this paragraph would do honor even to you, an excellent writer! "I don't think so," said the doctor, offendedly. - I write easier and more exciting. -Well done, Jenny, - Holmes stopped the altercation with a gesture. - Very good. Maybe you remember something else? The pencil moved. Grifel lined up letters like a regiment of soldiers on a parade ground: -...- Son of Thunder - was moving in such a way that in a minute it already covered half the distance between the steamer and the Martians, a black, rapidly decreasing spot against the background of the low, fleeing Essex coast. Suddenly the leading Martian lowered his pipe and threw clouds of black gas at the destroyer. Like a jet of ink flooded the port side of the destroyer, a black cloud of smoke swirled across the sea, but the destroyer slipped through. "A black spot," the doctor's tone became peevish. - Clouds of black gas. A jet of ink. Black cloud. I would never allow such outrageous repetitions! - Watson! Holmes' voice rang out with such steel that the doctor fell silent without protest. Tom stood up on his tiptoes, wishing he had a better view of the notebook, and gasped in admiration. Opening a new sheet, Jenny covered it with a pattern. She also drew not in a childish way: a pencil with incredible speed, without stopping for a moment, ran horizontally, filling the entire line with strokes and pauses. Then the stylus fell lower, even lower, and so on without a break. In combinations of black and white, an excellent illustration was born: the destroyer went forward at full speed. Clouds swirled over the bay, the waves looked like heaps of wet sand. The path of the "Son of Thunder" was blocked by a Martian tripod. Tilting, flailing its tentacles, it threatened to fall at any moment. When finished, Jenny captioned the illustration: -Coria. Martians vs Son of Thunder. 1906". -One thousand nine hundred and six, - the professor said, as if he were one of the assembled people who could read. -Oh my God, Jenny! What do you mean? The girl didn't answer. Holmes leaned forward. -Listen to me, Jenny. What were you doing when the destroyer was fighting the Martians? The pencil answered without delay: -... retribution overtook the aliens at the edge of Pasnij Wood. The cocooned figurine clapped its hands, and a dazzling wall of white and blue, at least two hundred feet high, shot up before the fugitives. The fire did not touch the forest, but the armored colossi burned down in the blink of an eye, like moths in the flame of a candle. - Exactly! gasped Tom. He read slowly, moving his lips. - So it was! I saw it myself, from the bell tower... I prayed, and the Lord heard my prayers! Under the fragment that tells about the death of the tripods, a new picture formed: a shining egg hovered over the ruins. Through the translucent shell, the silhouette of a man was visible. Judging by the outlines, little Jenny herself was hiding in the egg. Lightning struck all around; they either drove off the enemies crowding outside the notebook, or they destroyed the house to the ground. In the empty line between the text and the picture, strictly in the middle of the sheet, there was an inscription: crowding outside the notebook, or destroying the house to the ground. In the empty line between the text and the picture, strictly in the middle of the sheet, there was an inscription: crowding outside the notebook, or destroying the house to the ground. In the empty line between the text and the picture, strictly in the middle of the sheet, there was an inscription:
- Hidipie-three-hey? Watson still could not read the strange word. -Hedip-three-alpha? - For example, Albert Hedip the Third? An allusion to Oedipus the king? But what does the letter "si" mean in a circle?! Masonic sign? -It's Cyrillic, - Holmes and Van Helsing clarified in one voice. And the professor added: - My friend Arminius from the University of Budapest, in addition to German, Hungarian and Farsi, is fluent in Russian. I am ready to send him a letter, asking what this text could mean. My modest knowledge of Cyrillic is only enough to read the central word as "Nedereza". The first two letters are a particle of negation. But what is "dereza"? -I would, - Holmes shrugged his shoulders, -I would rather like to know why all the previous comments were in good old English, and this line preferred Cyrillic. However, I don't think we'll get an answer. During the learned conversation, Jenny managed to draw the Moldon station: three identical copies. The girl began the fourth when Van Helsing broke down: -Who are you? The station was nearing completion. - Who are you! Mein Gott! Who are you?! Jenny started work on the fifth copy. - Who are you?!! - You need to calm down, Professor Pushing Van Helsing away, who was trembling all over, Holmes squatted down in front of the girl: - Who am I? The pencil stopped. - Who am I? Holmes insisted. Who am I, Jenny? Without finishing the next image of the station, the pencil set off: -... Watson? Is it really you, my friend?! - -Very well, Jenny! It's me? Am I talking to Dr.Watson? -Three paces from the doctor, - answered the pencil, -was a thin gentleman in a plaid coat. When he managed to approach, Tom did not notice. The gentleman was over six feet tall, but his lean build made him appear taller. A hawkish face, sunken cheeks, a tenacious appraising look from under the visor of a hunting cap. In appearance, the gentleman was about the same age as the doctor. "Pay attention," Holmes noted. Tom is here too. Watson, Tom and me. You, professor, are not present, you appeared later. Station and the three of us. Quite a convincing answer to my question. Where are we, Jenny? Where are we?! - In Maldon! Dr.Watson was surprised. -At Vicar Simpson's house. Oh, you mean drawing! Then at the station. - Shut up, my friend! Where are we, Jenny? The pencil shook. - We are with you, together with you Where?! Starting to draw a snow-covered peak and the edge of a wooded mountain, the pencil stopped. Shifting in place, the stylus moved on: -Kharkov - -Cyrillic again, - Watson sighed dejectedly. - Where? When? The line lasted: "Kharkov, February 20., February 24, 16:32". - All right, Jenny. Good girl. Now try to answer: who are you? Pause. - Who are you? "Name request failed," the pencil informed. - And now what do we do? -Repeat the request to the car, - it seemed to everyone present that Jenny shrugged her shoulders. But no, of course it was an illusion. - Repeat the request to the machine. A logical error has occurred." . 4. Liggings remind you of yourself. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson - Mr.Holmes! Dr.Watson! It seems to have become a tradition. Fortunately, the hypnotic session ended five minutes ago, and Professor Van Helzing managed to bring Jenny out of her trance. The widow Priestley bustled around the girl as a mother hen, and we tried to comprehend the results of the session. - Mister Holmes! Dr.Watson! Are the Martians back? Tom rejoiced. - If there is a war, I am with you! Waking up from his reverie, Holmes hurried to the gate, where he ran into a breathless corporal - our old acquaintance. - Mister Holmes! There. - Calm down, buddy! No matter how you get hit! -Captain Wallace Sent for you! - The captain and I parted ways a couple of hours ago. What could happen during this time? However, I have had a chance to make sure more than once: in Maldon, damn it, the most incredible things are happening! -And why did the captain need us? - With all his appearance, my friend showed that he was in no hurry. The best way to talk to a hurrying interlocutor. -Captain He asked you to come! - - This is urgent? - As soon as possible! He was informed... - Come on, corporal! Holmes encouraged the warrior. -What was reported to Captain Wallace? - -The Liggins The ones whose home is on Oak Close - -Ghosts again? - I couldn't resist. - No, sir! Their bodies... - Bodies of ghosts? -The bodies of the Liggins, sir! - - Disappeared? Holmes suggested. - No, sir. - Did you come to life? Have you risen? An extremely interested Van Helsing formed nearby. In his hands, the professor held his favorite bag, which, it seems, he did not part with even in bed. - The Lord is with you, sir! The corporal rolled his eyes. - What are you talking about? "Then what's the matter?" - Tracking the messenger's gaze, Holmes considered it necessary to clarify: - Speak boldly, corporal. This is Professor Van Helzing, his help may be useful. - Good afternoon, sir! - Corporal saluted. - So, the bodies. They do not deteriorate! How alive they lie -Familiar symptoms, - the professor nodded gloomily. Opening the bag, Van Helsing began busily rummaging through its contents. - Did you see it yourself? - No, sir! Heard Sergeant Jenkins reporting to the captain! And the captain sent for you right away. He's waiting for you at Moot Hall. -Well, let's go, - Holmes changed in an instant. Where did his feigned slowness go? My friend was again ready to act, and once again I envied his inexhaustible energy. "Professor, are you with us?" - Of course! I'm afraid you're right, Mr.Holmes, - Van Helzing shook the bag meaningfully, where something ominously clanged. -My help may indeed be needed. Tom also went with us. I understand, that he managed to become attached to the guy, and not only because he tirelessly helped us these days. You rarely see a combination of innocence, honesty and courage. Even Holmes, usually rather dry and not very prone to the manifestation of emotions, clearly sympathized with Tom. We reached Moot Hall on foot in a quarter of an hour. Captain Wallace was waiting for us, pacing nervously under the second floor balcony. -Not far, gentlemen, - he said when we introduced Van Helsing to him. The captain did not ask unnecessary questions about the participation of the professor, completely trusting Holmes. - Let's go. The bodies are stored in the basement of Mason's Funeral Home. It's around the corner at the intersection of Market Hill and Bull Lane. - Is there a glacier? I said, I don't know why. - That's just the point, no! -And the bodies lay in the heat for more than a week?! - Yes, gentlemen! Nightmare, the right word. We turned from Market Hill to Bull Lane, where in front of us, as if from under the ground, a chubby little man with surprisingly ruddy cheeks and a nose-potato has grown up. Most of all, this gentleman resembled the Dickensian Mr.Pickwick from the illustrations of Robert Seymour. He did not stand still for a second, moving skipping, running to the right, to the left, in front. His pince-nez sparkled fervently, letting out sunbeams. "Mr.Pickwick" chattered incessantly. How his pince-nez and bowler hat did not fall off him remained a mystery. His clothes consisted of contrasts. A black suit and lacquered boots would suit an undertaker just fine. But the picture was complemented by a lemon-yellow tie with large red peas! In short, the ruddy fidget was less suitable for the role of the undertaker than Holmes for the role of the venerable father of the family. -. what a day, gentlemen! In my, you know, basement! James Masons, the best funeral in Maldon, at your service! Contact us! How glad I am to see you! There were no relatives left, the city council refused money for the burial! Mr.Masons' speech seemed to consist of solid exclamation marks. -I've been going to Summers from the council, and Treasurer Peabody, that scoundrel, and Major Forester - -Did you talk to Major Forester? - - Well, yes! said Mr Masons, throwing up his hands. -Summers told me that you can't bury the Liggins without military intelligence permission! - Just then Major Forester arrived. Well, I go to him! So he didn't want to listen to me! Thank God, captain, it was up to you to contact you. I did not find you, Sergeant Jenkins promised to pass everything on. And here you are! Let's go, let's go! You will take them, right? Will they finally be buried? Who will bury? Wallace wondered. - I?! - You give the command! And I will do everything, do not hesitate! Top notch! With discount! They have no life from those Liggins - -Smell, - I nodded understandingly. And he vividly imagined what a stench should now be in the basement - and, perhaps, in the whole house! - Well, yes, the smell! Mr.Mason agreed. - Now incense, then sandalwood! Lavender, eucalyptus - I can't stand eucalyptus! It gives me a migraine! Noise, again... Captain Wallace froze in the doorway of the funeral parlour. - In direct! I live here on the second floor. Now you can't sleep at night! Hustle from the basement, voices, songs sing. Guests come to them, I'll tell you what! They talk, then it seems like they read psalms - in a damn, God forgive me, language! Pages rustle - so loud! And then suddenly something falls. Go down with a poker to calm down - no one! They lie quietly, peacefully, like decent dead. - Well, you heard the noise, went down to the basement? The professor's voice sounded genuinely alarmed. Where are the bodies? - What else would you like to do? If we haven't handed over Maldon to the damned Martians, then can I give up my basement to the rampaging dead? No sir! My grandfather fought at Waterloo! In the cavalry, commanded by the Earl of Exbridge! I still keep his saber. - But they took, - Holmes clarified, - a poker? -I'm used to the dead, - Mr.Masons ignored my friend's remark. - I've been burying for fifteen years, but now! .. Uniform disgrace, gentlemen! - The position of the bodies did not change? Now it was the professor's turn to run circles around the undertaker. Standing on tiptoe every now and then, Van Helzing tried to look behind Mr.Mason's collar. Are they in the same places as before? In the same poses? - Certainly! - the questions of the professor amazed the owner of the office. - They're dead! - And yet. Let me examine your neck? - Yes, for God's sake! At least inspect everything, just order to bury it! - Mr.Masons tore off his tie in two movements. - Please! "Strange," Van Helsing muttered as he completed his meticulous inspection. - No trace... - Are you satisfied? Then let's go! Before going down to the basement, we armed ourselves with two lanterns. The professor took out of the bag and lit a small but very bright acetylene lamp. It was humid downstairs and not much cooler than outside on a hot June day. Masons unlocked the heavy oak door with iron bolts. We really smelled the thick aroma of incense towards us: I distinguished the sandalwood and lavender mentioned by the undertaker, as well as cinnamon and, it seems, vanilla. A very unusual combination! There was no smell of decay at all. My friend went first taking his lamp from the professor, and bent over two bodies lying on a long marble table. - Be careful! Van Helsing warned. As if by chance, the professor put his free hand under the cloak, where the holster with the revolver was hidden. Did you embalm the bodies? Holmes asked Masons. - Treated with any compounds? - No, sir! I was warned not to do anything to the bodies without permission from military intelligence. -You are a specialist who has dealt with the dead for many years. Don't you find it strange that the bodies haven't decomposed at all in a week? - I still find it, sir! This couple, rest in peace, everything is not like people! They lie intact, they smell worse than an Indian shop, they make noise at night! Yes, and their clothes. We moved closer. The elderly, handsome gentleman with gray temples and the petite, lean woman were no doubt dead. They did not in the least resemble Count Orlok. But if I did not know exactly when the Liggins died, I would say that no more than six hours had passed since their death. The cadaveric spots on their faces were barely visible and were very pale. - Cloth? Do you mean these hoodies? Indeed, both Mr.and Mrs. Liggins were dressed in long, toe-length, dark blue robes with velvet decoration. Such, judging by the engravings, would suit the Oxford teachers of the middle of the outgoing century, but certainly not an elderly married couple from the outskirts of Maldon. As far as I knew, the Martian attack had caught the Liggins at home. Is it really their house clothes? - Hoodies - still okay - waved the undertaker. - I only remember that they were dressed differently! Coming down at night: Mr.Liggins is wearing plaid trousers, a gray shirt and a waistcoat. Mrs. Liggins is wearing a formal, dark purple dress, with lace collar. And in the morning, look: they are in robes! I'm scratching my head: it seems like they were always in robes! What got into my head? I go back upstairs - again I remember something else: trousers, a dress. - Do you think someone is changing them? Van Helzing had already convinced himself that the Liggins' teeth were normal, and rather nasty, but he continued to persevere in his search for a hidden catch. -No, sir. - The undertaker tried to stay away from the professor. "Who's going to come up with something like that?" To change clothes for the dead - look what they invented. - What did they die of? Holmes suddenly asked. I don't see any obvious damage. They were pulled out from under the rubble of a burnt house? Captain Wallace stepped forward. -There is a conclusion at Moot Hall. Would you like to take a look? -First, I would like to examine the bodies. The professor and I nodded to each other and set to work. Under the robes on the Liggins, to my surprise there were no other clothes. And no wounds, burns or hematomas were found on the bodies of the dead. -The cadaveric spots are in the stage of hypostasis, - I began aloud. -They have a pinkish-red tint - -What could, - Van Helsing said, -indicate carbon monoxide poisoning - -Or that the bodies were transferred from a warm room to a cold one and back, - I added. -Or about poisoning with rare plant alkaloids, - Holmes contributed. -And also about death from hypothermia - -When Sid Atkins drowned in the bay, he had spots on him, too, - Tom said grimly from a far corner. And also crabs. I haven't eaten crabs since. "That's right, young man! Van Helsing exclaimed. -Death by drowning looks similar. Well, the autopsy will show? With unhealthy excitement, he rubbed his hands. - Don't think, that an autopsy would help establish the true cause of death, - Holmes said dully. His tone was unfamiliar to me. -Anyway, it won't clear things up. The professor took up the bag: - Then let's beat them in the heart with an aspen stake! And cut off their heads. I don't like this couple. Better to be safe! - Fear God! Mr.Masons was horrified. -Have respect for the dead, sir! - What would their relatives in Godric's Hollow say if they were here? They would ban you! And they would have filed a lawsuit against you - for desecration of the bodies! - As you said? Godrix Hollow? My friend leaned forward. In the light of an acetylene lamp, the hawkish profile of Holmes was sharply outlined on the wall. - Well, yes! It's in Wiltshire. -And the Liggins came from there to Maldon? - - Yes, sir. Ten years ago. - And Jenny? Baby Jenny? -It was recently brought in, sir. -From Godrix Hollow? - - Of course. Where else? -How do you know that, Mr.Masons? - - How - from where? the undertaker wondered. -The whole city knows about it!
Sideshow Don't Let Me Lose My Heart. 
- Well, dad, hello! - Well hello. - Well, are you busy? I quickly. Children, respectable audience. Son Mishka, heir to all my debts. This is our game: to insert "well" neither to the village nor to the city. Silly game? Well, what is. Why aren't you at school? Dad, school is over. - At all? - Well, yes. Well, it's late, it's evening. Dad, what is a "cart"? -Go get on Google, you dumbass. You know, well. - Google can't. - Why? - We messed up, huh. To without Google. - Can I go with my dad? - Well, we didn't smear about dad. I walked away, like I'm calling my mother. - Like, well? Be ashamed! - Yeah, I'm embarrassed. You're talking about a cart. Kolyan says it's a car. Big, well, from the Siberian mines. And Masha says she knows, but she won't tell. Out of spite type. - It's a chaise, dumbass. - Brichka? - Here you are, grandmother, and well. Did you see the cart? - A cart - yes. In short, a cart. Big and cool like a Porsche Cayenne Horses in front behind - a machine gun. And look, do not confuse. You drive, I shoot. Well? - Cool! Only I shoot. - You need to read books, dumbass. - Well, them, your books! All their troubles come from them. You, well, where are you now? - At work, huh. -Yeah, my mom told me what job you had. Fool read books. Good doctor Aibolit, we have cellulite from books. Bye, well! -That's it, - Tyunya asked. - Shot back, machine gunner? I nodded grimly. Eh, Poltava-cart... - Bullfinch, did you see that? - Well? - Do not nukay, do not harness. Go take a look... - Shot back, machine gunner? I nodded grimly. Eh, Poltava-cart... - Bullfinch, did you see that? - Well? - Do not nukay, do not harness. Go take a look... - Shot back, machine gunner? I nodded grimly. Eh, Poltava-cart... - Bullfinch, did you see that? - Well? - Do not nukay, do not harness. Go take a look...
- Mr.Wells gives the impression of a man who, while walking in the garden, can say: -I don't like this fruit tree. It does not bear fruit in the best way, does not shine with the perfection of forms. Let's cut it down and try to grow a better tree in this place." Is this what the British people expect from their genius? It would be much more natural to hear from him: -I don't like this tree. Let's try to improve its vitality without damaging the trunk. Maybe we can make it grow and bear fruit the way we would like it to. But let's not destroy it, because then all past works will be in vain, and it is still unknown what we will receive in the future.
- When did it surface? - Just now. Did you see it or not? - I hoped, Tyunya. I believed it would come up. Is there a signature? - Where? - Under the quote! - There is. Mom, my mom! "Arthur Conan Doyle, 1912"! Did you know, Bullfinch? I remember, but not verbatim. This is your chance, friend. Chop down a tree - shut down in an emergency. Improve viability - close normally. Make it grow and bear fruit the way we would like it to. I introduced Holmes as a detective, as a symbol of rationalism. But I also introduced Conan Doyle as an approach, a way of organizing change. Let's not destroy it, because then all the past works will be in vain... - And it is still unknown what we will get in the future, - Tyunya picked up. -Oh, what is this nonsense? I leaned towards the monitor.
- ... I will sell a Stradivarius violin of 1713. I don't know a copy or the original. The inscription -CONSERVATORY - is visible on the back and front on the pictures. I don't know what it means. Maybe it was stolen from some conservatory. Could it be that the original the violin was damaged by this inscription?
- What an infection! Where is she from? - I don't know. Bullfinch, here's another one!
- ... an old Stradivarius violin, Dmitry Donskoy Boulevard (500,000 rubles). Antique Stradivarius violin, year 1729, Stradivarius Crentonesis Faciebat Anno, in good condition
I cast a quick glance at Nyurka. I didn't like Nyurka. I didn't like her from the very beginning, the pigalina, but now I don't like her at all. From the speakers, stimulated by the program, like a genie from a bottle, Paganini's caprice climbed. -The main violin solo, - the monitor informed, -five caprices by Paganini, performed by the virtuoso Sergei Krylov, who flew in from Cremona with another Stradivarius violin, was presented in an arrangement by Edison Denisov for violin and chamber orchestra, sounded with a sharp modern intonation. - Only caprices I miss now! -I remembered, - Tyunya suddenly said. In her left hand, she held a printout of a still from the film. Well, the one with the old-fashioned apartment with mountains of rubbish. The fingers of his right hand tormented the tablet. Thousands of tons of verbal ore, as the classic used to say, were mercilessly ground. - Eat! A familiar apartment appeared on the tablet, only in color. Bulldog under the table. Globe and scales on the background of the window. Staircase to the second floor. The man with his back to us. - This is Watson! Movie "Sherlock Holmes" by Guy Ritchie! - Excellent, Tuna! We are on the right track. - No, Snegir. We are on our way to hell... Read on! The frame is halfway under the top edge of the tablet. Below, where the text of the chant -Ich ruf zu dir, Herr Jesu Christ - appeared on the printout, it read: -The interior of the house 221-b Baker Street in the movie Sherlock Holmes by Guy Ritchie is borrowed from the movie Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix ". The furnishings of the apartment are assembled from the props that were used to equip the home of Sirius Black. The staircase that Holmes descends at the beginning of the film is taken from the movie Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban - -Lord, - I called out with feeling, -please hear my pleas! Don't let me lose heart! God, I can't handle Harry Potter... The heavens were silent. Instead, the monitor answered:
- violin Stradivari Moscow / Russia. In perfect condition. Copie de Antonius Stradiuarius Cremonenfis. Faciebat Anno 1721. These Latin letters are written on the inside of the front of the violin. There is also a two-linear circle with two letters -AS - inside and a Christian cross
Chapter Nine Center of the Solar System. 
1. Spot on the map. 
From Dr.Watson's notes - The Undertaker claims that the girl was also brought from Godric's Hollow - Holmes reasoned as we hurriedly approached the hotel. -But Jenny mentioned a very different place: Hartford. We even found this town on the map. - Perhaps their family moved? I suggested. - And she remembered Hartford more than an unknown hole in Wiltshire? - Not excluded. But my experience tells me that this is no ordinary confusion. It is based on the system. I just don't see it in its entirety yet. But each step brings us closer to the solution. Since I have revised some of my views thanks to Professor Van Helsing's visual demonstration, I feel that we are on the right track! It wasn't far from Market Hill to Silver Street, where the Blue Boar was located. Opposite the hotel stood the Church of All Saints with a unique triangular bell tower - the only one in all of England, as the owner of the hotel did not fail to inform us. I lingered for a moment, wanting to take another look at this marvel of 12th-century architecture, and hastened to follow Holmes up to our apartments. My friend had already unfolded the map of England he had borrowed from the captain and was leaning over it. - Very interesting! exclaimed Holmes after a moment. -Mr Masons was right. I easily found Godrix Hollow on the map. Here, admire: west of London, in Wiltshire, between Bath and Marlborough. I don't know for sure if the Martians got there, but you can check with Captain Wallace. Everything is wonderful, there is only one problem. - Namely? -There was no Godrics Hollow on the map last night! - Are you sure? - I, in turn, took up the study of the map. - Small town the title is in small print. You may well have missed it. -Could, - said Holmes. - If not for you, Watson. - I?! - Remember, yesterday you dripped wax from a candle on the map? - Holmes! I was outraged. - Now you will reproach me with this for the rest of your life ?! On the contrary, Watson! I am grateful to you! A drop of wax fell just on the county of Wiltshire. Curious coincidence, don't you think? But it's not even a coincidence. Cleaning off the wax, I involuntarily kept my eyes on this section of the map. You know I have an excellent memory. Now I can say with complete certainty: there was no Godrics Hollow in Wiltshire yesterday! See for yourself: the wax stain covers almost the entire space between Bath and Marlborough, including our mysterious Godric's Hole. I couldn't miss it! -More like Godric's Hollow, - I muttered. - What happens then? How could a town appear on the map that wasn't there? A prankster who knows how to forge documents got in here? Did he add a new settlement to the map? Changed the card to another one? -Substitution is excluded, - Holmes took out his favorite long-handled magnifying glass from his pocket. -A trace of wax, a folded corner, a number of scuffs, the captain's marks—no doubt the map is the same. As for the forged inscription... For some time he carefully studied the map through a magnifying glass. He poked the stained Wiltshire a couple of times with his fingernail and turned to me: -It's not fake. The inscription is made with printing ink. The font type, size, letter spacing and brightness are the same as other designations. And most importantly: a wax stain lies on top of the name of the town! - But how can this be?! -Maybe, my dear friend! - This oddity fits in perfectly with a number of other mysteries that Maldon never tires of throwing at us. Again, this is a system. Another element of the mosaic fell into place - a very significant element. By the way, thanks to you, Watson! - Come on, Holmes! I'm just... Holmes raised his hand in warning, demanding silence. A multi-voiced hubbub was heard from the street, over which, like the piercing cry of a seagull, the voice of Mr.Squatter, the owner of the Blue Boar, flew up: - And I tell you, Mr.Holmes is very busy! - Wu-u-u-u! "I won't let him be disturbed!" We looked out the window. There were about a dozen Moldonians downstairs, many with bundles of rags, boxes and worn cases in their hands. They all seemed to want to see my friend. An unreasonably tall man noticed us; his long-tailed jet-black frock coat and shabby top hat made him look like a chimney sweep. He happily waved his hand at us. A crowd joined the chimney sweep, but in the general uproar I managed to make out only the call: -Mr.Holmes! - "We'll have to go out," Holmes sighed. - Hip hip hooray! roared the good Moldonians as soon as we appeared on the steps of the hotel. And they started talking, interrupting each other: - We're here for you. - Tom said, you're looking for. - Is this true? .. -. came to save you from sorcerers? You us?! - From the Martians! .. - From the sorcerers! - Well, we brought it! - Tom said, you need to! .. - Chase the enemies! - I don't have a violin... - And I have... - But!.. - And I have - here it is! The chimney sweep unrolled the knot, and our eyes met an ancient bagpipe, which was played back in the era of the wars of the Scarlet and White Roses. Then the ruddy milkwoman proudly opened the case, where a harmonica rested on blue velvet. A wizened old man, whom I was surprised to recognize as a militiaman who had taken us prisoner, carefully placed a horn on the steps: crumpled, but polished to a mirror shine. The horn was followed by an oboe, a beat-up guitar, a drum, and a stringed instrument unknown to me: without a neck, with a wide rectangular soundboard and four strings. A rough bow was attached to it. -Here, - summed up a fat man with a lush mustache, vaguely familiar to me. - It is for you! - Use it! Fortunately, not everyone came to the Blue Boar with gifts. Part of the people gathered just to stare. I burst out laughing, but Holmes, keeping an absolute seriousness, bowed to the assembled: - Thank you, ladies and gentlemen. Believe me, I really appreciate your help. Please tell your friends that this is more than enough. Now I have everything I need. As soon as the tools are no longer needed, I will return them to you safe and sound. Thank you again! - Pilik to your health, Mr.Holmes! - Puff! - Most importantly, pour them properly! - Get away from Maldon! I promise to do everything in my power! my friend assured the Moldonians. After hesitating, they began to disperse. -Now I have to restore the status quo in Maldon! - Holmes turned to me. Knowing him well, I saw that he appreciated the humor of the situation. So many people rely on me! Can I let them down? - Good afternoon, gentlemen! - through the thinning crowd to us energetically made his way Mr.Pfeiffer. Fortunately, without the terrible "Partagas" in the teeth. - Let me help you! The two of you can't take all that rubbish away. I looked at the collection laid out on the steps of the hotel and realized that the American was right. -We will be very grateful to you, Mr.Pfeiffer. 2. Give us your Cyrillic alphabet!
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). -Enough for a small orchestra, - Holmes said as the instruments were lined up along the living room wall. - Where's the saxophone? Mr Pfeiffer chuckled. - Balalaika?! - Are you into music? A person who did not know Holmes would think that the question was asked out of decency, to keep the conversation going. But I immediately caught the interest in my friend's voice. - Like a shoemaker in watercolors! - But you mentioned the balalaika. This is a very rare Russian instrument. Most people will not be able to pronounce its name. If I had not once been in Odessa, I myself would. - Ha! If you knew my biography, sir! If you knew my father! -They weren't honored, - I replied dryly. - And in vain, doctor! This is not a person, this is a ready-made plot for the film. Oh Isaac Pfeiffer! Until his death, he did not have the habit of going to the doctors. He broke a horseshoe with his bare hands! Been drinking bitter for weeks! He had a military pension of forty rubles in banknotes! And how he beat the drum! Chopped the vine! My father, gentlemen, was a cantonist dragoon. Twenty-five years in the Nizhny Novgorod Dragoon Regiment. - From the cantonists? I didn't understand. - Is your grandfather Swiss? The cinematographer laughed like crazy: - Oh, doctor! You know a lot about jokes! Is Isaac Pfeiffer Swiss? Of those places where people are surrounded by first-class lakes, mountainous air and solid French? I must remember, this is the best anecdote in my life. After retiring, my brilliant father settled in Kharkov. People like him were forbidden to settle in large cities, but an exception was made for the military from the cantonists. My father had a glorious company - more than a hundred soldiers like him, thirty of them with their families. - I remember, - Holmes remarked, - Did you say something about the terrible Jews of Rembrandt? -He did, - agreed Mr.Pfeiffer. And ready to repeat. Have you seen these pictures? Aren't they terrible? No comparison to my father! Posing brave old Isaac to your Rembrandt, and his portrait would be worth a million dollars! I think I've begun to understand something. -By the way, about the Jews, - the American continued. - In the sixty-third Kharkov governor-general asked the government to allow the Jews free access to Kharkov. I was then a real child and did not remember how it ended. But my father immediately took the family to Vilna, then to Copenhagen, and soon we sailed by steamer to blessed America. And after all this, you ask me about the balalaika? Thank you Mr Pfeiffer. The excursion into the history of your family was damn exciting, - Holmes easily wedged into someone else's monologue. - So you speak Russian? - I? Yes, I am Russian Cicero! - Do you read? - Runaway! - You are just a gift of fate! Will you read a couple of words written in Cyrillic? With pleasure, gentlemen! But I have a counter question: have you already made a decision about the contract with the American Mutoscope and Biograph? I spread my hands: - Alas, we are in complete time trouble. There is absolutely no time. As soon as I get a free minute -Time - muttered Holmes with an absent air that I knew well. -Wait a minute - His intonation could freeze a bucket of water. Fortunately, Mr.Pfeiffer was enthusiastic: -I take you at your word! Let's get your Cyrillic alphabet! Waking up from his thoughts, Holmes instantly took out two sheets of paper written by Jenny: - Here, I beg you. The American stared at the first riddle: -© A. Nederez. 2010. » Even more carefully, he studied the drawing with a girl in an egg, surrounded by lightning. Obviously, he was wondering if it would be possible to reproduce something similar by means of a cinematograph. Finally, sighing with regret, Mr.Pfeiffer stated in the tone of an expert: - The letter -si - in a circle in Russian is read like -es. What that sign is, I have no idea. Masons, gentlemen! Of course, Masons! And then. He suddenly burst into laughter: - I haven't seen such a funny surname for a hundred years! Wow, Nederese! As a child, I knew a rhyme about a dereza goat. And this, therefore, is not a goat, and not a dereza! Ha ha ha! Holmes nodded. -I think you are right. -A - with a dot in front of the surname is undoubtedly an initial. - I am always right! What else do you have? - What about the number? Two thousand ten? I felt it necessary to intervene. - Looks like a date - Date? Twenty first century?! You, doctor, are even more of a joker than I thought! Maybe, is it the number of copies made? So, further... He bent over the second sheet. Then, as if not believing his own eyes, he grabbed a piece of paper from the table and hurriedly stepped towards the window, closer to the light: -Kharkov, two thousand February twenty-fourth, sixteen thirty-two. Kharkiv? My hometown... - Is it in Russia? - The capital of the province in the south-west of the Russian Empire. Sometimes I dream about this city. Can you imagine? After New York! Dreaming, that's because. Where did you get this from ?! -This is the work of a little girl, - Holmes did not hide. - Is she from Kharkov? - Well, of course! - in excitement, I, forgetting about decency, loudly slapped my forehead with my palm. - Even then I was not sure that I heard the name of the city correctly. Not Hartford, but Kharkov! But how did little Jenny get there? Given the information about Godrix Hollow. - Much more interesting, - Holmes noted, - how she was brought here to Maldon. And even more interesting. - Date? - Exactly! If doubts remain about the number "2010", then the month, day and even time are indicated here with an accuracy of up to a minute. -But this is the twenty-first century! - My throat is dry. But Mr.Pfeiffer returned all peremptory inherent in Americans: - It is clear as day that this is an excerpt from a science fiction novel! The action takes place in the distant future! The novel is beautifully illustrated. Do you have the full text? - Unfortunately no. - I'm sorry, I'm sorry! It certainly contains great opportunities for the cinematographer. Just imagine: super-megacities, airships, electric guns... And what kind of wars could unfold there! -You don't have enough Martians? - I couldn't resist. - Martians? I managed to film part of the battle, but, alas, from afar. I'm afraid the picture will not be too impressive. Will you not agree the next time you are going to fight to warn me in advance? And lure the Martians closer! I'll be waiting with my camera ready! Mr.Pfeiffer seemed to understand something from our faces and grim silence. "Joke, gentlemen!" Joke! I understand: the war, you risked your life. What else do you want to translate? I had a serious suspicion that Adele did not dare to tell her father about her participation in the battle, leaving all the laurels to me and Holmes. Well, very thoughtful of her. It is unlikely that a mutoscope man would have praised his daughter, having learned that she was putting herself in mortal danger! It means that it is better for Holmes and me to keep quiet about this. -That's all for now, Mr.Pfeiffer. Thank you for your help. As for the contract, we will notify you as soon as we make a decision. - I'm looking forward to it! On the threshold of the American, Holmes' question caught up: - We can turn to you, if we get any more texts in Russian? - Of course! Mr.Pfeiffer threw up his hands. -I have the honor, gentlemen! - His boots rumbled down the stairs. -The picture has taken shape, - Holmes paced the living room, filling his pipe as he went. - There are literally a couple of details missing. I took out a cigar and reached into my pocket for matches, but instead of them I found a crumpled piece of paper. 3. Newspaper cinema. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). What do you have there, Watson? The scrap of paper you picked up the day before yesterday at Oak Close? Frankly, I completely forgot about the fragment of the Daily Telegraph. I have long been accustomed to my friend's phenomenal powers of observation, but, nevertheless, once again I could not resist: - How did you know, Holmes? -Elementary, Watson, as Miss Pfeiffer would say. When you returned from your inspection of the Oak Close, I noticed that the hem of your right pocket was covered in dust. You obviously put in your pocket an object picked up from the ground. Since the pocket did not protrude at all, I assumed that it was a sheet of paper. - Indeed, nowhere is easier - after your explanations! I laughed. -But why didn't you ask about my find earlier? - What if it turned out to be something important? "I've known you for twenty years!" Find something important you would have presented the find immediately. You have no doubt studied the paper and found it to be irrelevant. - Newspaper?! -I suppose you've come across a piece of an old newspaper—although I could be wrong about that. But mindful of the leaf that my brother Mycroft noted in the telegram, you, with your usual care, decided to keep the find - just in case. Here are the matches - you were looking for them? Holmes lit his pipe in a puff of bluish smoke and handed me a box of Bryant & May. "You're quite right," I admitted, lighting my cigar in turn. It was the Daily Telegraph from last month. I don't know why I picked it. I took a crumpled page out of my pocket - and almost threw it aside like a poisonous snake! There was a photograph in the paper that I didn't remember. But most importantly, the image was moving, like on a cinema screen! - What the hell?! -A professor in such a situation would have exclaimed -Mein Gott! - Holmes did not fail to notice. At first I thought of the late Professor Moriarty, burn in hell, but quickly realized that we were talking about a completely different professor, who, fortunately, was on our side. -This is not the Daily Telegraph! - - I see - the Egyptian sphinx could envy Holmes's equanimity. - And the date. Again - the date. Did you say the paper was from last month? - Holmes, what does the date have to do with it? After all, this is. - The date is extremely important, my dear Watson. I would suggest that the moving image in a newspaper is a technology of the distant future. For example, the twenty-first century, which Jenny remembered under hypnosis. But look at the date! It is unlikely that anyone would forge it especially for us. With difficulty tearing his eyes away from the "newspaper cinema", I finally looked at the date. This year, mid-June, two weeks ago. Yes, the date has changed slightly, but what difference did a couple of weeks have on the background of such an amazing transformation?! - Holmes, when I picked up the sheet. I remember exactly: it was the Daily Telegraph. - I don't doubt it at all. If you found this, you would immediately rush to me, scaring away the entire Maldon with screams. - Holmes! - And here's something else that's interesting. Until now, you have doubted every time. Was the sailor from the Son of Thunder in the hospital or not? Has the tentacle changed, or has it remained the same? But now you don't have the slightest doubt. - Not the slightest! I resolutely confirmed. -I picked up the Daily Telegraph. But Holmes, damn you! We have an incredible find in our hands, and you are talking about my certainty, then about dates! All in good time, my friend. I would guess that we have before us a newspaper from the future, no matter how crazy it may sound, but the date completely refutes such a hypothesis. Before us is the creation of our contemporaries. I suppose this newspaper is as commonplace for its readers as the Daily Telegraph is for us. What in the world is more banal than a daily newspaper? Now let's explore its content. The day was drawing to a close, but there was still enough light from the window to properly examine the moving picture and read the note placed under it. But as soon as we bent over the newspaper, she was not slow to present us with a new surprise! The pointed-nosed lady, pacing back and forth against the backdrop of the cemetery fence, suddenly turned to us and - oh my God! - She said in a cheerful tone: - We are reporting from Godrix Hollow, where, as you well know, the other day there was a magical conflict that ended in tragedy. Today, the victim of this incident is being buried - an unfortunate imbecile child named Ariana. Until the end of the investigation, we will not give the name of the victim, as well as the names and surnames of the participants in the duel - so as not to cast a shadow on the representatives of respected families. We understand the interest of our readers in accurate information, but the mouthpiece of the press cannot afford actions that are not consistent with ethics and morality! Holmes, and he for a moment lost his usual composure. I was shocked beyond measure! After recovering a little, I ventured to rub the edge of the image with my fingertip. To the touch - paper like paper, moderately rough. Well, I thought, Mr.Pfeiffer does not see this! An American in the bud would wither with envy. Indeed, compared with the miracle newspaper, his cinematograph is a primitive children's toy! -We can only report, - the sharp-nosed meanwhile broadcast, - that one of the most promising young magicians of our time, the owner of many honorary awards and a correspondent for reputable magazines, took part in the fatal battle, who, in order to care for his sister, exchanged a brilliant future for seclusion in the provinces. He had to stand up for his younger brother, who came to Godric's Hollow for the holidays. The conflict was provoked by a close friend of our child prodigy: in the course of a heated quarrel, the recluse was forced to protect his brother from a friend! So far, it remains unknown whose spell accidentally hit poor Ariana, causing her death. The instigator of the quarrel fled the scene of the battle and is now on the wanted list. You can see how the funeral procession leaves the cemetery after the funeral. The cemetery fence slid to the side, revealing rows of gray flagstones and a procession of dark figures, leaving their final resting place. Some of the people dressed like middle-class Londoners: frock coats and tailcoats, bowler hats and top hats. Others were dressed in velvet robes or odd-looking cloaks, and wide-brimmed pointed hats crowned their heads. The procession wandered despondently along a street lined with old half-timbered and stone houses with gable roofs, towards a small church that could be seen in the distance. After briefly disappearing from the picture, the reporter reappeared in front of us: - According to unverified data, the fugitive had accomplices and like-minded people. And there was a witness at the fight itself, whose testimony is able to shed light on what happened. This witness is seven-year-old Jane Backward, daughter of Theobald and Rebecca Backward, both natives of Godrics Hollow. It is authentically known that yesterday the parents sent little Jenny in an unknown direction, entrusting the child to the care of distant relatives. The Backwards refuse to tell where their daughter is now, fearing for Jenny's life! The stubborn silence of the Backwards creates serious obstacles to the investigation. After a pause, the sharp-nosed one summed up: - We will keep you informed. Don't miss our next release! With you was the special correspondent of "Daily Profit" Virginia Thorinblat. And Special Correspondent Virginia turned her back on us. We were silent for a minute. Holmes carefully studied the fragment, taking out a magnifying glass; I joined my friend a little later. The name of the newspaper above the date of issue suffered, only the "Daily." remained intact. There were no pictures on the back. Glancing through the notes, I found out that they were talking about potions, enchantment and the like. Holmes was still dumb as a fish. I broke down first: - In my opinion, before us is the embodiment of Mr.Pfeiffer's dreams! A fantastic film based on a novel by a mad writer, filmed with the help of technologies unknown to us. Except that instead of the wars of the future, the filmmakers were attracted by magic. You yourself drew my attention to the date, Holmes. But at that time, the Martians had already landed on the Horsell wasteland and began an attack on London! If it was a real newspaper, marisan would have been mentioned in it. And then - not a word! You are making progress, Watson! Excellent inference. It has only two minor flaws. First, the Martians may be reported in the missing section of the newspaper. And secondly, I would agree with you, if not for one detail: Miss Thorinblat mentioned the seven-year-old Jane Backward, hastily expelled by her parents from Godrix Hollow. And little Jenny really exists. Although sometimes I begin to doubt it. Do you doubt Jenny's existence? I hurried. Holmes did not have time to answer. Outside, I heard loud screams, the meaning of which I did not immediately make out. -They brought you a balalaika, - I said to Holmes, going up to the window. And I was wrong. - Quicker! For help! Looking out, I saw no one on the street in front of the hotel. -Help! - They were already shouting on the stairs. Soon the Reverend Vicar Simpson burst into the living room, accompanied by an excited Tom. The vicar's hair stood on end, and beads of sweat trickled down his cheeks. - Ah-ah-ah! Simpson yelled, spitting. - What's happened?! - Nightmare! In my house! Nightmare! -I was waiting outside, - Tom tried to explain. - And here he is: save! Help!.. - Save! said the vicar. I realized that Simpson was insane and we would not get a good story from him. - Do you have a revolver, Watson? Holmes asked. - He is always with me. "Then let's hurry!" As we ran down the stairs, I thought that Professor Van Helzing, with his pair of revolvers, would come in very handy now. But where the Dutchman was, I had no idea, and there was no time to look for him. 4. Bye-bye, kids.
The gate was taken off its hinges. In those places where the sash was in contact with the jamb, the boards were roughly broken. Sharp wood chips protruded predatorily, the fasteners of the loops were torn out, as they say, with meat. It must have been the fairy-tale giant Cormorin, who was eighteen feet tall, three yards in girth, and with a monster face, kicked the gate in his haste to enter Vicar Simpson. Or maybe it was not a giant, but a Martian tripod, for the sake of a joke, replacing the heat beam with a glorious kick. Tom burst into the garden first. He prepared to take the hit, covering Mr.Holmes and Dr.Watson with his own body. But what young Radcliffe saw did not meet his expectations so much that Tom turned to stone, opening his mouth. Widow Priestley was seated on a stool, her hands folded formally in her lap. The widow's lips moved; almost soundlessly the vicar's housekeeper hummed a lullaby: children on a spruce branch. Her gaze oozed a warm tear. Tom didn't know what Priestley's widow was seeing, but judging by the bliss written on the housekeeper's face, it was the best sight in the world. The picture was spoiled by an oak table, cut into two unequal parts - the crack passed next to the right elbow of the housekeeper. No ax in the world would have been able to deal with the table with the first blow; except for lightning. However, if the sky had crashed to the ground, this would not have brought the widow out of her state of blissful rest. On the edge of the crack, swaying dangerously, a jug of milk was balanced. Little Jenny and the two intruders froze, separated by a hopelessly ruined table. The girl cocked her head to her shoulder in a familiar avian manner, as if she had been under hypnosis until now. Her posture did not express excitement or fear; rather, the indifference of the viewer, who knows in advance how the performance will end. Guests, dressed in long mantles to the toes, on the contrary, were ready to throw at any moment. The heads of men were crowned with amazing hats, similar to pointed caps, to which a mad hatter attached wide brim for fun. In their hands, holding weapons in front of them, the guests held. "Revolvers," thought Tom. -No, daggers. - He involuntarily groaned when he realized that he was mistaken, and twice. One of the guests turned his face to Radcliffe and turned out to be a woman. The small, bright mouth was tightly closed, turning into a crimson bud; eyes sparkled like a cat's. The dagger turned out to be a wand, an ordinary yew wand, thirteen and a half inches long. The wand of the second guest, judging by the color and texture, was carved from ebonite. A scallop, Tom remembered. At his house he kept an ebonite comb, given by his mother for his thirteenth birthday. -I - began Tom. He misunderstood what to say. Even worse, he knew what to do. Fortunately - or rather, unfortunately - everything was decided by itself, without Tomov's participation. The bright-mouthed woman waved her wand, shouting a word like the scream of a sparrow hawk, and an invisible noose wrapped around Tom's knees. An instant, and the noose tightened tight, forcing Radcliffe to fall. He hit the gate sash painfully - first sideways, and then with his ear. There was a buzzing in my head, as if bells were ringing under the vaults of the skull, gathering people to church. Tom almost swore, forgetting that his mother had not ordered swearing in front of the ladies, and found that his tongue was frozen, and his whole body turned into a dead log. -Ladies and gentlemen, - Mr.Holmes said from the fence, and Tom knew that everything would be all right now. -I would like to know what is going on here. I recommend that you do not make sudden movements. Fighting the numbness Tom twisted his neck until it cracked - and saw that Mr.Holmes, as befits a gentleman in a difficult situation, reinforces his words with a revolver. Dr.Watson, also armed, kept a step behind, closer to the exit from the garden. Judging by the purple spots on the doctor's cheeks, he was more inclined to shoot than to ask questions. Tom could also see the vicar's house. Outside the living room window, a portrait raged on the wall. A dandy angel known to Tom was dancing in the frame, grimacing wildly and making obscene gestures. At times he lost all beauty, turning into a terrifying old man - this happened when the dandy partially went beyond the gilded borders of the frame. Tom closed his eyes in horror, and when he opened his eyes again, Mr.Holmes and Dr.Watson stood in their former positions, but Mr.Holmes no longer asked anything. A serpentine hiss crept from the mouth of the male guest, an ebonite stick drew complex patterns in the air, and the barrels of revolvers, against the will of their owners, lifted up to the sky, and the muscles of the valiant English twisted into knots, preventing Holmes and Watson from acting at their discretion. Only the glances lived an independent life: furious at the doctor, coolly attentive at Holmes. -You will know everything, - the woman said with a sneer. Don't rush things, gentlemen. She turned back to Jenny. The girl's posture didn't suggest violent supernatural intervention, but Jenny still hadn't lifted a finger. Stood and waited; unless, of course, it was tetanus from fright. More than anything, Tom wished that Jenny would now fly over the garden in a halo of swirling light - and crush the villains who broke into the vicar's house, as she had crushed the Martians earlier. Tom prayed for it putting into prayer passion and hatred, which he had not previously suspected in himself. But the Lord, it seems, favored the earthly aliens more than the Martian ones. -Nothing personal, baby, - the woman said. A ball of blue sparks began to accumulate at the end of her yew wand. But when the killer gift was about to break into flight, the unforeseen happened. Widow Priestley gave a slight start as she hummed her lullaby, and the jug of milk fell on the bench, shattering. A white stream of milk gushed down onto the grass. The puddle quickly spread, approaching the feet of the woman with the wand, and as soon as the guest made a sharp wave, her foot, shod in a smart shoe with leather soles, rode on the wet grass. A ball of sparks shot up; instead of striking the impassive Jenny, the sparks crackled into the blue of the sky. The woman tried to regain her balance, failed, and collapsed on her back, side by side with Tom. Radcliffe clearly saw that the back of the unfortunate woman's head came into contact with the forged fastening for the noose. There was a disgusting crack. The woman's legs twitched in a dreadful dance. Her companion groaned, took a step towards the dying, but at the last moment he remembered Jenny. - It's you! he yelled. - It's all you! And he added two or three words in gibberish. He was unlucky: before he could finish the phrase, Fozzie, the beloved cat of the widow Priestley, fell from the branches of an apple tree onto the head of a rude man. Judging by the heart-rending yelp of the animal and the wild scream of the victim, Fozzie's claws, through the hat felt and hair, nicely ripped the skin on the top of his head and temples. Blood flowed from under the hat. Dropping his wand, the guest threw up his hands, wanting to catch the angry creature; Fozzie, don't be a fool darted back up the tree. The apple bough cracked, the birdhouse attached to it swayed and fell right on the man. He was just raising his wand from the ground, as if the whole world had now been reduced to a piece of ebonite for him. The birdhouse fell to the poor fellow below the back of the head, strictly between the neck and the base of the skull. The crunch was repeated, and there was one more dead man in the garden. - Bye-bye, children on a spruce branch. - I want to go home, - Jenny suddenly said. -I want to go home - The corner of her mouth twitched arrhythmically, as if Jenny was deciding whether to smile at her or sob. 5. A state close to a trance strictly between the neck and the base of the skull. The crunch was repeated, and there was one more dead man in the garden. - Bye-bye, children on a spruce branch. - I want to go home, - Jenny suddenly said. -I want to go home - The corner of her mouth twitched arrhythmically, as if Jenny was deciding whether to smile at her or sob. 5. A state close to a trance strictly between the neck and the base of the skull. The crunch was repeated, and there was one more dead man in the garden. - Bye-bye, children on a spruce branch. - I want to go home, - Jenny suddenly said. -I want to go home - The corner of her mouth twitched arrhythmically, as if Jenny was deciding whether to smile at her or sob. 5. A state close to a trance. 
- Who are they? Captain Wallace frowned at the dead bodies. He arrived in a cart, taking Corporal and Sergeant Jenkins with him. Together with the military, a neighbor boy sat proudly on the edge of the cart, whom Sherlock Holmes caught for seditious activities - peeping through a gap in the fence - and sent for the captain. And it was like this: - Do you want to earn a shilling? - I do, sir! Even two! What should be done? -Do you know where the military intelligence department is located? - Behind the fence, they grunted contemptuously: -Who doesn't know? At Moot Hall, clear penny! -Run over there and tell Captain Wallace... - Holmes explained what he had to tell, made the boy repeat the lesson, and handed him the promised shilling. -You'll get a second one if the captain is here in half an hour. The messenger honestly earned the second coin. -These are occultists from Wiltshire, - Holmes informed the captain in such a tone as if talking about a baker and his wife living around the corner. - Fatal accident; twice, equal as shillings. - Accident? - Alas. Bad luck for the poor. Tom Radcliffe was often told that he was like a rhinoceros in skin and like an oak block in subtlety. But even Tom easily read in the captain's return look everything that Wallace thinks about "accidents". You won't believe it, Captain! Dr.Watson hastened to intervene. -But that's exactly what happened! -I don't believe it, - Wallace agreed. - Never. "Nevertheless, it's true!" Both I and Mr.Holmes saw the lady slip. Falling, she hit the back of her head on the hinge on the gate. And a birdhouse fell on the gentleman. The bough, you know, broke off. Sometimes. - Yeah, - confirmed Tom. - I saw it too. -I came late, - Professor Van Helsing sighed. - I did not find this tragic incident. But I have no doubt in the words of these worthy gentlemen. To tell the truth, the professor did not come, but ran. You could even say he rushed in - with a revolver in one hand and an open bag in the other. There was no need to shoot - the dead lay quietly. The help of a doctor also turned out to be superfluous: Holmes, and Watson, and Tom, and Mrs. Priestley managed to recover. It quickly became clear that the venerable lady did not remember anything. She took Jenny out into the garden to get some air before going to bed, sat down on a bench, dozed off - and accidentally brushed a jug of milk off the table. -It must have been a nightmare, - the widow agreed. The doctor hastily led the vicar's housekeeper with Jenny into the house; it seems that Mrs. Priestley did not notice either the dead, or the broken tree, or the smashed gate. I complained about the table, and okay. But Jenny didn't care. She smiled crookedly - her nasty smile gave Tom goosebumps! - and in a mechanical voice of the doll she repeated: - I want to go home. She will be silent and again: - I want to go home. - A state close to a trance, - the professor determined. Squatting on his haunches, he carefully looked into Jenny's eyes and, out of habit, checked his teeth. Everything was fine with the teeth. I wouldn't recommend pestering her with questions. We see the defensive reaction of the brain to the experienced events. A week of rest, good nutrition, healthy sleep - and our little one will get better. -I'm afraid neither we nor Jenny have this week. Everyone looked at Holmes. Tom did not know how to read people's minds, but he also understood that Mr.Holmes was not joking. - What are you speaking about? exclaimed Dr.Watson. - What are you about? cried the professor. Holmes did not have time to answer: Captain Wallace arrived. I understand perfectly, Captain. how it all looks, - taking out a pipe, Holmes began to fill it with tobacco. But you are an observant person. You can see for yourself: everything happened exactly as Dr.Watson said. -Is this, - the captain asked quickly, -relevant to the case you are investigating? - - Indirect. I must report that I am close to completing the investigation. Ready to share the findings, but I warn you: the story will be long. -Alas, - the captain sighed, -I don't have much time. Observers around London are reporting Martian activity for the first time in a week. It looks like the enemy is preparing a new offensive. Major Forester ordered to expedite the study of the captured Martian equipment, organize the laying of mines and coordinate with the artillerymen a plan for the defense of the city. If I get a free minute, I'll try to drop in on you. -Time, - Holmes nodded thoughtfully. -We are all short on time. I can briefly report that much more serious forces were involved in the case than I initially thought. What we see is just the tip of the iceberg. Forget the unfortunate piece of paper, it doesn't matter. The key is Jenny. I am sure that even more serious shocks await us than so far. The major is right: we must prepare the defense of the city. If you free yourself, captain, you'll find us here. The corporal and the sergeant began to load the bodies of the sorcerers onto the cart. Tom didn't look at it. Only now did he notice that he was shaking after the experience. I had to urgently think of something to do. Radcliffe found out long ago: when the hands are busy with work, the soul becomes calmer. As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time far more serious forces were involved in the matter than I initially thought. What we see is just the tip of the iceberg. Forget the unfortunate piece of paper, it doesn't matter. The key is Jenny. I am sure that even more serious shocks await us than so far. The major is right: we must prepare the defense of the city. If you free yourself, captain, you'll find us here. The corporal and the sergeant began to load the bodies of the sorcerers onto the cart. Tom didn't look at it. Only now did he notice that he was shaking after the experience. I had to urgently think of something to do. Radcliffe found out long ago: when the hands are busy with work, the soul becomes calmer. As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time far more serious forces were involved in the matter than I initially thought. What we see is just the tip of the iceberg. Forget the unfortunate piece of paper, it doesn't matter. The key is Jenny. I am sure that even more serious shocks await us than so far. The major is right: we must prepare the defense of the city. If you free yourself, captain, you'll find us here. The corporal and the sergeant began to load the bodies of the sorcerers onto the cart. Tom didn't look at it. Only now did he notice that he was shaking after the experience. I had to urgently think of something to do. Radcliffe found out long ago: when the hands are busy with work, the soul becomes calmer. As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time What we see is just the tip of the iceberg. Forget the unfortunate piece of paper, it doesn't matter. The key is Jenny. I am sure that even more serious shocks await us than so far. The major is right: we must prepare the defense of the city. If you free yourself, captain, you'll find us here. The corporal and the sergeant began to load the bodies of the sorcerers onto the cart. Tom didn't look at it. Only now did he notice that he was shaking after the experience. I had to urgently think of something to do. Radcliffe found out long ago: when the hands are busy with work, the soul becomes calmer. As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time What we see is just the tip of the iceberg. Forget the unfortunate piece of paper, it doesn't matter. The key is Jenny. I am sure that even more serious shocks await us than so far. The major is right: we must prepare the defense of the city. If you free yourself, captain, you'll find us here. The corporal and the sergeant began to load the bodies of the sorcerers onto the cart. Tom didn't look at it. Only now did he notice that he was shaking after the experience. I had to urgently think of something to do. Radcliffe found out long ago: when the hands are busy with work, the soul becomes calmer. As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time we must prepare the defense of the city. If you free yourself, captain, you'll find us here. The corporal and the sergeant began to load the bodies of the sorcerers onto the cart. Tom didn't look at it. Only now did he notice that he was shaking after the experience. I had to urgently think of something to do. Radcliffe found out long ago: when the hands are busy with work, the soul becomes calmer. As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time we must prepare the defense of the city. If you free yourself, captain, you'll find us here. The corporal and the sergeant began to load the bodies of the sorcerers onto the cart. Tom didn't look at it. Only now did he notice that he was shaking after the experience. I had to urgently think of something to do. Radcliffe found out long ago: when the hands are busy with work, the soul becomes calmer. As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time As a result, he removed the birdhouse from the broken bough - and climbed a tree: to attach a birdhouse to another branch. 6. It's about time. 
Long purple shadows stretched across the garden. The air seemed to thicken and darken, quickly losing its daytime transparency. The edge of the sun could be seen over Bassett Forest, crimson, like an ember in a dying fire. It became noticeably cooler, but Tom was sweating: he was waving a hammer, knocking together a table spoiled by sorcerers. Tom would have finished the work long ago, but he had to take frequent breaks. First, it is impolite to knock, preventing gentlemen from talking. And secondly, Tom burned with curiosity and was afraid to miss even a word. -Poor Jenny needs protection! the professor said emphatically. Dr.Watson treated him to his cigar, wishing to save himself and others from the acrid smoke of Partagas, and now Van Helsing savored the doctor's Gurkha with visible pleasure. -We need to go to the military. Corporal? Sergeant? Given the degree of risk, Two bodyguards are not enough! - I completely agree with you! A rare case: the eternal debaters, the doctor and the professor showed amazing unanimity. "I'm ready to guard Jenny," Tom said. - I can handle! I am strong. Just give me a revolver and a good club. He thought and corrected himself: -Give me the revolver. I'll break the club myself. - All the royal cavalry, all the royal army. - Holmes' smile came out sad. -Everyone is ready to defend Jenny to the last drop of blood. It does you credit, gentlemen. I'm sure Captain Wallace will not refuse to provide a dozen soldiers: all the same, you won't get much with rifles against the Martians. Artillery, sappers and observers play the first fiddle in this war. But I have to disappoint you, my friends: dear little Jenny needs protection the least. - That is? - Why?! Tom stifled a sigh. he dropped the hammer on his foot. -Honestly, - Holmes blew smoke rings, -I didn't worry about Jenny even when this couple of magicians attacked. For someone else, but for Jenny - not a drop. -Did you think that the girl was not in danger? - - Exactly. Did you have any reason for this? - I see, gentlemen, you doubt. Great! I could suggest to you, Watson, or you, professor, to conduct an experiment: call Jenny here and shoot her with a revolver. Only one thing stops me... - Morality? the doctor suggested. - Fear for the child? - said the professor. - No. Fear for your lives, gentlemen. You could already be convinced: everyone who threatens sweet Jenny does not live long. Martians, visiting hoaxers... I suppose if you took the risk of shooting Jenny, at best the revolver would misfire. At worst... I'm afraid vampires would seem to you, professor, Good Samaritans versus "worst case". -You know something, Holmes! - - Watson aimed a cigar at his friend, like a barrel of a revolver smoking after a shot. - You promised to share the results of the investigation? I think now is the time. - Time. I feel it flowing away. Yes, gentlemen, I solved the case. Now I understand everything or almost everything, but I see no way out of this situation. Perhaps you have fresh ideas? So listen. Instead of starting the story, Holmes fell silent. Taking advantage of the pause, Tom hammered the final nail into the last of the three planks holding the crippled table together. Holmes seemed to be waiting for just this: he spoke as soon as the echo of a hammer blow sounded in the evening air. - You, Watson, I have already reported this, but I will briefly repeat for you, Professor. From the moment I received the telegram from Mycroft, or even earlier - since the moment when Jenny miraculously stopped the Martians - there has been a suspicious lull in the war. The war seems to be going on, but nothing really happens. The Martians are doing something in London, and no one knows what it is. Artillery fires at them from the maximum distance, the Martians snarl - that, in fact, is all. To be honest, an ineffective tactic on both sides. I spoke to Captain Wallace about this, and he seemed offended for the army. - The calm before the storm? The doctor shrugged. -You have no idea how right you are, my friend! Against the backdrop of a general lull in the provincial - sorry, Tom! - Moldone's life is in full swing. Strange events happen one after another. Like Maldon - be proud, Tom! - suddenly became the center not only of England, but of the entire solar system! And the beginning of the events was put by the girl Jenny, effortlessly finished with a dozen combat Martian machines. Previously, nothing extraordinary happened in the vicinity of Maldon. Holmes fell silent, allowing the listeners to properly comprehend what was said. The sun completely disappeared behind the forest, the first fireflies of stars lit up in the sky. In the evenings, Tom used to like to look at the placers of silver in the bottomless, bewitching blackness. From this spectacle, his heart sank, and his soul became somehow sublime. Later, Tom slept well, and his dreams were mostly pleasant. Now, a clear menace emanated from the gloom overhead. The stars—the eyes of strangers, fixed and unkind—watched Tom, hiding like octopuses behind an inky veil. After all, from there, from the black skies, the Martians fell upon the earth. Who knows what other monsters will follow them? -Yes, I remember, - the professor broke the pause. -Jenny has activated powerful forces unknown to us. Once summoned, they won't disappear just like that! The child, not knowing what he was doing, opened the door to the abyss. We will close this door! If you need my help, knowledge, any assistance - I am completely at your disposal, gentlemen! Your help will really come in handy. Do you think that the adherents of the secret sciences, with the help of an occult ritual, invoked some kind of supernatural power? Let's say the Liggins were preparing the appropriate rite when a heat beam hit their house. Jenny could well have accidentally ended the ritual by reading the final spell aloud. Contrary to expectations, there was not a hint of irony or sarcasm in Holmes's tone. - You're right! Van Helsing exclaimed ardently. -I couldn't have put it better myself. So, you have established what this vile power is? Can you imagine how to calm her down? Holmes sighed. professor... Personally, I am inclined to consider these phenomena as forces of nature, which we have yet to know. A savage from the Andaman Islands will consider electricity or a car magical. We, proud of our civilization, are ready to consider the painless removal of a wisdom tooth as magic. The exploits of Jenny, Count Orlok, ghosts and sorcerers are a consequence, not a cause. We are talking about forces much more powerful. Van Helsing dropped to a whisper, -More? Are you talking about the enemy of the human race?! Holmes made a negative gesture. - What do you mean? -Time, - Sherlock Holmes replied. - Time and space. ready to consider the painless removal of a wisdom tooth as magic. The exploits of Jenny, Count Orlok, ghosts and sorcerers are a consequence, not a cause. We are talking about forces much more powerful. Van Helsing dropped to a whisper, -More? Are you talking about the enemy of the human race?! Holmes made a negative gesture. - What do you mean? -Time, - Sherlock Holmes replied. - Time and space. ready to consider the painless removal of a wisdom tooth as magic. The exploits of Jenny, Count Orlok, ghosts and sorcerers are a consequence, not a cause. We are talking about forces much more powerful. Van Helsing dropped to a whisper, -More? Are you talking about the enemy of the human race?! Holmes made a negative gesture. - What do you mean? -Time, - Sherlock Holmes replied. - Time and space.
Sideshow Morality of Traders. 
- ... this, of course, is not about those cases when day laborers, for the sake of the market, intercepting plots and images that the reader loves, begin to scribble books, for example, about -the new adventures of Sherlock Holmes. This happened, but this is a fact of merchant morality, not literature. "
- Dmitry Bilenkin, - Tyunya read aloud a quote about obsequious day laborers, mentioning the author of the quote. Who is this, why don't I know? She looked over my shoulder. I can't stand it, but I have to endure it, pardon the pun. -Writer, - I explained. - Fiction writer. Do you know what science fiction writers are? Tyunya nodded, -Yeah. All writers are in pants, and science fiction writers are without pants. This is in short. Did you take a quote from his novel? - From the afterword. - To his book? Tuna persisted. - To someone else's book. - And why the hell did you introduce this commercial morality into the program? For Holmes? I remained silent, giving her a chance to comprehend the situation. - No, - Tyunya quickly corrected herself, tormenting the tablet. - We have already injected Holmes up to the tonsils. Bilenkin is yours... Is it modern? Yeah, I see: thirty-three - eighty-seventh. The twentieth century. "Landing on Mercury", "Space God", "Landing on Saturn". No, landing on Saturn is not it. I know those paratroopers. "The Adventures of Polynov", "The End of the Law". Tyunya looked up at me: - Hey, Bullfinch. And to which book did he write an afterword? -Look, - I waved. - And you will. Chapter Ten What is the fourth dimension?
1. Damn, God forgive me!
Holmes, you speak in riddles! Dr.Watson took a watch out of his pocket, clicked the lid and stared at the dial, as if waiting for an answer from the hands. In the darkness descending on the garden, this was not the best option. Mrs. Priestley came out of the house, unusually quiet. In her hands the vicar's housekeeper carried a tray of plates and cutlery. She began to arrange the dishes on the table, blessing Tom's golden hands. -You must be hungry, gentlemen, - the widow explained. - There is cold veal, bread and salad. Now I'll bring napkins and tea. Yes, there is also apple jam. -Thank you, - Holmes bowed politely. - You are very kind. Don't worry, that's enough for us. When the housekeeper left, he turned to the audience: - I meant that our yesterday, and therefore today, is constantly changing. Do not rush to object! The changes started from the moment when Jenny stopped the Martians. No one notices this, except me - and partly you, Watson. Let's start with the late Liggins. When the conversation comes up about them, everyone gets confused with the names. It started with Silas and Martha, but quickly turned to Balthazar and Melchior! -Of course, Balthazar and Melchiora! Tom wanted to confirm and bit his tongue. -Maybe it's Silas and Martha after all? - No, nonsense! .. Mr.Holmes is right, here the mind goes beyond the mind! -The clothes of the Liggins have changed, as Mr.Masons rightly remarked, - continued Holmes. - In place of trousers, shirt and dress were obscene robes. At first, no one could remember where the Liggins had come to Maldon, and then Jenny. Now everyone is sure: from Godrix Hollow! Further: a patient of St. Peter's Hospital - a sailor from the "Son of Thunder" - and his testimony. Watson, you knew that there was no sailor in the hospital! You only then "remembered": yes, sailor! And the monster in the bay? His tentacle, cut off by the heat beam, at first looked like the tentacle of an octopus, then became like a Martian's tentacle, and then completely spread out into a puddle of mucus. Remember Watson? -Very vague, - the doctor admitted. -My memory is double. But Holmes, you sin against logic! If everyone denies the original version and firmly believes in the second one, everyone except you! -Then why am I among the exceptions? - I remember both options and they drive me crazy! Never in his life did Sherlock Holmes look at Dr.Watson the way he did now - with love, tenderness and friendly warmth, which he did not want to hide behind his usual equanimity. -You are part of me, dear Watson. Or, if you prefer, I am part of you. Where Holmes is, there is Watson. Where Watson is, there is Holmes. And there is no power in the world that can change that. - Thank you, my friend, - the doctor's eyes softened. -Now that you've mentioned it - He fell silent, overwhelmed by a rush of feelings. Suddenly his face cleared up, and Watson began to pat his pockets in search of some thing. Widow Priestley returned with tea, a stack of starched napkins, and a lighted lantern. The table became lighter, and the doctor took out a plump notebook in a blue calico cover: - Since the moment you appeared, Holmes, I have resumed my notes! If I forgot something, you can check with them! - Great! Your notes will come in handy, but for now I'm relying on my own memory. First, let's finish with the facts and move on to dessert - to the conclusions. The fragment of the newspaper changes: "Daily Telegraph" turns into "Daily Profit". The map of England changes: Godrics Hollow is announced in Wiltshire. People's memories and material objects change... - Damn, God forgive me! Tucking a napkin into his collar, the doctor placed a large piece of cold veal on his plate. Paradoxes seem to have whetted Watson's appetite. - In the current situation, I am ready to consider even the hypothesis of "devilry," Holmes agreed. But, fortunately, this is not required. In devilry, you, professor, understand much more than me. Tell me, is the enemy of the human race capable of such tricks? - Never! Van Helsing exclaimed. -Only God can do this! - Why not people? - People?! - Drop all the impossible, professor. What remains will be the answer, no matter how incredible it may seem. So, we are convinced that changes originate in the past - and run forward in a wave, changing the realities of today. A chain of accidents, coincidences? Mass clouding of reason? Hypnosis, finally? This could explain one or two similar cases, but not all at once! Manifestation of supernatural powers? This, of course, can explain anything. But metaphysics is not omnipotent either, as the respected professor has confirmed to us. What remains? Is reality like clay? Time is like a potter's wheel? But this is... This is divine power! Van Helsing's hands shook with excitement. The professor spilled the tea past the cup, and Tom froze with his mouth open, not bringing the chunk of meat planted on the fork to the target. - Calm down, please. The power is divine, but they use it like Vicar Simpson with a hammer: a blow on a nail, two on the fingers. Of all the creatures I know, only man is capable of such a thing! From which the conclusion suggests itself that by the twenty-first century the human race has not changed much. - Twenty first century? Date mentioned by Jenny? - Quite right. I have no doubt that she, or that entity, what is inside the girl is from the twenty-first century. From the center that organizes the changes in our reality with you. - Essence? Inside the girl? The trouble does not come alone: ​​as soon as Tom bit off a piece, he immediately choked. -Excuse me, gentlemen, - Holmes patted the loader on his mighty back, -I ran ahead. There is enough chaos around us to multiply it, jumping from one thought to another. Are you still following the chain of my conclusions? - Yes! Tom nodded. Eyes turned to the young man, and Tom was embarrassed in the extreme. -I will continue, - Holmes regained the attention of those present. -Someone in the future, who owns the technology of changes in time, decides to conduct an experiment. Suppose he is an enemy of the Martians and our friend - now it is not so important. Another thing is important: any impact has its limitations. Otherwise, old England would have been occupied by the Merlin armada, turned the Martians into teddy bears - and disappeared without a trace. Nothing of the kind happened, which means that the past cannot be changed as one pleases. I think this is fraught with cataclysms, one of which is brewing at the moment. - Another cataclysm? Not enough Martians for us?! From the side of the breach, where the gate used to be, there was a cautious rustle. Tom turned at the sound, grabbing his hammer. Van Helzing reached for his revolver. In the darkness under the trees, rifle bolts clanged: the sergeant and corporal were on the alert. But it's just Reverend Simpson back. Looking around timidly, averting his eyes from the guests sitting at the table, the vicar slipped like a mouse into his own house. Soon the voice of the widow Priestley came from the hall. The housekeeper seemed to have regained her former glibness and was now arguing with the vicar: the priest did not allow her to go out into the yard. Judging by the fact that Mrs. Priestley soon showed up on the porch with another tray, the victory remained with the widow. And the soldiers got their dinner despite Simpson's protests. -The more powerful the force, - Holmes continued, -the more careful handling of it requires. When a clumsy picks up a kitchen knife, he risks cutting himself. Swap a knife for a revolver and the risk increases: a fool can shoot himself in the foot or accidentally kill a roommate. A person working in a powder warehouse with a cigar in his mouth, with a high probability, will not only fly into the air himself, but also kill hundreds of innocent people. What then to say about time?! And with him, judging by the results, they are treated without due reverence, as with an errand boy. - Running errand time?! Van Helzing coughed. - Are you sure? May be, we just can not understand the plan of the inhabitants of the future? - Watson, the other day you gave me a good comparison from the field of literature. Remember? The author creates a character, describes his appearance, invents dialogue, and then crosses out five or six paragraphs, realizing that this character is superfluous in the book. This is exactly what we are seeing. Reality changes, as if the past has been rewritten over and over again, like a draft of a novel. Having armed Jenny with magic, a more than dubious weapon, the manipulator was faced with the need to back up magic with credibility. He goes through the options, but any of them does not fit well into the stubborn English pragmatism, requiring additional justification. Imagine that you are propping up a collapsing building, but each prop is unstable and in turn requires a new prop. - My head is spinning, Holmes, Dr.Watson admitted, expressing the general opinion. -But even so I want to believe that the building will stand. Why are you confident in the coming cataclysm? -For three reasons, my friend. First, the turbulence of events is intensifying. The ship is rocking more and more: a storm is approaching. Secondly, the last prop worked very badly. A snippet of the Daily Profit set fire to the fuse that led to the bomb. Well, the third reason is me, Sherlock Holmes. What are you doing here, Holmes? After all, it's not you who manipulate our past? The doctor broke off, and Professor Van Helzing began to examine Holmes with suspicious interest. - No, unfortunately, the manipulator is not me. I'm much better at foreseeing the consequences of my actions. Watson, my friend, I remember your opinion about tripods: -We should have such machines in Afghanistan! - Our manipulator would be happy to meet you halfway. I'm a reinsurer, I'm afraid to even imagine what would start in Afghanistan if we invaded there on Martian tripods! Gentlemen, I solved this case. I know what needs to be done to restore the status quo. But I dont know how. I'm afraid this is impossible. Jumping up from the excess of feelings, Van Helsing began to fumble in his pockets in search of a new cigar. The doctor handed him the Gurkha, but the professor did not notice the friendly gesture. - Impossible?! he exclaimed. - We'll see! Yesterday you were sure that vampires are a whim of nervous girls! And now? Tell me! -Very well, - agreed Holmes. -It all started with little Jenny, and everything will end with her. If the girl disappears, the mess will stop. Mein Gott! the professor was horrified. "Are you suggesting that an innocent child be killed?" - In no case. I'm not suicidal - you know very well what happens to the poor, attacking Jenny. The girl just needs to be removed from our reality, alive and unharmed - the same as the manipulator placed her here. Now the child is like a catalyst for a chemical reaction. Remove the catalyst - and the process will stop by itself. If we had the capabilities of a manipulator, or at least the car that he uses - A car? Watson wondered. And thoughtfully repeated with a strange grimace: - The car. - Well, of course! Doesn't the manipulator carry props manually? Remember Jenny's entry? -Repeat the request to the machine. A logical error has occurred." With the help of a miracle machine, we could return to the starting point - the attack of the Martians on Maldon - and extract Jenny from our reality a moment before the start of magical outrage. We would have sent her home - in vain, or something, child obsessed with returning? Kharkov of the twenty-first century? Yes, even Atlantis minus the sixteenth! The main thing is to remove the catalyst from the Maldon boiler - a troublemaker. So I say: we have a solution and there is no way to implement it. I admit my defeat, gentlemen. I, Sherlock Holmes, surrender. Doctor Watson got up from the table. He straightened up, regaining the bearing of a military medic. He brushed an imaginary speck of dust from his lapel. And he looked at his old friend with the eyes of an officer inspecting recruits before the battle: - Give up? You who challenged Moriarty's criminal genius? Conqueror of the Reichenbach Falls? The hunter who outsmarted the cold-blooded killer Moran? And now Sherlock Holmes intends to retreat?! Holmes spread his hands with a sigh. - Well, - the doctor concluded, his eyes sparkling, - we will consider your statement as a momentary weakness. A minute has passed, it's time to get down to business. It's elementary, Holmes! Listen to me and you will understand that I am right! -One minute, - Van Helsing interrupted his monologue. - I'll be right back. The professor disappeared into the vicar's house, pulling a revolver from under his cloak as he went. Through the window, Reverend Simpson could be seen kneeling in the middle of the living room, lit by two candelabra, his hands folded in prayer before his chest. It was not the crucifix, as one might expect, but the portrait on the wall that captured the vicar's attention. The door opened and Van Helzing, without a word, fired three bullets into the canvas, one after the other. For a moment it seemed that the beautiful young man depicted in the portrait was trying to escape - and even almost got out of the frame! - but the fourth bullet, hitting his forehead, turned him into an evil, and most importantly, motionless old man. With a piercing shriek, the vicar began tearing his hair out. The professor left the drawing room, not in the least interested in Reverend Simpson's hysteria. Rifles clanged belatedly in the garden, but Holmes stopped the soldiers: -It's all right. There is no threat. - Please, doctor, - returning, the professor took his place at the table. - Continue. And he began to reload the revolver. 2. Bouquet of withered flowers. 
Dr.Watson's Story In my story, gentlemen, I will be forced to go back many years, as if I had a time machine. So this story began in blessed memory in 1987, shortly after I returned from San Francisco, where I had a private medical practice. And don't smile, Holmes! I remember very well how you condemned my departure to America. Now, as much as it hurts me, I have to admit that you are right. All your arguments, from the purely mercantile to the highest, including the appeal to British patriotism, turned out to be impeccable. My fault, my great fault! Anyway, I ended up back in London. The prodigal son returned to Baker Street, under the wing of the kindest Mrs. Hudson, and began to think seriously about acquiring a new medical practice - say, in Paddington or even in Chelsea. Bachelor, I did not know then that in less than twelve months I would meet my dear Mary and enter into legal marriage with her. Alas, our happiness was not judged for a long century! But back to the main thing, leaving the family troubles of the Watson couple to other biographers. My thoughts were occupied with medicine, or rather, with the way of applying my professional skills; you, Holmes, in those days seldom resorted to the humble help of your obedient servant, meditating on the terrible crimes of Jack the Ripper - and I, having too much leisure, devoted it to the most unexpected pursuits. So I got to South Kensington, more precisely, to the School of Mines. It all started with an ad in the Westminster Review. It said that on the fourteenth of January in the public hall of the Mining School there would be a regular meeting of the Debating Society. As part of the meeting, a report was planned by a certain student of Hamilton-Gordon on the possibilities of non-Euclidean geometry. You are right professor! I am ready to cure Euclid of a fever for a modest fee, Mr.Euclid ask me, but I understand little about the complex relationship of legs and hypotenuses. I was not interested in the report itself, but in the footnote to the announcement. The editors of the newspaper notified readers that the report was based on Charles Hinton's book "What is the Fourth Dimension", published three years earlier. Below was the opinion of the Westminster Review experts: "Those who seek mental gymnastics will find enough of it in Hinton's The Fourth Dimension." Believe it or not, Holmes, I had the pleasure of reading this book. The following thesis especially sunk into my soul: -Everything that I borrow from the treasury of Plato, lies in one simple thing - this is a world spatially higher than our world - a world that can be approached only through its raw material, a world that must be comprehended stubbornly, patiently, with the help of things peculiar to it and forms, movements, images peculiar to it ." Of course, I went to the meeting of the Debating Society, eager to hear the report of Hamilton-Gordon - even if there was a whole battalion of hypotenuses, led by Major Non-Euclid! I am extremely pleased to recall that at the lecture I met HG Wells, a modest young man studying at King's College at the University of London, in whose person we soon received a brilliant author of stories about the invisible man and the island of Dr. Moreau. We were introduced to each other by Sir William Reynolds, in the past - by the way, and in the future, when I again acquired a practice - my client. Sir William lived in Richmond, where he had a private house, and I visited him when he needed the healing action of medicine. A man versed in many sciences, but extremely extravagant, Sir William said to me, when young Wells and I shook hands: - Know, Watson, this boy is your death! Wells was wildly embarrassed, but I took what was said for a joke. - In what sense? I smiled. -Literary, - said Sir William gravely. -And know that not even Sherlock Holmes can save you. Yes, Holmes, you are right. I also think that Sir William was mistaken. In the duel between the invisible man and you, I will bet on you, my friend. The public hall, as it turned out, was located in the basement. The great crowding of the people, the closeness and stuttering of the speaker put me in a bad mood. I'm ashamed to admit I dozed off three times and woke up extremely worried. Wells, on the other hand, was very attentive, and Sir William constantly made notes in a notebook. At the end of the report, he remarked: -Hinton is right. We really must begin to accumulate intellectual means to increase the complexity of our knowledge in terms of the number of dimensions. The next step will be our practical evaluation of each of them. - A car, sir? suggested young Wells. - Time Machine? - Time? said Sir William. Why only time? On this we said goodbye. I will add that, in addition to our company, Oscar Wilde was present at the report, regularly interrupting the speaker with ridicule and caustic remarks. In the summer, The Court and Society Review published Wilde's story "The Canterville Ghost", where the author continued his ridicule - his ghost, wanting to hide from annoying people, he went into the "fourth dimension". Frankly speaking, I would not have remembered this incident if, in the ninety-third year, six years later, Sir William had not invited me as one of his chosen guests to Richmond. I was not averse to unwinding: only a year had passed since my dear Mary passed away, taking our son with her to the grave. A disconsolate widower, I considered selling my practice in Kensington, where I had moved from Paddington in 1991, and returning to Baker Street. You, Holmes, were then listed as dead - the Reichenbach Falls became your official grave - but even in an empty apartment, the memory of your violin and habit of shooting at the wall during meditation would brighten up my insomnia. I clutched the invitation with both hands, thinking it would amuse me. And so it happened. In Richmond, Sir William stunned us with the news that he had created a time machine and even made an exciting journey into the future with it. To be honest, when I listened to his story, I found myself thinking that these adventures could have come from the pen of a writer of dime novels rather than from the lips of a serious scholar. Crazy landscapes, the end of civilization, Morlock cannibals and Eloi hamsters, the post-apocalypse, the dying of the Earth... Pay me The Court and Society Review thirty - no, fifty pounds! - for writing such rubbish, and I swear on my honor, I would flatly refuse! The skepticism must have been clearly visible on my face, because I was the first person Sir William addressed after a long pause: -No, - he said, smiling softly, -I don't even hope that you will believe me. Take my story for a lie or for a prophecy. Consider that I saw it in a dream in my own laboratory. Imagine that I was thinking about the future fate of mankind and came up with this fairy tale. Treat my assurances of its authenticity as a mere ploy, a desire to give it more interest. But, referring to all this as a fiction, what do you say? I was confused, not knowing what to answer. On the table separating us from the narrator lay a bunch of withered white flowers. Trying to divert the conversation to the side, I began to look at them. They had strange pestles, which I did not fail to declare aloud. The type of flowers also remained a mystery to me. It seemed as if I had released some kind of cocked spring: everyone started talking at once. They thanked for the pleasant time spent, regretted that Sir William did not write articles, noted that it was already late, that we should think about how we would now go home; someone reminded me that the station was full of cabs. Only Sir William stood motionless. He gave the impression of being sick; wet forehead, wandering glance. After a halting monologue that only convinced me that our master's magnificent mind had cracked, Sir William seized the lamp and rushed down the corridor. We ran after him, afraid that he would do something terrible. But no, he just led us to the time machine. Bronze, Holmes. Ebony, professor. Ivory, gentlemen. Yes, Tom, that's not all. Also quartz, or other crystals unknown to me, similar to quartz. The car managed to go through alterations: its parts were mutilated, covered with disgusting spots. The strips of metal buckled as if from a mighty pressure, tufts of grass and moss hung from them. -Excuse me, - said Sir William, touching one of the curved strips. And we returned to the smoking room. leaving, I hinted to Sir William that he was overworked. Frankly, the confidence in my voice could be more. The appearance of the car greatly shook my natural skepticism. I remember Sir William well: standing at the door, he, usually restrained, loudly shouted after us: - Good night, gentlemen! Good night! It was the last time we saw each other. Later I learned that Sir William had disappeared. When you, my dear Holmes, were resurrected, I wanted to ask you for help in finding a time traveler - or an unfortunate madman who lost his common sense - but first we were distracted by Colonel Moran with his blowgun, and soon I myself put the car out of my mind time of William Reynolds. 3. Stars fall for good luck The appearance of the car greatly shook my natural skepticism. I remember Sir William well: standing at the door, he, usually restrained, loudly shouted after us: - Good night, gentlemen! Good night! It was the last time we saw each other. Later I learned that Sir William had disappeared. When you, my dear Holmes, were resurrected, I wanted to ask you for help in finding a time traveler - or an unfortunate madman who lost his common sense - but first we were distracted by Colonel Moran with his blowgun, and soon I myself put the car out of my mind time of William Reynolds. 3. Stars fall for good luck The appearance of the car greatly shook my natural skepticism. I remember Sir William well: standing at the door, he, usually restrained, loudly shouted after us: - Good night, gentlemen! Good night! It was the last time we saw each other. Later I learned that Sir William had disappeared. When you, my dear Holmes, were resurrected, I wanted to ask you for help in finding a time traveler - or an unfortunate madman who lost his common sense - but first we were distracted by Colonel Moran with his blowgun, and soon I myself put the car out of my mind time of William Reynolds. 3. Stars fall for good luck resurrected, I wanted to ask you for help in finding a time traveler - or an unfortunate madman who has lost his common sense - but first we were distracted by Colonel Moran with his blowgun, and soon I myself put William Reynolds' time machine out of my head. 3. Stars fall for good luck resurrected, I wanted to ask you for help in finding a time traveler - or an unfortunate madman who has lost his common sense - but first we were distracted by Colonel Moran with his blowgun, and soon I myself put William Reynolds' time machine out of my head. 3. Stars fall for good luck. 
Thank you, Watson. Rising from the table, Holmes bowed to the doctor. -Thank you, my friends, - his voice trembled, but quickly regained its former firmness. -Forgive me for a moment of weakness. You gave me back my faith that all is not lost. If a time machine exists, our problem has a solution. True, in addition to moving to the twenty-first century, we also need to move in space: the delivery of Jenny from Maldon to Kharkov. But this problem is also solvable. There's a much bigger obstacle that worries me. According to you, Watson, Sir William disappeared with his car seven years ago and has not been seen since. There was a painful silence in the garden. Only the candle in the lantern crackled, dying down, and the wind, with lazy melancholy, touched the leaves in the crowns of the apple trees. A vague shadow flickered over their heads, for a fraction of a second eclipsing the twinkling stars - and rushed away so quickly that no one had time to really see her. -When the Martians went to Mauldon, - Tom suddenly said, -I prayed. He prayed that the Lord would punish them and save the city. And so it happened! "Martian stopped Jenny," the doctor said gently. Van Helzing made the sign of the cross: -We are all but instruments in His hand! - The young man is right. Sincere prayer works wonders! -I will pray, - agreed Tom. -I will ask the Lord to help you, Mr.Holmes! - The Lord works miracles, what is some kind of time machine to Him?! The second bow of Holmes was addressed to the porter Radcliffe: - Thank you, Tom. And thank you, professor - you reminded me of something. The other day I told Watson that in the last week I have been literally pursued by fortunate coincidences. I receive a telegram from my brother although south of London most of the telegraph lines have been damaged by the Martians. I catch the last train to Chelmsford. I. In short, I will not torment you with a detailed list of Fortune's smiles. I'd rather conclude: in Maldon, nothing happens just like that. Including your story about the time machine, dear Watson. What are you getting at, Holmes? Hoping for good luck? - Does it annoy you? - Holmes laughed, wrapped in tobacco smoke. -And I, you know, like to think that my investigation has a high patron. Higher than the Directorate of Military Intelligence I used to rely on facts and logic rather than gifts of fate. But now the facts and logic unanimously shout to me that the next surprise will not be long in coming. The main thing is to recognize it in time and use it correctly. -Is it not him, sir? - Tom pointed to the sky. In the night, a bright green stripe was rapidly flaring up. The space giant drew a burning line between the stars - from west to east, from Enfield and Chelmsford to the side. Towards Mauldon! - Eleventh cylinder. They began the second wave of landings. That was all Sherlock Holmes managed to say a second before the area was shaken by a heavy blow. In the Danbury area, a red glow rose to the sky - the town was on fire, or maybe the neighboring forest. The Martian projectile crashed a few miles short of Maldon. - Quicker! Tom rushed to the fence - and stopped halfway: no one followed him. "Calm down," said Holmes. - The cylinder is hot after passing through the earth's atmosphere. In the next few hours, the Martians will not get out. Now it's up to the military: they should destroy the enemy with artillery fire or dynamite. We are redundant. Or do you want to get under a crazy fragment? - No, sir. Tom was confused. - But how? .. - The promised surprise? Perhaps this is him. - So it is necessary. - It is not necessary. Sit down and wait. Dejected, Tom returned to the table: he did not like to wait. I wanted to act, run, fight! But the loader did not dare to disobey Holmes. Ten minutes of tense silence, and from the western outskirts of Maldon came the sound of gunfire. Volleys tore the darkness to shreds. A moment, another, and where the glow was seething, fiery balls of explosions swelled up - not terrible, even funny, if you look from afar. It was not clear how close the shells were to the cylinder, and whether the gunners managed to damage it. And then black angular shadows appeared on the reddish background. Two, three, four... How many of them were still hidden in the darkness? Surrounding the impact site of the cylinder, the tripods turned towards Maldon, raising the heat beam generators. It was a challenge. During the following minutes, those of the Moldonians who had the courage could watch the battle of the Martians with the British gunners, terrible in its beauty. The new tactics of Captain Wallace brought visible results. Dispersed guns fired from two dozen positions. The night, which sheltered the guns after the shot, fought on the side of the people. Heat beams darted aimlessly across the fields, groping for targets, setting fire to grass, trees, and sparse buildings. Opposite the first glow, a second rose, and the stars above faded - they were eclipsed by the flowers of the devil's fireworks. It should be noted that the efforts of the batteries also did not bring significant results - the distance was too great. It seems that the gunners managed to damage one tripod, but success was limited to this. In response, the Martians slashed their rays along the outskirts of the city: five or six houses caught fire. Like a powder magazine, the winter brothers' dye-house flew into the air. In the crimson light of the fires, two guns lurking nearby became visible. Almost immediately, both turned into a pile of scrap, hit by a well-aimed beam. Soon the shooting stopped. The rays once again walked through the territory, showing who is the boss here, and went out. The ominous jet-black silhouettes of war machines froze like insects on dark purple silk, guarding the fallen top hat. - Did they die? - Tom's voice treacherously trembled. Our gunners? - Well, what are you! Holmes objected. - Of course not. They simply ceased fire, not wanting to give out their positions. Why waste people and tools in vain? They will strike again when the Martians go on the offensive. Will the Martians go to Maldon? -I hope the army has something to meet them with. - From afar came the sound of an explosion. Everyone turned back to Danbury. The flanking tripod swayed, its cabin shattered into pieces, spewing bright green flames. Beams struck from neighboring colossi, rushing across the field in confusion, unable to find a target. It seemed that a dozen swords were crossing, ringing on the verge of audibility, raging with rage and not being able to hit the enemy. - Exceptionally well-aimed hit! the doctor appreciated. Holmes considered. "It's only strange," he remarked, "that we didn't hear the shot." As if in response to his words, one after the other, two more explosions were heard. Their sound was noticeably weaker than from artillery shells. Again, no shots were heard. What say you, Watson? The doctor just threw up his hands. - Exactly. Very interesting. By the way, I also did not see gun flashes. Interlacing his fingers, as he often did in moments of reflection, Holmes walked along the table. No one dared to break the silence afraid to interfere with the detective's train of thought. - Will wait! I have a feeling that very soon we will know everything, and then it will be time to act. I'm sure we won't be able to sleep tonight anyway. And he began to fill his pipe. When, half an hour later, from the side of the High Street, hooves clattered on the cobblestones and there was a clatter of wheels, no one was able to sit at the table. -Two carriages, - Holmes determined by ear. - It's behind us. - Behind us? the professor was surprised. - In what sense? Holmes did not answer. A few agonizing minutes, and a cart pulled by a couple of horses stopped at the vicar's house. A familiar chariot drove up behind her - we managed to see him thanks to the lanterns mounted on special racks to the right and left of the driver. A soldier in field uniform was driving the tarantass, placing a rifle next to him. The third lantern was held by Captain Wallace. - Evacuation, gentlemen, - without preamble he announced, entering the yard. - Mr.Holmes, explain to him! - I said! the captain yelled over his shoulder. - I'm needed here! I'm just needed! Miss Pfeiffer's indignant voice was hard to miss. The soldier on the goat cringed unwillingly, pressing the back of his head into his shoulders. Of course, he carried out the order, but the soldier was afraid of the furious American woman a hundred times more than the Martians. -My daughter is right! - Adele supported the angry exclamation of Mr.Pfeiffer from the darkness. - It's arbitrary! We are staying! I have to film everything! Wallace sighed heavily. Why such a hurry, Captain? Holmes did not directly object, but he was also in no hurry to evacuate. -We just got word that reinforcements are coming from London to the Martians. When they get here, the enemy will go on the offensive. This is going to be hell! We have an hour and a half left. The railroad to Chelmsford has been cut by the Martians, but there is an additional line in town. An emergency train will be sent to the West Platform. We go to the hotel for your luggage, then to the platform, and you leave the city. You can take Jenny with you, along with Mrs. Priestley. It's not for you to look after a little girl yourself. Gentlemen, hurry up! -A couple of questions, Captain. Do you know what those explosions were? I'm talking about the explosions that sounded after the artillery ceased fire. -Forward watch monitor reported that hand grenades appeared to have been used. Who and where they threw them is unknown. According to the observer, the grenades seemed to have fallen from the sky! However, in the darkness and smoke, he could simply not see the thrower. One tripod was destroyed. Later, two more grenades exploded, but they did little harm to the Martians. And now, please - -I was talking about a couple of questions. This was the first - when Sherlock Holmes rushed to the goal, even the doomsday could not lead him astray, if it broke out over Maldon. -Remember our last fight with the Martians? You said that the retreating tripod exploded on the way for no apparent reason. Was that explosion similar to today's? Wallace considered, -You're right, sir. There is an undeniable similarity. Do you think these explosions are the work of our invisible ally? -I hope to find out soon. We're not going anywhere, captain. In the next few hours, the fate of England will be decided here. Can I count on your help? They looked into each other's eyes - Sherlock Holmes and Captain Wallace. -Yes, sir, - the captain nodded sharply, in a military way. - Say what you need. If it is within my power, I will grant your request. - Thank you for your assistance. Do you have hand grenades?
Sideshow Time is running out and I'm a fool. 
And the paper, like a sin, ended. I held fresh printouts in my hands: the printer spat out three identical copies one after the other. In black and white, they lost a lot to the original. I remember that the torch in the hands of the fleeing man served as the center of the composition. Yellow reflections grotesquely framed the mighty cannibal in the foreground. In some places, the cannibal gave off greenery, anticipating the appearance on the screens of the Incredible Hulk. Hiding behind the hero-savior was a blonde in a picturesquely tattered dress. It was not clear what was happening: either the valiant torchbearer was protecting the blonde from culinary encroachments, or was preventing her from returning to her lawful, and most importantly, beloved husband. However, the flight ended before it began: all around, closing the ring, those other monsters were preparing for a hearty dinner. Take away the color, and that's it, mortal boredom. Even a big headline looked better in red like blood: The Time Machine. The film based on Wells' novel is the old man of the sixties, with Rod Taylor and Yvette Mimo. At the bottom ran a line without a beginning, but with an end, which undoubtedly encouraged: -... the plot is very different from the literary source. The film can be watched by children of any age. -Anyone, - I repeated. - Any age. -Bullfinch, - Tyunya called. - Everything is gone, Bullfinch. - Nonsense. - Call Rattlesnake, report. - It will succeed. - The program is preparing for an emergency shutdown. Here is the notice. We have five minutes. Maximum ten. Call Rattle. - My phone is on strike. Well, then I'm calling. - Stand! I said. And he corrected himself: - I mean, sit. Proudly sit at attention! - Time, Bullfinch. Time is running out. - Really? -Time is running out, and you are a fool. - Time? Nothing, we have one more ally left. - You're delusional? - Did you find the book? afterword to which Bilenkin wrote? - Found it. - Did you read it? - No. - Well, that's right. A lot of knowledge - a lot of sadness. - Why do you need this factor, Bullfinch? What will he give? - I wanted to pull it up indirectly. Mention of Sherlock Holmes, breadwinner for imitators, in the afterword to a book based on Wells. The action takes place in England, at the height of the war of the worlds. I was afraid that there would not be enough coincidences of the chronotope to attract directly. - Time, Bullfinch. -Nothing, friend. We still have space. Chapter Eleven Bed, Grenades, Time and Space based on Wells. The action takes place in England, at the height of the war of the worlds. I was afraid that there would not be enough coincidences of the chronotope to attract directly. - Time, Bullfinch. -Nothing, friend. We still have space. Chapter Eleven Bed, Grenades, Time and Space based on Wells. The action takes place in England, at the height of the war of the worlds. I was afraid that there would not be enough coincidences of the chronotope to attract directly. - Time, Bullfinch. -Nothing, friend. We still have space. Chapter Eleven Bed, Grenades, Time and Space. 
1. Tom screams from the bell tower. 
- Grenades! Grenades are here! Tom cracked up. Tom was yelling at the top of his lungs. Tom was pumping his chest, realizing that during the day he would wheeze and gurgle. That's when his wonderful voice came in handy, capable of blocking the roar of a storm, the roar of an avalanche and artillery cannonade. Mr.Holmes said that Tom had an operatic bass. Mr.Holmes said that for the first time in the existence of the opera, the bass would serve such a noble purpose. Well, Tom tried. In vain, or what, he got out on the bell tower? - There are grenades! At the bottom! There was a barred window in the church door leading to the street. Now, as Tom knew, Mr.Holmes clung to him, scraping his nose on the bars. The Sussex beekeeper looked out into the street from St. Mary's, like a refugee fleeing ruthless rebels. Martians wouldn't have stopped the door if it had been the entrance to Christ Metropolitan Church in Canterbury, about which Tom had heard from his mother, and mother had gone to Canterbury when she was still unmarried. - Grenades! Who needs grenades! Hiding behind the Maugham family's woodshed were Dr.Watson and Professor Van Helsing, both with revolvers at the ready. Further down Church Street, in the shade of a hardware store, was Captain Wallace. Where he stationed the soldiers, Tom had no idea. According to the captain's plan, the soldiers were supposed to drive away onlookers from among the Moldonians, who would take it into their heads to be interested in the late bawler. In the opinion of Tom, who knew the temperament of his countrymen well, the soldiers were sitting idle at the moment. After the recent duel of gunners with tripods, the good Moldonians sat at home like mice, and would not go out into the streets in the middle of the night, even if they were promised Tom from the bell tower, a gold sovereign for each, including children. - Hey-gey! Hey ho! Grenades! The crates of grenades stood in a small square, or rather, at the junction of Church Street and High Street, which was wider than an ordinary junction should be. Around, at a safe distance, by order of the captain, a ring of torches was installed. Tom perfectly saw this fiery ring and its filling - boxes of death. He was very afraid that the grenades would explode from an accidental spark. He immediately expressed his concerns to Captain Wallace, but the captain reassured Tom. True, Tom understood little of the explanation and was still afraid. Rare bastard this hand grenade! A long handle made of wood, like a carpenter's hammer - at least hit your enemies on the head! According to Wallace, the handle contained a safety device called a cord. You, then, throw a grenade and hold the cord by the end, and as soon as it unwinds for ten yards, it will pull out the pin. Then lie down pray or climb the bell tower, closer to the Lord God. Okay, thought Tom, I have a bass. - Grenades! Pound! Best in the world! He remembered the faces of the captain, the doctor, the professor - yes, all the faces, whatever they were! - when Mr.Holmes announced his plan to them. Tom had never in his life seen people's faces stretch out like an empty waterskin. Nobody seems to like the plan. The professor even used such a strong word as "madness". And the gentlemen looked at Tom, who was assigned the main role in Mr.Holmes's plan: the Jericho trumpet. Dr.Watson mentioned the pipe and immediately apologized. Nothing, said Tom. Everything is fine. He did not know what kind of pipe it was, but he was firmly convinced that the doctor would not say anything bad. -They don't have grenades, - Mr.Holmes explained, without going into details: who he means. - Or there is, but very little. If we offer them weapons, they will bite. The main thing is to get in touch, start a conversation. Be on the lookout, my friends! I suspect that someone will try very hard to thwart our plan. - -Do you think they, - the captain spoke in a tense whisper, without noticing it, -are dangerous? Should we take additional measures?" -What is not dangerous now? Mr Holmes shrugged. -There are times when boiled milk can jump out of a mug and attack you. Vigilance, captain - that's our motto! And he didn't explain anything more. - Gra-a-a-anaty !!! The glow at Danbury subsided. In places, languid tongues of red flame broke through to the sky, but quickly went out. The fires have also subsided. The artillery was silent, the armored colossi of the Martians lowered the heat beam generators. Beneath them, in the crater blasted out by the fall of the cylinder, work was in full swing, drowning in darkness. A new alien brigade was preparing to start capturing old England, and then the rest of the world. "The white man's burden," Dr.Watson had said ten minutes earlier, looking with inflamed eyes at the pile of crates of grenades. - I wonder what our bloodsucking octopuses call their expansion? The burden of overworked tentacles? - Grana-ah. Something flashed below. Tom broke off in mid-sentence, gave a cock, almost turning his throat inside out. Struggling with a cough, wiping his tears with his sleeve, he leaned halfway out the window. The risk of falling out, breaking on the cobblestones of the pavement fought with curiosity, and curiosity won. Young Radcliffe was waiting for anything: renegade Martians who wanted to take the side of earthlings, heavenly angels, Merlin with a burning staff. But what Tom saw struck him to the very heart. In the ring of torches, a foot from the ground, a bed appeared. An ordinary double bed - with a roar it fell down, shuddered and firmly stood on all four legs. On the bed, embracing, sat two: a gentleman of the same age as Tom - and a young lady. The couple were extremely lucky - in the end, their bed could fall on a pile of grenade boxes. And in this case, Tom, despite his respect for Captain Wallace, would not have given a broken penny for a successful outcome of events. "Mother! thought Radcliffe. -Of course you would have told me to turn away. Still would have weighed a slap, with your character! It's not good to stare at someone else's marital bed, any fool knows that. Forgive me, mother, these are hard times, it's not up to decency. There was a catastrophic lack of light, the height of the bell tower obscured the outlines, but it was still clear that Tom got excited, calling the bed ordinary. Perhaps she resembled a hybrid bed, car and dental chair. On an iron frame with a grid, taken as a frame a good five feet wide, unknown mechanics attached a lot of all sorts of things. To the back - Lord have mercy! - adapted the wheel from the gun carriage. This wheel slowly turned, as if the bed was still moving somewhere, pushing off the air. Levers of the most varied lengths and thicknesses were connected by wiring so intricate that even the smartest spider in the world could not figure it out. And most importantly, here and there shone crystal lights, which Tom at first mistook for flashlights, but quickly realized that he was mistaken. Light was emitted by some crystals, sometimes embedded in metal parts, sometimes placed on their own. The door slammed downstairs - it was Mr.Holmes who left the church. -Good night, - he spoke quietly, but, oddly enough, he was perfectly audible from everywhere. Don't worry, we are friends. Allow me to introduce myself: Holmes, Sherlock Holmes. And this gentleman walking towards us from the woodshed is Dr.Watson, former physician to Sir William Reynolds. I assume you know the doctor? "No," the man from the bed answered hoarsely. -Yes, - the woman nodded. - Then let me ask: with whom do I have the honor? Tom did not see Mr.Holmes, but he guessed from his voice that he was smiling. Well, if so, Tom ventured: - Sir! Sir, it's me! What do you want, Tom? came from below. -Can I go down now, sir? - - What's stopping you? - Well, I thought: maybe even shout about grenades? . 2. Pliers and screwdriver - hoarsely answered the man from the bed. -Yes, - the woman nodded. - Then let me ask: with whom do I have the honor? Tom did not see Mr.Holmes, but he guessed from his voice that he was smiling. Well, if so, Tom ventured: - Sir! Sir, it's me! What do you want, Tom? came from below. -Can I go down now, sir? - - What's stopping you? - Well, I thought: maybe even shout about grenades? . 2. Pliers and screwdriver - hoarsely answered the man from the bed. -Yes, - the woman nodded. - Then let me ask: with whom do I have the honor? Tom did not see Mr.Holmes, but he guessed from his voice that he was smiling. Well, if so, Tom ventured: - Sir! Sir, it's me! What do you want, Tom? came from below. -Can I go down now, sir? - - What's stopping you? - Well, I thought: maybe even shout about grenades? . 2. Pliers and screwdriver. 
From Dr.Watson's notes -.Edward Turnbull, - answered the young man. -And this is Miss Amelia Fitzgibbon. He deftly jumped off the bed, braided with wires, and offered his hand to the girl. At that moment I recognized her. Before me was Sir William's secretary! - Miss Fitzgibbon! Hiding the revolver in my pocket along the way, I hurried to the mysterious unit: - Do you remember me? The professor was not far behind me. Unlike your humble servant, he was in no hurry to hide the weapon. As we emerged from the darkness and entered the circle formed by the torches, it seemed to me that Van Helsing's revolver fired noiselessly. But no, it was just a reflection of the flame on the polished metal of the barrel. - Hello, Doctor. Of course I remember you! - You have no idea how happy I am! You are in good health, safe. This is the best gift for the last week! Have you found Sir William? Amelia sighed, -Unfortunately not. He disappeared with his car back in 1993. Nobody has seen him since. -I beg your pardon, gentlemen, - said the young man. -Getting to know you is great, but we don't have much time. Thank you for kindly offering us grenades - our supply is all gone. Will you allow me to take a couple of boxes on board? -Captain Wallace, - came the gloom, and the gallant captain stepped onto the stage. - Directorate of Military Intelligence of England. The tripod that was blown up an hour and a half ago is your work? -Ours, - said Miss Fitzgibbon. - And not only him! said Mr.Turnbull. - In recent days, together with Mr.Wells, the third member of our small team, we have destroyed a dozen and a half combat vehicles! Unfortunately, Mr.Wells said goodbye to us - he left his wife in the suburbs of London. I remind you about grenades, sir! With their help, we will have time to deal with the Martians guarding the place where the projectile fell - before they attack the city! He pointed with his hand to where the warlike colossi hid in the night. As if in response to the words of the young man, ominous green lightning flashed there: the Martians were not wasting their time. -Now I understand, - the captain chuckled without any sign of amusement, -to whom Mr.Holmes intended this ammunition! - Of course, grenades are at your disposal! - Lord! beamed Miss Fitzgibbon. -How kind of you! Professor Van Helsing let out a sigh of relief. All the time he came in from one side, then from the other, peering into the faces of Amelia and Edward. It seems that Miss Fitzgibbon's smile satisfied him completely, and the professor finally hid the revolver. Holmes was silent and rubbed his chin with his fingertips. Knowing my friend perfectly well, I had no doubt that now we would hear the most important question addressed to the new comrades in arms. And so it happened. - Grenades? Holmes said. - Great tactic. I just want to ask: are you attacking Martians from the future or from the past? After all, this is the secret of your invisibility? - You thought it was a time machine? gasped Miss Fitzgibbon. - Am I wrong? I saw that Holmes could hardly hide his disappointment. -This machine was designed by Mr.Wells according to Sir William's designs. - From his tone of voice, Edward Turnbull was eager to continue smashing the Martians. -Like Sir William's machine, it goes into the fourth dimension, becoming invisible. But it does not move in time, but in space. Now will you let us go on a sortie? Time is running out, gentlemen! Dark human figures appeared on the border of the circle of light. The flames of the torches darted around, making it impossible to see the newcomers properly. Squinting, I managed to recognize Tom, who had come down from the bell tower. The second, I think, was Miss Pfeiffer. When the cigar flame lit up and I smelled the bitter stench of Partagas, there was no doubt left in Mr.Pfeiffer's presence. Did you hear Tom's screams? Holmes inquired. -Alas, - Turnbull spread his hands. - Let me not believe you. I suspect the whole of Maldon is aware that they have set up a warehouse of hand grenades at the crossroads! - Gentlemen, sounds from three-dimensional space do not penetrate into the fourth dimension. We didn't hear anything. We were attracted by the torches. -So, - Holmes summed up, more asserting than asking, Your machine cannot travel through time. Sorry, damn sorry. Sorry, miss, for the strong word. In this situation, it is more than appropriate. -Mr.Wells built it according to a simplified scheme. In addition, we would not have enough crystals to travel in time. Turnbull pointed to the wired white crystals that glowed softly from within. -But we did not set such a task. First of all, we created weapons against the Martians. -And they succeeded quite well, - agreed Holmes. Are you short of crystals? - she resolutely entered the center of events - she burst in! - Miss Pfeiffer. - Come on, let me. Edward and Amelia were taken aback by the impudence of the American. Observing traditional propriety, I hurried to introduce the girl to them. Meanwhile, Adele, not paying attention to anything, but to me in the first place, was already studying the machine of space. The camera chirped loudly - Mr.Pfeiffer considered the situation worthy of capturing and, despite the bad lighting, also joined the party. -Either I forgot how to distinguish pliers from a screwdriver, - Adele soon announced, -or the engines of Martian machines have exactly the same crystals! - - What?! Same, I say. Only ten times larger. I have long known how quickly Holmes can think. And, nevertheless, once again I was amazed at the incredible speed of his mental reaction. - If you add larger crystals to the circuits, will your machine be able to travel in time? Holmes was already standing next to Adele, peering over her shoulder. But he addressed the young people who arrived on the "spatial bed." -Theoretically, yes, - Turnbull hesitated. -But Mr.Wells collected it - -Is he in London now? - As Edward has already said, said Miss Fitzgibbon ruefully, "he was going to Leatherhead, hoping to find his wife there." When we parted, we noticed the movement of the Martians in the northeast, and moved after them, hoping to destroy as many as we could. But I helped Sir William at one time, and then Mr.Wells. I imagine how to assemble a time travel chain, only I can't do it myself. We have the drawings with us - we took them in case of a breakdown. - But sir! excitement, coupled with envy-worthy age, demanded action from Mr.Turnbull. What do you need a time machine for? With grenades, we. - Not only time! I saw that my friend perked up. - Time and space! Believe me, this is now more important than the destruction of all Martians combined! And you're right: we've run out of time. What is today's date? June thirtieth? - Yes sir! the captain reported. - It's a pity that there is no thirty-first in June. Let's get started immediately! Along the way, if I have time, I will bring everyone up to date. Captain, send someone to the captured tripods immediately. We need to remove and bring the engine here. Road every minute! -No need to send anyone anywhere, - Miss Pfeiffer deigned to turn around to us. - Let's get the drawings. Your comments, Miss Fitzgibbon, would also be helpful. Following them and the drawings, I will try to assemble the chain you need. And for the Martian engine, captain, send four soldiers to my tarantass. 3. Screwdriver and pliers Road every minute! -No need to send anyone anywhere, - Miss Pfeiffer deigned to turn around to us. - Let's get the drawings. Your comments, Miss Fitzgibbon, would also be helpful. Following them and the drawings, I will try to assemble the chain you need. And for the Martian engine, captain, send four soldiers to my tarantass. 3. Screwdriver and pliers Road every minute! -No need to send anyone anywhere, - Miss Pfeiffer deigned to turn around to us. - Let's get the drawings. Your comments, Miss Fitzgibbon, would also be helpful. Following them and the drawings, I will try to assemble the chain you need. And for the Martian engine, captain, send four soldiers to my tarantass. 3. Screwdriver and pliers. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson (continued). - Miss Pfeiffer! As four soldiers, huffing and panting from the effort, dragged the engine wrapped in strong sackcloth, Captain Wallace stood up in front of Adele, tall, straight and stern, as a symbol of the inevitability of British justice. - Miss Pfeiffer! Where did you get the Martian engine in the tarantass?! And here I finally firmly believed that victory would be ours! Ladies and gentlemen, a miracle happened before my eyes: Adele was embarrassed. She even blushed slightly, which, fortunately, smoothed out the dancing light of the torches, looked away and looked down. Captain Wallace was a true gentleman. Having curbed temperament, he did not inflict interrogation on the girl with predilection. A rational practitioner, the captain knew that Miss Pfeiffer would be much more useful if she immediately began to re-equip the machine, instead of to answer questions long and confusingly. Despite the slipperiness of the situation, it must be admitted that the gift of fate, no matter how dubious it was obtained, saved us at least three or four hours. Giving Miss Pfeiffer a more than eloquent look, the captain stepped aside, and soon the work was in full swing. Obeying his daughter's request, Mr.Pfeiffer meekly ran to the tarantass and dragged from there a large flat suitcase made of pigskin. Adele opened the lid and our eyes saw a wonderful set of plumbing tools, neatly laid out in cells and nests. Screwdrivers and pliers, drills and wrenches, hammers and hammers, wire cutters, files, chisels and chisels winked oilily. Coils with copper and steel wire, boxes with bolts and nuts, screws and nails were stored separately... - A burglar's dream! Holmes was delighted. In response, Miss Pfeiffer only snorted indignantly: - Nonsense! Hey, men, bring lanterns, lamps! Everything there is! I need light. Oh, and move the torches closer... As the soldiers carried out her orders, Adele delved into the blueprints, listening to Miss Fitzgibbon's comments along the way. Holmes stood next to the ladies. For me, alas, all these graphics were truly Chinese letters, and I stepped aside, not wanting to interfere. Professor Van Helzing kept me company: engineering was not among my colleague's talents. Together we watched a truly enchanting picture: at a crossroads in the night, next to a pile of grenade boxes, there was a double bed entangled with wires with a rotating wheel. Placers of white crystals glowed softly. And two beautiful women were leaning over the drawings, discussing how to make the bed travel in time! Did I think I would see something like this?! -. pencil edits, - I heard Holmes's voice, - more recent. They are made over lines drawn in ink and ink. Use them if you want to implement the latest version of the design. Even if Sherlock Holmes did not understand the device of time machines, his remarks, as always, were accurate and practical. -It will take soldering, - Adele turned to us. - Professor, let me have your bag. Aspen stakes, holy gifts, and silver bullet cartridges were of no interest to Miss Pfeiffer, much to Van Helsing's relief. But the acetylene lamp delighted Adele: - What you need! Hey somebody! Get the damn engine over here! The tripod engine was a metal container with a strange polygonal shape. From it, like the tentacles of an octopus, shiny tubes and roughly cut pieces of thick, shiny wires stuck out in all directions. Next to the bed, even with levers and other machinery on it, this monster looked like a living challenge to humanity, or rather, humanity. - You! Yes, you - and you too! Help the lady! In this unceremonious manner, Miss Pfeiffer called in Tom and Mr.Turnbull for help. The three of them opened this miracle of enemy technology with the help of two screwdrivers, a hammer, a chisel and the horrific statements of Adele, who was soon joined by Miss Fitzgibbon. Clang, creak, hoarse rattle - and the lid with a deafening ring fell on the cobblestone pavement. The professor and I leaned forward, driven by a completely forgivable curiosity: we both wanted to see the insides of an alien mechanism. In a crazy interweaving of tubes and wires, in a labyrinth of shiny oil-coated gears, rods, and sliding joints that strangely resembled dissected muscles—one and a half dozen white crystals, each the size of Tom Radcliffe's fist, shone with a steady light! -Retrieving the crystals, - Adele ordered. - Be careful, do not hurt! My friend gently pushed Tom away and crouched over the engine himself, armed with a long thin screwdriver. At this stage, the accuracy and precision of Holmes's movements were required, and not the brute strength of Radcliffe. But when the familiar howl rolled over Maldon: -Ulla-ulla-ulla-ulla! - - even Holmes shuddered, almost ruining another crystal. - Began! Captain Wallace clicked his heels. -I have to leave you, ladies and gentlemen. The defense of the city requires my presence and operational leadership. - Good luck, captain! - Hold on! Don't give them Maldon! - God bless you! The soldiers left on a cart with the captain. As soon as the rumble of wheels on the cobblestones died down, flares whistled from the western outskirts into the black heights. Their dead, unnaturally bright light snatched out of the darkness six armored colossi - the Martians were moving towards Maldon. The aliens anxiously raised their ray apparatuses to the skies - obviously, they had not yet met with illuminating rockets, regarding them as a new weapon of earthlings: a threat from the sky. - There they are! Tom yelled, unable to contain his excitement, pointing at the fighting vehicles. - Shoot them! The first cannon shot gasped—the gunners seemed to have heard Tom's call. The shell exploded in the air between the Martians without harming them. But the baton was picked up by other guns. Flashes of shots and explosions in reddish-purple flashes continued to illuminate the battlefield even after as the rockets went out. The entire space between Maldon and the advancing Martians was shrouded in gunpowder smoke. Ominous red-hot needles darted about in this smoke - heat rays. Bushes of flame grew all around, to fall immediately. -I hope they don't strike the beam too early, - Adele said worriedly, soldering a large crystal into the chain instead of a miserable fragment that barely smoldered with a milky flame. It seems that I did not hear Miss Pfeiffer well because of the roar of the cannonade, and therefore I considered it necessary to ask again: - Excuse me? After all, the Martians have already launched a heat beam! -I'm not talking about Martians, - the girl did not interrupt her work. - I'm talking about our shooters. - But where did our heat beam come from ?! - In the evening I managed to figure out the device for launching the Martian generator. And she showed the army technicians how to operate it. The military planned to install a captured apparatus on the bell tower of the Church of All Saints. And wait for the enemy to come closer before opening fire. I hope they have enough endurance. Eduard! Give me the pliers... Despite the darkness and the smoke screen, the rays of the Martians managed to hit three of our guns. The fire of those who remained became rarer. In my opinion, the situation was becoming critical. Alas, we could not support the valiant military in any way - except to rush at the aliens with hand grenades and die heroically. Holmes shouldn't be in such a hurry, I thought. -Don't we have at least a couple of hours left?! - Now the flying stealth bed, equipped with a box of grenades, had a chance to turn the tide of battle in favor of England. I was about to say this thought aloud, but Holmes beat me to it: -Mr.Turnbull, please pay attention to me. While the ladies are busy refitting the machine, I want to explain to you the main task. We won't get another chance. So, when the machine is running— - -If it works, - said Edward Turnbull sullenly. He clearly regretted having succumbed to Holmes' persuasion. Most of all, the young man would now like to be in the fourth dimension with renewed ammunition, hurrying towards the Martians. - When it works, - Holmes' voice broke through the metal. -You are to go back nine days and pick up a little girl named Jenny. Here, I sketched out a plan of the southeast part of the city - the house on the corner of Oak Close is marked with a cross. From here he is a mile and a quarter in a straight line. Holmes indicated with his hand the direction to Oak Close and unfolded in front of his interlocutor a piece of paper torn from a notebook, scribbled in pencil. - Don't ask too many questions! Just trust me this is vital. If the girl is not delivered at the right time and place, the consequences will be worse than the landing in England of all the tripods that are on Mars! I duplicated the instructions on the back of the plan, in the form of detailed notes. On the day when the battle with the participation of the destroyer takes place near Maldon, the girl will play in the yard. As soon as the heat beam hits the house... I was distracted by a deafening roar: it blocked the bursts of shells that sounded closer and closer. A successful shot of our gunners reached the target. From the hit, the conning tower of the tripod, walking in the forefront, literally turned inside out, splashing in the night with fireworks of hot fragments. A fountain of green flame hit the sky. Another tripod twitched, swayed, and froze in precarious balance, sideways in the style of the Leaning Tower of Pisa. It dawned on me belatedly that the war machine, she must have stepped on a mine and the explosion hurt her leg. - Hammer. Another, smaller one, - Miss Pfeiffer ordered meanwhile, coolly. -I'll install it in place of the switch lever. Mr Holmes, do you have a pencil? I will requisition it. I need a graphite rod for a rheostat. Gentlemen, has anyone seen my father? -Your father is on the front line now, - my friend reassured Adele. - Removes the battle. Before jumping into the cart of soldiers, he asked me to be your protector. Miss Pfeiffer just waved it off: -Oh, dad! He always has crazy ideas! But, gentlemen, I need his watch! And one more - for counting the forward and backward movement of time. -Take my chronometer, Miss Pfeiffer! - Holmes, the professor, and I, without saying a word, handed the girl our watch. - Thank you, gentlemen, - Van Helsing's watch remained with the professor, and Holmes and mine changed owners in the blink of an eye. - Now the main thing is not to confuse the polarity. Eduard, shine a light on me! Miss Fitzgibbon, unwind both spools of copper wire to their full length and attach weights to the ends. Remote pendulums are needed to communicate with ordinary space and time. The advance of the Martians has slowed down. The tripods spread out in a chain, but as they maneuvered, another of the colossi stepped on a mine and froze, squinting. But the conning tower survived; the crippled car posed a serious danger. Shells were exploding around, but the gunners in a hurry could not take an accurate sight. Glittering tentacles rose from the cap. I saw that they were holding a pipe that fired shells with black gas, and I went cold. There is no escape from black gas! It kills every living thing within a half mile radius! From the triangular bell tower of the Church of All Saints, noted in East Anglia sightseeing guides, a dazzling beam lashed out. The fiery blade of King Arthur's sword slashed across the cabin. A rain of scraps of metal spilled onto the long-suffering Moldonian land. The deadly pipe collapsed with them. The beam from the bell tower darted on, catching and melting the cap of the next tripod. Soon he returned back, and the lame giant exploded with a roar, illuminating the surroundings with a green flash. - Hooray! yelled Tom. The professor and I joined in the joyful cry. But the battle continued. The rays of the surviving machines slashed across the bell tower. At some point, we were convinced: it was all over, the calculation of the beam generator had died, and the bell tower was about to turn into flaming ruins. Praise the Lord! We got a visual opportunity to see how our ancestors knew how to build. Bell tower, more reminiscent of the tower of an ancient fortress, survived! The stonework melted, and smoke oozed from the narrow windows. Overheated air trembled above the roof, giving rise to mirages, but the stronghold held on, and the terrifying Arthur Excalibur was still beating from it! -There's one last switch left, - Adele said. -Then you can close the circuit. I've never seen a more insane scheme! And you know what? I like her! I am convinced that the machine will work! - Attention, gentlemen! I heard Holmes' warning. The darkness behind the ring of smoky torches came to life, stirred. Indistinct shadows approached, trembling, acquiring and immediately losing shape. The professor and I took out revolvers, but we were in no hurry to open fire: we should save our cartridges, shooting only for sure. The darkness around us thinned strangely. She became unsteady, as before dawn, turned into an unpleasant darkness. A gust of cold, dank wind came up, blowing out some of the torches. Serpents of damp, whitish air crawled through the gaps in the light barrier, suspiciously like the tentacles of the creature mentioned by the sailor from the Son of Thunder. Rustle sounded from everywhere, like the rustling of thousands of pages. Like sand, it stuffed into your ears, driving you crazy. -Protect the women and the car! - - Holmes's voice rushed, as if from a deep well, deaf and distant. -Protect the women the car - I stepped into the mist, blocking Miss Pfeiffer. I never saw the professor or Holmes or the others again. Only the lights of white crystals flickered through the mist. Five yards away, there was a squish, as if something was coming out of a champing quagmire. Ahead, a dark figure, only vaguely reminiscent of a human, thickened and swayed, muttering affectionately. I raised my revolver, aiming at the creature's chest, and without hesitation, pressed down. Once again. 4. Battle of Church Street. 
Mist swirled around Professor Van Helsing. In the gray undulating locks, themselves - fog, illusion, haze, vague girlish figures flickered. Here a naked thigh flashed, here a tender breast appeared, adorned with a cherry nipple, here a smile revealed pearls of teeth more pointed than it should be for a well-mannered lady. - Abraham! the fog sang in three voices. Soprano, mezzo-soprano and coloratura soprano merged into one, overturning the mind to the bottom of unconsciousness. - Abraham! Here we are! The professor stood like a black cannonball in the heart of the mist. You were waiting for us, right? The skirts of a long cloak fell to the ground. The hat, as if of its own accord, slid down over his eyebrows. Eyes shone from under the dark felt—absently, thoughtfully, like those of a man about to go to bed. His arms dangled along his body, as if some prankster had replaced the professor's bones and joints with hemp ropes. Age lay down on his shoulders to rest, heaved himself in a heavy mass, bent his back. We have been looking for you, my love! We carried our kiss to you... The ghostly girls stirred, turned into rag dolls assembled from dirty tatters. Lips stretched out like a tube, sucking in cool air with a whistle. The world has lost colors, sounds, smells. The world has lost its joy and peace. Deathly anguish sat on the throne, taking the scepter of the queen; martyrdom occupied the chair of the prime minister. - Ah-a-abraha-am Passion, the price of which is life. Insensitivity, the price of which is death. Between the two poles, three seductresses rushed about, sucking the blood out of the Moldonian night. They closed the ring around the motionless Van Helsing. And when the last, tiny gap remained, the core exploded. A pair of Lefochet's old-fashioned revolvers spat out flames. The roar of shots hit in the ears, pulled the silence of the fog, throwing the pieces away. Three snow-white foreheads acquired an additional decoration - a dark hole strictly above the bridge of the nose. It seemed as if some geometer had marked space with dots, or perhaps a Hindu fakir, rushing in from Benares in a whirlwind, applied the sacred signs of -bindi - to the satin skin. Night hissed into these holes, dismembering the creatures from the inside. Small whirlwinds swarming in the fog - stealing, dragging prey to the lair, faster than a butcher butchering a carcass, they coped with toothy girls who had lost both the semblance of a human appearance and the image of a terrible doll made of rags. Dropping to one knee, the professor waited. Only when the squealing turned into a whisper, and then finally ceased, did he allow himself to lie down, curled up. Years, thought Van Helsing. Mein Gott, what a pity... Three snow-white foreheads acquired an additional decoration - a dark hole strictly above the bridge of the nose. It seemed as if some geometer had marked space with dots, or perhaps a Hindu fakir, rushing in from Benares in a whirlwind, applied the sacred signs of -bindi - to the satin skin. Night hissed into these holes, dismembering the creatures from the inside. Small whirlwinds swarming in the fog - stealing, dragging prey to the lair, faster than a butcher butchering a carcass, they coped with toothy girls who had lost both the semblance of a human appearance and the image of a terrible doll made of rags. Dropping to one knee, the professor waited. Only when the squealing turned into a whisper, and then finally ceased, did he allow himself to lie down, curled up. Years, thought Van Helsing. Mein Gott, what a pity... Three snow-white foreheads acquired an additional decoration - a dark hole strictly above the bridge of the nose. It seemed as if some geometer had marked space with dots, or perhaps a Hindu fakir, rushing in from Benares in a whirlwind, applied the sacred signs of -bindi - to the satin skin. Night hissed into these holes, dismembering the creatures from the inside. Small whirlwinds swarming in the fog - stealing, dragging prey to the lair, faster than a butcher butchering a carcass, they coped with toothy girls who had lost both the semblance of a human appearance and the image of a terrible doll made of rags. Dropping to one knee, the professor waited. Only when the squealing turned into a whisper, and then finally ceased, did he allow himself to lie down, curled up. Years, thought Van Helsing. Mein Gott, what a pity... a Hindu fakir, rushing in from Benares in a whirlwind, inflicted the sacred signs of "bindi" on satin skin. Night hissed into these holes, dismembering the creatures from the inside. Small whirlwinds swarming in the fog - stealing, dragging prey to the lair, faster than a butcher butchering a carcass, they coped with toothy girls who had lost both the semblance of a human appearance and the image of a terrible doll made of rags. Dropping to one knee, the professor waited. Only when the squealing turned into a whisper, and then finally ceased, did he allow himself to lie down, curled up. Years, thought Van Helsing. Mein Gott, what a pity... a Hindu fakir, rushing in from Benares in a whirlwind, inflicted the sacred signs of "bindi" on satin skin. Night hissed into these holes, dismembering the creatures from the inside. Small whirlwinds swarming in the fog - stealing, dragging prey to the lair, faster than a butcher butchering a carcass, they coped with toothy girls who had lost both the semblance of a human appearance and the image of a terrible doll made of rags. Dropping to one knee, the professor waited. Only when the squealing turned into a whisper, and then finally ceased, did he allow himself to lie down, curled up. Years, thought Van Helsing. Mein Gott, what a pity... they coped with toothy girls who had lost both the semblance of a human form and the image of a terrible doll made of rags. Dropping to one knee, the professor waited. Only when the squealing turned into a whisper, and then finally ceased, did he allow himself to lie down, curled up. Years, thought Van Helsing. Mein Gott, what a pity... they coped with toothy girls who had lost both the semblance of a human form and the image of a terrible doll made of rags. Dropping to one knee, the professor waited. Only when the squealing turned into a whisper, and then finally ceased, did he allow himself to lie down, curled up. Years, thought Van Helsing. Mein Gott, what a pity...
This was the first time Tom had seen such a big wolf. A black wolf, looking like a lump of coal, which suddenly took it into his head to walk along Church Street, stalked towards Tom. There was something about the proportions of the beast, but Tom couldn't figure out what it was. He had never seen gorillas or other large apes before, and therefore had no way to compare the predator's amazing, not quite wolf-like coordination of movements with anything familiar. And to compare a wolf with people - no, mother would not approve of this. -Shoot, - said Tom. The wolf growled. - Get out, you bastard! The wolf jumped. As soon as the lean body rose into the air, Tom bent down and grabbed from the open box the first thing that came to his hand - a pound grenade with a long handle. Swinging his shoulder, as he used to wave a sledgehammer in his youth, helping his father Stone in the forge, he hit with all his strength, aiming at the wolf's head. The cast-iron case fell on the scoundrel below the ear. The crunch sounded like the sweetest music to Tom. If Mr.Holmes played the violin now, he wouldn't give Tom so much pleasure. However, the joy was short - shaking his head, the wolf growled and jumped again. This time Tom missed. The carcass of the beast knocked him off his feet, knocked him over. The grenade escaped from his fingers, rolled back to the boxes. The stinking mouth opened over Tom, fangs flashing. There was something articulate in the growl of the wolf - a meaning that shook the hamstrings, and the heart froze like a bird in someone else's fist. Dull claws tore at his chest, leaving bloody streaks. - Get out! Tom repeated. Rising up to meet the terrible fangs, he seized the wolf's jaws in a death grip: with the right - in the lower, with the left - in the upper. The growl turned into a wheeze. Tom tensed up. Loader's hands, accustomed to bags, barrels and railroad ties, turned into hellish mechanisms assembled from muscles, bones and tendons. Tom pulled and pulled, not noticing that the wolf's mouth was becoming like a snake - so wide, so unnaturally it opened. The body of the beast was in convulsions. Tom shook it off himself, in turn fell on top, pressed him to the paving stones, without stopping pulling with all his urine. He didn't want to think about who was thrashing under him in agony. The wolf changed, the wool was drawn into the skin, the skin became leather; resistance weakened, and Tom used this grace of the Lord as best he could. Something smacked and grunted. The wolf, no longer like a wolf, or a lump of coal, or even a decent dead man worthy of burial in a cemetery, stretched out to its full length, white skin faintly shimmering in the darkness. "Beast," muttered Tom. And he stood up, holding his severed jaw in his hand. In which case, thought young Radcliffe, it will come in handy. How do I give someone...
The ammo has run out. Dropping the useless revolver, Dr.Watson watched as a couple of jesters approached him. The jesters were exact copies of those scoundrels who attempted on little Jenny: a man and a woman in robes and wonderful hats. Well, the doctor told himself, Jenny wasn't here. And corrected: no, bad. If Jenny were here, one could count on a smile of fortune. And so. - Coryflamus! The woman waved her wand. Paralysis, the doctor estimated. Partial paralysis, as after an apoplexy. The right half of the body was taken away - not completely, but enough to hardly stand on its feet. With his left hand, Watson took hold of his heart, poorly aware of why he was doing this. Fingers groped for cold ebonite. Leaving the vicar's garden, the doctor took with him the wand of the villain killed by the birdhouse. He put it in his belt, wanting to study at his leisure, and in vain - leisure, it seems, no more was foreseen, except perhaps in the grave. The tip of the wand flickered like a swamp light. -A stroke, - Watson breathed. He meant his condition, and therefore was amazed to see what effect Latin had produced. The swamp fire turned into a bolt of lightning. Crackling, the white-and-blue zigzag rushed towards the woman, who was trying in vain to avoid direct contact with the enraged electricity. - Abarga grumio! she screamed heart-rendingly. As it passed the woman, lightning struck her partner. Without making a sound, he collapsed on his face. It stank of singed bristles, the human body trembled, as if in a fit of epilepsy. -Epileptos, - Watson diagnosed. - Absence! Greek, as well as French, also came in handy. Or maybe the combination of languages ​​only reinforced the ill-understood action. Ebonite came to life, filled with warmth. The man struck by lightning twitched harder. From his wand hissing like a snake, a jet of steam escaped - and overtook the woman. With a yell, clutching her face, the assassin ran away. The partner, having coped with the attack, hobbled after him. Two hats remained on the pavement, as if after a carnival. The paralysis began to pass; Watson felt his shoulder, side and thigh mercilessly pricked with a thousand silver needles. Struggling with the numbness of his muscles, he grabbed the first thing that turned up under his right hand and threw it after the fugitives. The object turned out to be heavy, the doctor was unable to swing and threw the damn thing, like a girl, from the bottom up in a gentle arc. The grenade disappeared into the fog. The free end of the cord remained in the doctor's fist. No matter how hard Watson tried, he could not unclench his fingers. His arm twitched, nearly tearing it out of his elbow joint. A second later, an explosion rumbled - deaf, blurry, it came as if from another dimension, maybe from another story. The blast wave picked up the hats, spun like a top and carried away God knows where. - Hurt? Jenny asked. Grimacing, she watched the doctor rub his elbow. -It hurts, - Watson nodded. It's paralysis, he thought again, because his tongue was numb. Along with the language, the mind was numb, threatening insanity. - You? The doctor's lips trembled. - Where? -From kindergarten, - Jenny explained. - She came. - For what? - I want to go home. "And Mrs. Priestley let you go?" - She's fainting. -And Reverend Simpson? - - Pray. Maybe. He is not up to me. Watson did not ask what the vicar was doing if his prayer was questionable by a little girl. Instead, trying not to show his weakness, the doctor leaned over and took Jenny in his arms. The girl was light, light, as if cut out of paper. But most importantly, Jenny was sane - an ordinary child, not a writing machine. "That's right," said Holmes. - Bring her here. Watson looked back. -Take it, - repeated Holmes. Until it starts up again. He stood by the wonderful bed, next to Edward Turnbull and Miss Fitzgibbon. The detective was waving a hunting whip, the handle of which, as Watson knew, was filled with lead. The shaft of the whip was stained with blood, black in the moonlight. The doctor did not remember if Holmes had a whip with him from the very beginning; did not remember whether Holmes had brought the whip with him to Maldon. The memory doubled, blurred like a landscape, if you admire it through tears. -Yes, - Dr.Watson nodded. - I carry. 5. Farewell The detective was waving a hunting whip, the handle of which, as Watson knew, was filled with lead. The shaft of the whip was stained with blood, black in the moonlight. The doctor did not remember if Holmes had a whip with him from the very beginning; did not remember whether Holmes had brought the whip with him to Maldon. The memory doubled, blurred like a landscape, if you admire it through tears. -Yes, - Dr.Watson nodded. - I carry. 5. Farewell The detective was waving a hunting whip, the handle of which, as Watson knew, was filled with lead. The shaft of the whip was stained with blood, black in the moonlight. The doctor did not remember if Holmes had a whip with him from the very beginning; did not remember whether Holmes had brought the whip with him to Maldon. The memory doubled, blurred like a landscape, if you admire it through tears. -Yes, - Dr.Watson nodded. - I carry. 5. Farewell. 
From the notes of Dr.Watson - Goodbye, doctor! - Good luck! I wished. Goodbye, Mr Holmes! -Goodbye, Jenny, - my friend replied. Goodbye, professor! -God bless you, my child! I saw the impossible: the iron Van Helzing, vampire slayer, shed a tear. He stood with difficulty, now and then wiping his wet forehead with a handkerchief, but when I offered him medical help, the professor refused with such dignity that I did not persist. - Goodbye, Tom! -Be a good girl, Jenny! - I'll be good. Goodbye, Miss Pfeiffer! - Bon Voyage! -She is no longer here, - Holmes whispered to me. -She is no longer her. Despite the paradoxical nature of his statement, I am still sure that I understood Holmes well. But, wanting to please him, I asked again: - Yes? How do you know? -It's elementary, Watson, - he answered in a barely audible voice. And I swear I saw it myself how Sherlock Holmes's eyes gleamed suspiciously with moisture. Many years have passed, many events have passed, I remarried, moved from Baker Street to apartments on Queen Anne Street, survived the World War, getting closer every day to the fantastic age where we sent little Jenny, and knowing full well that I never I didn't get to her destination - I lived a full-blooded life, occasionally meeting Holmes, the ironic, cold-blooded, unflappable Holmes, and when it seemed to me that he was not a person, but a calculating device devoid of passions, I remembered the Moldonian night, and Jenny, and a bed ready to travel through time and space. Forgive me for such a long and confusing statement. I will only note that the bed with Mr.Turnbull and Miss Fitzgibbon started first, hiding from our eyes. Jenny stood on the pavement for another half a minute, smiling at us, and then disappeared without a trace, as if it had never happened. Fortunately, neither the first nor the second disappearance was accompanied by theatrical effects, which I consider a sign of bad taste.
Sideshow Light in the Window. 
... and Nyurka, Anna Light Igorevna, opened her eyes. - What are you doing here? she asked. - Are you stealing? - We rape, - Tyunya could not resist. Thank God, Baba Fima was not around. -Ah, - said Nyurka. - Humor. Understand. And sat down. -Take off your helmet, - I warned. - You'll rub your brain. I wanted to drink. Tea. hot. -Humor, - Nurka repeated. - Are you visiting your grandmother? She is in the kitchen. I don't think we surprised her too much. Well, they're sitting. Some. Let them sit. I noted that I think like on the Internet: briefly, stupidly, specifically. I rebelled, complicating myself, and realized: in vain. The mere thought of three-story thoughts with curlicues made me sick. That's it, barely imagined - and in the stomach cramps. Now I was the crown of creation: a glass of cognac with a slice of lemon. Cognac drank, lemon sucked. From an empty glass it stinks of bedbugs. The miserable skin curled up into a spiral. Such, brother, things as Gorodnitsky sang. Such things, brother. They have been laughing at you for a long time... - Where are you going? Tuna was nervous. Nyurka turned around on the threshold: - To the toilet. What can't? And disappeared in the corridors. - That's it, - Tyunya was finishing fiddling with the root settings of Verbalife. Goat Nyurka, when she decides to put on a helmet again, was in for an original surprise. - We're leaving. Call Rattlesnake, please the old man. -I'll call you from the street, - I waved him off. In the hallway we had a chance to endure a fight with Baba Fima. Just as they didn't want to let us in before, they didn't want to let us out now. They offered tea, compote, dinner. They called to make friends at home. They signed to influence the young Anna Igorevna. Promised abundant advertising on word of mouth. They managed to escape only when Tyunya took the number of her mobile phone from Serafima Petrovna - yes, yes! - and promised to get in touch. - Ba! yelled Nyurka from the toilet. -Bah, I want to eat! - With that, we got out. Tyunya stumbled on the stairs. I supported her by the arm, miscalculated, and we both almost fell down a flight below. -Knight, - Tyunya said in a strange tone. "Switch," I replied. And I realized how stupid it sounds. -Knight, - she repeated, opening the front door. A knight is always a knight. Even if without pants, still a knight. I pretended not to hear. Gremuchko was in the bath. He sent me there. He barked that he had no doubts about our talents and hung up. Clutching the receiver in my fist, I looked at the sky - black and white, coffee with cream. It was snowing, large flakes ate up the space, turning the world into a cozy farce. At times they ate for dessert: minutes, seconds, centuries were lost in the trellises of snowfall. Mercilessly false, I sang from Okudzhava: miscalculated, and we both almost fell down a flight below. -Knight, - Tyunya said in a strange tone. "Switch," I replied. And I realized how stupid it sounds. -Knight, - she repeated, opening the front door. A knight is always a knight. Even if without pants, still a knight. I pretended not to hear. Gremuchko was in the bath. He sent me there. He barked that he had no doubts about our talents and hung up. Clutching the receiver in my fist, I looked at the sky - black and white, coffee with cream. It was snowing, large flakes ate up the space, turning the world into a cozy farce. At times they ate for dessert: minutes, seconds, centuries were lost in the trellises of snowfall. Mercilessly false, I sang from Okudzhava: miscalculated, and we both almost fell down a flight below. -Knight, - Tyunya said in a strange tone. "Switch," I replied. And I realized how stupid it sounds. -Knight, - she repeated, opening the front door. A knight is always a knight. Even if without pants, still a knight. I pretended not to hear. Gremuchko was in the bath. He sent me there. He barked that he had no doubts about our talents and hung up. Clutching the receiver in my fist, I looked at the sky - black and white, coffee with cream. It was snowing, large flakes ate up the space, turning the world into a cozy farce. At times they ate for dessert: minutes, seconds, centuries were lost in the trellises of snowfall. Mercilessly false, I sang from Okudzhava: she repeated, opening the front door. A knight is always a knight. Even if without pants, still a knight. I pretended not to hear. Gremuchko was in the bath. He sent me there. He barked that he had no doubts about our talents and hung up. Clutching the receiver in my fist, I looked at the sky - black and white, coffee with cream. It was snowing, large flakes ate up the space, turning the world into a cozy farce. At times they ate for dessert: minutes, seconds, centuries were lost in the trellises of snowfall. Mercilessly false, I sang from Okudzhava: she repeated, opening the front door. A knight is always a knight. Even if without pants, still a knight. I pretended not to hear. Gremuchko was in the bath. He sent me there. He barked that he had no doubts about our talents and hung up. Clutching the receiver in my fist, I looked at the sky - black and white, coffee with cream. It was snowing, large flakes ate up the space, turning the world into a cozy farce. At times they ate for dessert: minutes, seconds, centuries were lost in the trellises of snowfall. Mercilessly false, I sang from Okudzhava: large flakes ate up the space, turning the world into a cozy farce. At times they ate for dessert: minutes, seconds, centuries were lost in the trellises of snowfall. Mercilessly false, I sang from Okudzhava: large flakes ate up the space, turning the world into a cozy farce. At times they ate for dessert: minutes, seconds, centuries were lost in the trellises of snowfall. Mercilessly false, I sang from Okudzhava:
- The Roman Empire during the decline Preserved the appearance of a firm order: Caesar was in place, his comrades-in-arms were nearby, Life was wonderful, judging by the reports. And he was dumbfounded when Tyunya picked up:
- And critics will say that the word "comrade-in-arms" is not a Roman detail, That this mistake deprives the whole song of meaning. Maybe, maybe, maybe not Roman - it's not a pity, It doesn't bother me at all, but even elevates me! -Do you know, - she remarked, laughing, -that Okudzhava was named Dorian at birth? - In honor of Dorian Gray, mind you! It was only later that the boy was renamed Bulat. Bullfinch, weren't you called Conan at birth? Or even Arthur? -My name was Pusey, - I sighed. -Did you know that when Conan Doyle was practicing medicine in Southsea, he was treating the owner of the local textile store? - Conan Doyle, in turn, was a customer of this store, where he was served by the same young salesman. Not once did Conan Doyle ask the name of the seller, but in vain. Because the boy's name was Herbert George Wells! - And do you know, that Wells' father gave Conan Doyle cricket lessons? - Do you know... - And you... A light came on in the window of the third floor. The curtains were parted; raising my head, I had the pleasure of seeing through the transparent curtains how Nyurka was approaching the bookshelf. A scrawny hand reached out, fingers plucking a fighter out of action, a thick yellow volume of the Adventure Library. I remembered the cover to the last stroke. It felt like a book was being held up to my eyes. Black on a lemon background: lawn, house in the background, oak tree in the foreground. There are two people under the oak tree: a gentleman in a hat is touching the tree, studying something, a gentleman in a top hat and with a cane is waiting excitedly behind. And in an embossed oval, above a crossed magnifying glass and pipe: A. Conan Doyle, Notes on Sherlock Holmes. Edition one thousand nine hundred and fifty-six, translated under the editorship of Korney Chukovsky. - You see? Tyunya asked in a whisper. - No, I replied. Of course I saw. The shadow of a book on the curtain: here smoke floated from the pipe, thin nervous fingers trembled, and above - the profile of a hawk, the visor of a hunting cap. The girl stepped into the depths of the room. Flicked the switch and everything was gone. As it never happened. - Let's go to? - Yeah. And we moved into the snowfall, singing in two voices:
- And critics will say that the word "comrade-in-arms" is not a Roman detail, That this mistake deprives the whole song of meaning. Epilogue Discard all the impossible. 
When I saw that things had taken such a turn, I shut myself up and devoted all the powers of my mind to writing a sensational play about Sherlock Holmes. I created it in a week and called it "The Motley Ribbon" after the story of the same name. She had considerable success. We had an excellent rocky boa constrictor for the title role, which is my pride, so you can imagine my outrage when I learned that one critic ended his disparaging review with the words: "The critical moment in this production is caused by the appearance of a clearly artificial snake." I was ready to pay him decent money if he dared to take her to bed with him. We have had several snakes at different times, but none of them were made for the stage. All of them either had a tendency to just hang out of a hole in the wall like a lifeless bell string, or they tried to run back through the same hole and get even with the theatrical carpenter, who pinched their tails to make them livelier. We ended up using artificial snakes, and everyone, including the carpenter, agreed that it was much better.
Sir Arthur Conan Doyle Remembers From the Notes of Dr.Watson (end) 1. False Memory Syndrome. 
Much later, as I looked over my recordings made at Maldon in the crazy June of 1900, I caught myself feeling familiar. My memory doubled. My eyes flickered over the uneven lines scribbled hastily on the yellowed pads, and I saw a wall of fire rising towards the Martian tripods, the girl Jenny and the ghosts in the ruins, Professor Van Helzing and Count Orlok, the robes on the dead Liggins, the pointy hats of the assassins. But as soon as I turned to personal memories, without propping them up with the crutches of notes, completely different pictures arose before me.. a thunderstorm broke over Maldon, as soon as the heat beam turned the Liggins house into flaming ruins, burying the owners under the ruins. Lightning struck from the low clouds at the forward tripod. Another war machine struck by celestial electricity - and the Martians hurriedly retreated to London, hurrying to get away from the wrath of the elements. Tom Radcliffe, seeing this flight from the bell tower, declared publicly: the punishment of the Lord befell the Martians! Although it was not surprising that the hundred-foot-long metal colossi, striding through the fields, attracted bolts of lightning to them. The laws of physics, Holmes would say. My friend and I actually met at the Maldon station. The notes spoke of a telegram from Mycroft. Memory denied the very existence of the telegram. Holmes came to Maldon on a completely different matter; I remembered this, but I didn't remember what it was about the case that pulled Holmes off the spot. Suspecting that I have paramnesia - a false memory syndrome - I considered it necessary to consult a colleague, a specialist in such disorders. A colleague assured me that I am perfectly healthy, but I did not like his gaze. However, I quickly calmed down: the double memory made itself felt only when reading the Moldonian notes, and I rarely returned to them. All this happened, as I said, much later. And then, on the third day after the dramatic events that shook the quiet seaside town to its foundations, Holmes and I sat in the dining room of the Blue Boar and, eating a modest breakfast, indulged in leisurely conversation. 2. Breakfast for two tasting a modest breakfast, indulged in leisurely conversation. 2. Breakfast for two tasting a modest breakfast, indulged in leisurely conversation. 2. Breakfast for two. 
- I hope Miss Fitzgibbon and Mr.Turnbull make it back safely from the twenty-first century. I also note that two young people with different surnames traveling on the same bed should acquire a common surname as soon as possible. What example are they setting for today's youth? After finishing off a portion of the best-brown omelet, I reached out to the fresh roll to spread the strawberry jam over it. -I'm sure we succeeded. - Having finished his second cup of coffee, Holmes took out his pipe. -Captain Wallace informed me that a pair of retreating tripods exploded for no apparent reason. Do you still remember that our elusive avengers took a box of grenades with them? -I am heartily glad that their journey ended successfully. But now that they're back, I'm worried about something else. Who knows, what diseases could appear on Earth by the twenty-first century? What if wanderers accidentally brought the causative agent of a new plague, from which we have neither immunity nor cures?! Compared to the epidemic that threatens us in this case, the attack of the Martians will seem like a childish prank! -You exaggerate the danger, - Holmes leaned back in his chair and inhaled with pleasure. -I believe Miss Fitzgibbon and Mr.Turnbull dropped Jenny off at the right place and time—and promptly went back to the fourth dimension. The risk of catching an infection is minimal. Besides, according to your story, Sir William visited a much more distant future. Yes, and he stayed there for more than one day. However, none of the people who interacted with him upon his return - including you! - didn't get infected. I saluted my friend with my cigar: -You have reassured me, Holmes. -But you gave me an interesting idea. After all, the Martians also do not have immunity from earthly diseases! And they inhale our air, come into contact with the soil and - sorry for the unappetizing details! - support their existence with the blood of our compatriots! Surely most of them already carry terrestrial bacteria, against which the aliens are defenseless. - But why then... In the middle of a sentence, I almost slapped my forehead with my palm, but just in time I remembered that I had a lit cigar in my fingers. - Surely! Incubation period! If you are right, Holmes, the days of the Martians are numbered! They will be finished off without any guns, mines and grenades! And even without a time machine! My friend's logic was impeccable. In this case, as a doctor, I could appreciate it. Looking ahead, I will say that later Holmes' hypothesis was brilliantly confirmed. But then, breakfast at the Blue Boar, I wanted with all my heart - and was afraid to believe that the salvation of England was so close. -By the way, it's already the second day that nothing has been heard about the Martians, - Holmes remarked. -According to the captain, the lookouts around London are not seeing activity from the enemy. The fighting stopped... After a couple of puffs, he finished with a smile: - And Major Forester is scribbling reports, hastily informing the command in Birmingham about the great victory of British weapons at Mauldon. Under the direct supervision of Mr.Major, of course. -There you are, gentlemen! - A joyful exclamation interrupted our conversation. I didn't even turn around: the characteristic smell of Partagas introduced the guest better than any business card. 3. Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians -By the way, it's already the second day that nothing has been heard about the Martians, - Holmes remarked. -According to the captain, the lookouts around London are not seeing activity from the enemy. The fighting stopped... After a couple of puffs, he finished with a smile: - And Major Forester is scribbling reports, hastily informing the command in Birmingham about the great victory of British weapons at Mauldon. Under the direct supervision of Mr.Major, of course. -There you are, gentlemen! - A joyful exclamation interrupted our conversation. I didn't even turn around: the characteristic smell of Partagas introduced the guest better than any business card. 3. Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians -By the way, it's already the second day that nothing has been heard about the Martians, - Holmes remarked. -According to the captain, the lookouts around London are not seeing activity from the enemy. The fighting stopped... After a couple of puffs, he finished with a smile: - And Major Forester is scribbling reports, hastily informing the command in Birmingham about the great victory of British weapons at Mauldon. Under the direct supervision of Mr.Major, of course. -There you are, gentlemen! - A joyful exclamation interrupted our conversation. I didn't even turn around: the characteristic smell of Partagas introduced the guest better than any business card. 3. Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians The fighting stopped... After a couple of puffs, he finished with a smile: - And Major Forester is scribbling reports, hastily informing the command in Birmingham about the great victory of British weapons at Mauldon. Under the direct supervision of Mr.Major, of course. -There you are, gentlemen! - A joyful exclamation interrupted our conversation. I didn't even turn around: the characteristic smell of Partagas introduced the guest better than any business card. 3. Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians The fighting stopped... After a couple of puffs, he finished with a smile: - And Major Forester is scribbling reports, hastily informing the command in Birmingham about the great victory of British weapons at Mauldon. Under the direct supervision of Mr.Major, of course. -There you are, gentlemen! - A joyful exclamation interrupted our conversation. I didn't even turn around: the characteristic smell of Partagas introduced the guest better than any business card. 3. Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians the characteristic smell of "Partagas" presented the guest better than any business card. 3. Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians the characteristic smell of "Partagas" presented the guest better than any business card. 3. Sherlock Holmes vs the Martians. 
- Gentlemen, I have wonderful news for you! - Without waiting for an invitation, Mr.Pfeiffer plopped down on an empty chair: - Master, whiskey! Best whiskey to me and my friends! I noted that for someone who starts every morning with a drink, the cinematographer looked surprisingly fresh and energetic. -Million dollar news? - Holmes clarified with a sly squint. - For a million?! Ha! Take it higher! Several and a half million! It will be the bomb! The real bomb! What are we blowing up? I asked. In response, the mutoscope man burst out laughing: -Have I already told you, doctor, that you are a big joker? - We will blow up the market! The global cinematograph market! "Puzzled Sherlock Holmes" from this day is not relevant! The top priority is now different. So, gentlemen... Mr.Pfeiffer had a theatrical pause. I must say that he managed to achieve his goal: I was intrigued. - We will call the film "Sherlock Holmes against the Martians"! And the credits: "Shot on real events"! Two sensations in one bottle: you, Mr.Holmes, and the bloodthirsty Martians! Spectators will pour in crowds! Full house! Musical based on Broadway! Competitors will only be powerlessly gnashing their teeth with envy! By the way, doctor, a role is also provided for you. Did you develop the films? - Oh yeah! Rather, Adele showed them. Do you still remember that my daughter has golden hands? We always carry a mini-lab for developing with us, and now it came in handy. I was burning with impatience! To tell the truth, I was very worried about the night shooting. The mise-en-scene is rubbish, the lighting is to hell. But Michael Pfeiffer does everything in good faith, and little Adele is his best masterpiece! -I suppose your daughter took a chance on the experiment. Increasing the development time at a lower temperature of the solution, plus adjustments to the developing composition. Here is the result and exceeded all your expectations. -Where are you from Your tricks again? - - Mr.Pfeiffer jokingly shook his finger at Holmes. - Everything was just like that! Now I have a lovely documentary material. Plus a heroic Warrior fight against a ton of enemy tripods! Do you think, gentlemen, that this is cellulose? Is this gold! Platinum! Diamonds! We need to shoot a number of game episodes, work with editing. Cheers! In one fell swoop, he knocked a double shot of Glenfiddich down his throat. To do this, Mr.Pfeiffer had to be silent for a moment, and I wedged into his monologue: - Where is your charming daughter now? We didn't see her for two days. The American just waved his hand: -Ah, Adele! Did I tell you, Doctor, that she's crazy about Martian technology? You can't drag her by the ears from the tripods! Captain Wallace, and he flew a white flag. Does she take them off? - If! I climbed into the very inside, took everything apart and studied the device! But back to our movie! Do you know what I'll tell you? We'll film the sound tape! The era will shake! - Sound?! I myself did not notice how I took a sip of whiskey, although I did not intend to drink it so early. Mr.Pfeiffer's statement impressed even Holmes. -As far as I know, - my friend said thoughtfully, -sound tapes are very expensive to manufacture. - Nonsense! We will not be petty! Scope and exclusivity - that's our motto! Profit from rental will more than cover all costs! I have already prepared a new contract for you... - Will you also offer us the main roles? There was a subtle irony behind Holmes' polite smile. Of course, the American did not notice her: -Alas, gentlemen. Your types, excuse me for being direct, are not suitable for a cinematograph. I want to take actors from the theater - their school of acting is more expressive. I have an excellent candidate for the role of Mr.Holmes. Douglas Ullman, please love and favor! The guy is seventeen years old, but the makeup works wonders. He was turned down three times on Broadway, which means something! Are you familiar with his biography, Doctor? -I had no honor, - I replied dryly. - But in vain! This is the finished plot of the bestseller! A boy from a decent lawyer family is dropping out of Harvard and tearing up with his parents! Fencing, horseback riding, athletics. A digger, a loader in a port, a sailor, a salesman in a hardware store... I just don't like the surname Ulman. I'll have to offer him a pseudonym. Something resonant, say, Douglas Fairbanks... I frowned. - You? In no case. You, doctor, can only be done by a comedian. John Bunny? What a thought! The face of a simpleton, a skipper's beard; cap knocked back. - Cap? - Cylinder! The best top hat you can find in a hat shop! Holmes and I looked at each other. I remembered my friend's numerous reincarnations, when he, hiding from surveillance or obtaining information, changed his appearance beyond recognition: an old drunkard, an unemployed groom, a beggar tramp, a priest. However, we did not try to convince Mr.Pfeiffer. Yes, script! our benefactor changed the subject. - How do you look, doctor, that we will order the script for you? Personal participation in events, your literary talent... The name of Dr.Watson in the credits will attract additional viewers! Frankly, I was confused. - I need to think. I've never written scripts... - Nonsense! I will give you samples. By following them, you can easily cope! And you, Mr.Holmes - what do you say about the position of consultant? Chief Consultant! General! -Titles, - Holmes nodded. -You want my name too. -That would be highly desirable, - Mr.Pfeiffer did not deny. - Deal? - Consultant? - Holmes repeated thoughtfully, as if tasting the word. -I have been a consulting detective all my life. Become an entertainment consultant? Why not? It might turn out to be funny. What is your opinion, Watson? The owner grew up at the table with a new portion of whiskey. Mr.Pfeiffer stood up, gave us a meaningful look and made a toast: - To the union of the detective and the cinematographer, gentlemen! . 4. I just want to point out... Become an entertainment consultant? Why not? It might turn out to be funny. What is your opinion, Watson? The owner grew up at the table with a new portion of whiskey. Mr.Pfeiffer stood up, gave us a meaningful look and made a toast: - To the union of the detective and the cinematographer, gentlemen! . 4. I just want to point out... Become an entertainment consultant? Why not? It might turn out to be funny. What is your opinion, Watson? The owner grew up at the table with a new portion of whiskey. Mr.Pfeiffer stood up, gave us a meaningful look and made a toast: - To the union of the detective and the cinematographer, gentlemen! . 4. I just want to point out...
The beginning of July brought even more heat to Maldon than the one that covered the city in the past June. One salvation - a fresh breeze fanned our faces with a pleasant coolness, brightening up our walk. On the way, I sent a telegram to my wife: in Calais, at the main post office, poste restante. This is how we agreed to keep in touch. I intended to stay at Maldon for a while, and I informed my wife about it. I would not have to sit idle: after the night battle, new wounded were admitted to St. Peter's Hospital. Yesterday I had three surgeries. Today I was given a day off, but tomorrow I was going to resume my medical duties. Passing the outskirts of the city, Holmes and I went down to the sea and stood on the shore of the Wyrley Channel Bay - at the very place where I anxiously watched the steamer taking away my dear wife. Here I witnessed other events, formidable and amazing, which almost changed the entire course of English history. Holmes was quiet and thoughtful. Strange, I thought. After all, he brilliantly revealed this truly fantastic case! Moreover, the solution he found was able to be implemented. The danger of infernal chaos, hanging over the old England, has sunk back to where it came from - into oblivion. The Martians remained, but, apparently, their days are also numbered. What is the new problem on Holmes's mind now? Are there any unsolved mysteries left in Maldon? At the risk of disturbing the course of my thoughts, I nevertheless ventured to break the silence in an attempt to encourage my friend: -I admire you, Holmes! Now, with a clear conscience, I can call you a magician and a wizard! And just try to tell me that I'm wrong! -Of course you are right, dear Watson. You, as I noticed a long time ago, are always right. And don't be shy: I wouldn't have handled this case alone. Miss Pfeiffer, Tom, professor, you, Captain Wallace... This is our common merit, which, as usual, no one will ever know. I tend to think that this is the fate of all who try to use my deductive method. Take Captain Wallace! His contribution to the victory over the Martians is undeniable, and all the laurels will go to Major Forester. - Well, I do not! I objected warmly. - If Mr.Pfeiffer's film is released, the world will know the truth! Even if you, Holmes, are indifferent to fame, I am not indifferent to justice! - Become famous thanks to the cinematograph? Holmes' lips twisted into a bitter smile. - Yes, turn inside out, we will still triumph in the film, staginess, not truth! The laws of the genre, Watson! And we can't change them. All right, they'll make heroes out of us. King Arthur with Merlin! Don Quixote with Sancho Panza! Trust me, it won't mean anything. After all, we all know how things really were. Alas, lately it seems to me that I do not quite belong to myself. Moreover, I am not quite me. What are you talking about, Holmes? I was outraged. A wave splashed on the shore ten feet from us. A glare of sunlight hit Holmes across the face, causing my friend to squint. -Imagine, Watson: somewhere immeasurably far away, in another world, the real Sherlock Holmes lives on Baker Street. And I am a shadow, a reflection, a double, called here for the sake of the Moldonian cause. Holmes has done his job, Holmes must retire. Disappear, die, sleep. The other one, the real one, will light a pipe and take a fresh issue of The Times from the table. I - You're overtired! I said decisively. -I tell you this as a doctor. Drink hot spiced wine at night and go to bed early. But even if you allow it - just allow it! - that you are right, and you are not quite you. So what? Sherlock Holmes will remain Sherlock Holmes in any world, time and space! Who, if not me, should know this? How do you know that, Watson? - It's elementary, Holmes! I'm not only a doctor, I'm your biographer! - What would I do without you? - Holmes laughed with good-natured causticity, returning to his former appearance, so familiar to me. - I just want to notice. - Mr.Holmes! Dr.Watson! We turned around. Tom Radcliffe ran from the city towards us at full speed, waving a piece of paper: - Mr.Holmes, you have a telegram! time and space! Who, if not me, should know this? How do you know that, Watson? - It's elementary, Holmes! I'm not only a doctor, I'm your biographer! - What would I do without you? - Holmes laughed with good-natured causticity, returning to his former appearance, so familiar to me. - I just want to notice. - Mr.Holmes! Dr.Watson! We turned around. Tom Radcliffe ran from the city towards us at full speed, waving a piece of paper: - Mr.Holmes, you have a telegram! time and space! Who, if not me, should know this? How do you know that, Watson? - It's elementary, Holmes! I'm not only a doctor, I'm your biographer! - What would I do without you? - Holmes laughed with good-natured causticity, returning to his former appearance, so familiar to me. - I just want to notice. - Mr.Holmes! Dr.Watson! We turned around. Tom Radcliffe ran from the city towards us at full speed, waving a piece of paper: - Mr.Holmes, you have a telegram!
 but that was the beginning of a completely different story.